% 

PRINCETON, N. J. ^ 



Section....*. 

E6G82- 



Digitized by the Internet Arcliive 
in 2015 



https://arcliive.org/details/scienceofriglitsOOfich 



THE 

ENGLISH AND FOREIGN PHILOSOPHICAL LIBRARY. 



I'liiLOSOPiiiCAr. lN(jUiRY is essentially the chief intellectual study 
* of our age. It is ])rop()se(l to produce, under the title of " The 
English and Fokeign Philosophical Libhaky," a series of 
works of tli(! highest class connected with that study. 

The English contril)utions to the series consist of original 
works, and of occasional new editions of such productions as 
have already attained a permanent rank among the philosophical 
writings of the day. 

Beyond the productions of English writers, there are many 
recent jiublications in German and French which are not readily 
accessible to English readers, unless they are comjjetent German 
and French scholars. Of these foreign writings, the translations 
have been entrusted to gentlemen whose names Avill be a guaran- 
tee for their critical fidelity. 

" The English and Foreign Philosophical Library" claims 
to be free from all bias, and thus fairly to represent all develop- 
ments of Philosophy, from Spinoza to Hartmaun, from Leibnitz 
to Lotze. Each origiual work is produced under the inspection 
of its author, from his manuscript, without intermediate sugges- 
tions or alterations. As corollaries, works showing the results 
of Positive Science, occasionally, though seldoiri, find a place in 
the series. 

The series is elegantly printed in octavo, and the price regu- 
lated by the extent of each volume. The volumes will follow in 
succession, at no fixed periods, but as early as is consistent with 
the necessary care in their production. 



THE FOLLOWING HAVE ALREADY APPEARED:— 

In Three Volumes, post 8vo, pp. 350, 406, and 384, with Index, cloth, 
£1, lis. 6d. 

A HISTORY OF MATERIALISM. 

By Professor F. A. LANGE. 

Authorised Translation from the German by Ernest C. Thomas. 

"This is a work wliich has long and impatiently been expected by a large circle of 
readers. It has been well praised by two eminenc scientists, and their words have 
created for it, as regards its appearance in our English tongue, a sort of ante-natal 
reputation. Tlie reputation is in tnany respects well deserved. Tlie book is marked 
throughout by sinsnilar ability, abounds in strikini; and suggestive reflections, subtle 
and profound discussions, felicitous and graphic descriptions of mental and sociai move- 
ments, both 111 tliemselves and in tlieir mutual relations." — Scotsman. 



THE 



ENGLISH AND FOREIGN PHILOSOPHICAL LIBRARY. 



riiiLOSoniiCAL Inquiry is essentially the chief intellectual study 
' of our age. It is proposed to produce, under the title of " The 
English and Foreign Piiilosoi'hical Libuaky," a series of 
works of the liighcst class connected with that study. 

The English contributions to the series consist of original 
works, and of occasional new editions of such productions as 
have already attained a permanent rank among the philosophical 
writings of the day. 

Beyond the productions of Englisli writers, there are many 
recent publications in German and French which are not readily 
accessible to English readers, unless they are competent German 
and French scholars. Of these foreign writings, the translations 
have been entrusted to gentlemen whose names will be a guaran- 
tee for their critical fidelity. 

" The English and Foreign Philosophical Library" claims 
to be free from all bias, and thus fairly to represent all develop- 
ments of Philosophy, from Spinoza to Hartmann, from Leibnitz 
to Lotze. Each original work is produced under the inspection 
of its author, from his manuscript, without intermediate sugges- 
tions or alterations. As corollaries, works showing the results 
of Positive Science, occasionally, though seldom, find a place in 
the series. 

The series is elegantly printed in octavo, and the price regu- 
lated by the extent of each volume. The volumes will follow in 
succession, at no fixed periods, but as early as is consistent with 
the necessary care in their production. 



THE FOLLOWING HAVE ALREADY APPEARED:— 

lu Three Volumes, post 8vo, pp. 350, 406, and 384, with Index, cloth, 
£1, I IS. 6d. 

A HISTORY OF MATERIALISM. 

By Professor F. A. LANGE. 

Authorised Translation from the German by Eunest C. Thomas. 

"This is a work w)ilch has long and impatiently been expected by a large circle of 
readers. It has been well praised by two eminent scientists, and tlieir words have 
created (or it, as regards its appearance in our English tongue, a sort of ante-natal 
reputation. Tlie reputation is in many respects well deserved. The book is marked 
throughout by sin<,Tilar ability, abounds in striking and suggestive reflections, subtle 
and profound discussions, felicitous and graphic descriptions of mental and social move- 
ments, both ill tliemselves and in tlieir mutual relations." — Scotsman. 



THE ENGLISH AND FOREIGN PHILOSOPHICAL LIBRARY. 



Post 8vo, pp. xii. — 362, cloth, los. 6d. 
NATURAL LAW : An Essay in Ethics. 

By EDITH SIMCOX. 

Second Edition. 

"Miss Sinicox deserves cordial recognition for the excellent work she has done in 
vindication of naturalism, and especially for the high nobility of her ethical purpose." — 
Alliiivxum. 



In Two Volumes, post 8vo, pp. 268 and 288, cloth, 153. 

THE CREED OF CHRISTENDOM: 

1T.S FOUNDATIONS CONTRASTED WITH ITS SUPERSTRUCTURE. 
By W. R. GREG. 

Eighth Edition, with a New Introduction. 

"No candid reader of the 'Creed of Christendom' can close the book without the 
secret acknowledgment that it is a model of honest investigation and clear exposition, 
conceived in the true spirit of serious ami faithful research." — Westmimler Review. 



Third Edition. Post 8vo, pp. six. — 249, cloth, 7s. 6d. 

OUTLINES OF THE HISTORY OF RELIGION 

TO THE SPREAD OF THE UNIVERSAL RELIGIONS. 
By C. P. TIELE, 

Dr. Theol., Professor of the History of Religions in the University of Leiden. 

Translated from the Dutch by J. EsTLiN Carpenter, M.A. 

" Few books of its size contain the result of so much wide thinking, able and laborious 
study, or enable the reader to gain a better bird's-eye view of the latest results of inves- 
tigations into the religious history of nations. . . . These pages, full of infoi-m.ation, 
these sentences, cut and perhaps also dry, short and clear, condense the fruits of long 
and thorough research." — Scotsman. 



Third Edition. Post 8vo, pp. 276, cloth, 7s. 6d. 

RELIGION IN CHINA: 

Containing a Brief Account of the Three Religions of the Chinese, with 
Observations on the Prospects of Christian Conversion 
amongst that People. 
By JOSEPH BDKINS. D.D.. Peking. 

"We confidently rucornniend a careful perusal of the present work to all interested 
in this creat subject." — London and China Express. 

" Dr. Edkins has been most careful in noting the varied and often complex phases of 
opinion, so as to give an account of considerable value of the subject." — Scotsman. 

Po.st Svo, pp. xviii. — 198, cloth, 7s. 6d. 

A CANDID EXAMINATION OF THEISM. 

By PHYSICUS. 

" It is impossible to go through this work without forming a very high opinion of his 
speculative and argumentative power, and a sincere respect for his temper.ance of state- 
ment and his diligent endeavour to make out the best case he can for the views he rejects." 
— Academy. 



THE ENGLISH AMD FOREIGN PHILOSOPHICAL LIBRARY. 



Post 8vo, pp. xii. — 282, cloth, los. 6d. 

THE COLOUR SENSE : Its Origin and Development. 

AN ESSAY IN COMI'AliATlVH PSYCHOLOGY. 

By GRANT ALLEN, B.A., Author of " Physlologflcal .fflsthetlcs. " 

" The book is attractive throughout, for its object i.s pursued with an earne-stness and 
singleness of purpose which never fail to maintain tlie interest of the reader." — Saturday 
Rtview. 

Post Svo, pp. XX. — 316, cloth, 78. 6d. 

THE PHILOSOPHY OF MUSIC. 

BEING THK SUBSTANCE OP 

A COURSE OF LECTURES 
Delivered at the Royal Institution of Great Bkitain, 
IN Februaby and March 1877. 

By W TT.T.TA M POLE, Mus. Doc. Oxon. 

Fellow of the Royal Societies of London and Edinburgh ; one of the Ex>aminers in Music 
to the University of London. 

" We may recommend it as an extremely useful compendium of modern research 
into the scientific basis of music. There is no want of completeness." — Pall Mall Gazette. 



Post Svo, pp. 168, cloth, 6s. 

CONTRIBUTIONS TO THE HISTORY OF the DEVELOPMENT 
OF THE HUMAN RACE. 

LECTURES AND DISSERTATIONS 

By LAZARUS GEIGER, 
Author of " Origin and Evolution of Human Speech and Reason." 

Translated from the Second German Edition by David Ashek, Ph.D., 
Corresponding Blember of the Berlin Society for the Study 
of Modern Languages and Literature. 

" The papers translated in this volume deal with various aspects of a very fascinating 
study. Herr Geiger had secured a place in the foremost ranks of German philologers, 
but he seems to have valued his philological researches chiefly as a means of throwing 
light on the early condition of mankind. He prosecuted his inquiries in a thoroughly 
philosophical spirit, and he never offered a theory, however paradoxical it might seem 
at first sight, for which he did not advance solid arguments. Unlike the majority of 
German scholars, he took pleasure in working out his doctrines in a manner that was 
likely to make them interesting to the general public ; and his capacity for clear and 
attractive exposition was hardly inferior to that of lUi'. Max Mtiller himself." — St. James's 
Gazette. 

Post Svo, pp. 350, with a Portrait, cloth, los. 6d. 

DR. APPLETON : His Life and Literary Relics. 

By JOHN H. APPLETON, M.A., 
Late Vicar of St. Mark's, Staplefield, Sussex ; 

AND 

A. H. SAYCB, M.A., 
Fellow of Queen's College, and Deputy Professor of Comparative Philology, Oxford. 

" Although the life of Dr. Appleton was uneventful, it is valuable as illustrating the 
m.anner in which the speculative and the practical can be combined. His biographers 
talk of his geniality, his tolerance, his kindliness, and these characteristics, combined 
with his fine intellectu,al gifts, his se.arching analysis, his independence, his ceaseless 
energy and ardour, render his life specially interesting. "—iVoKco>yo)')n!s(. 



THE ENGLISH AMD FOREIGN PHILOSOPHICAL LIBRARY. 



Post Svo, pp. xxvi.-37o, with Portrait, Illustrations, and an Autograph Letter, 
cloth, 12s. 6d. 

EDGAR QUINET : 

HIS EARLY LIFE AND WRITINGS. 

By RICHARD HEATH. 

" Without attacliing the immense value tn Edgai- Quinet's writings -wbicli Mr. Heath 
considers tlicir due, wo are quite ready to own tliat they pos.sess solid merits whicli, 
perhaps, have not attraeted sufficient attention in this country. To a truly reverent 
spirit, Edgar Qninet joined the deepest love for humanity in general. Mr. Heath . . . 
deserves credit for the completeness and finish of the portraiture to which he set his 
hand. It has evidently been a labour of love, for the text is marked throughout by 
iutinite painstaking, both in style and matter."— &io6c. 



Second Edition, post Svo, cloth, 7s. 6d. 
THE ESSENCE OF CHRISTIANITY. 

By LUDWIG FEUERBACH. 

Translated from the Second German Edition by Marian Evans, 
Translator of Strauss's " Life of Jesus." 

" I confess tliat to Feuerbach I owe a debt of inestimable gratitude. Feel- 
in;? about in uncertainty for the ground, and finding everywhere shifting sands, 
Feuerbach cast a sudden blaze into the darknes.s, and di-sclosed to me the way." 
— Frum S. Baring-Gould's "The Origin and Development of Reliijioas Jiclicf," 
Part II., Preface, page xii. 

Tljird Editioti, revised, post Svo, pp. 200, clotb, 3s. 61.I. 

AUGUSTE COMTE AND POSITIVISM. 

By the late JOHN STUART MILL, M.P. 
Post Svo, pp. xliv. — 2l6, cloth, 7s. 6d. 

ESSAYS AND DIALOGUES OF GIACOMO LEOPARDL 

Translated from the Italian, with Biograpliical Sketch, 
by Chakles Edwahdes. 

" Tliis is a goo 1 piece of work to have done, and Mr. Edwaides deserves praise both 
for intention and execution." — Atltauanm. 

" Gratitude is due to Mr. Edwardes for an able poitraiture of one of the saddest 
Egnres in htenry history, and an able trauslatiou of his less inviting and less known 
works." — Acaduny. 

Post Svo, pp. xii. — 178, cloth, 6s. 

RELIGION AND PHILOSOPHY IN GERMANY: 

A Fragment. 

By HEINRICH HEINE. 

Translated by John Snodgkass, 

Translator of " Wit, Wisdom, and Pathos from the Prose of Heinrich Heine." 

" Nowhere is the singidar charm of this writer more marked than in the vivid pages 
of this work. . . . IiTespective of subject, there is a charm about whatever Heine wrote 
that captivates the reader and wins his sympathies before criticism steps in. But tliere 
can be none who would fail to admit the power as well :is the beauty of the wide-ranging 
pictures of the intellectual development of tlie country of deep thinkers. Beneath his 
f-'race the writer holds a iniglitv grip of fact, stripped of all disguise and made patent over 
all confusing simouudings." — JJuoLscller. 



THE ENGLISH AND FOREIGN PH I LOSOPII IC AI. LIBRARY. 



Post 8vo, pp. xviii. — 310, with Portrait, cloth, los. 6d. 
EMERSON AT HOME AND ABROAD. 

By MONCURB D. CONWAY. 
Aut)ior of " Tliu Sacrcil Anthology," " The Wandering Jew," " Thomas Carlylo," Ac. 

This book reviews tlie i)ersoniil and general liistory of tlie so-called "Trans- 
cendental " movement in Anu-rioa ; and it contains various letters by Emerson 
not before published, as well as personal recollections of his lectures and con- 
versations. 

" Mr. Conway lias not confined liim.self to personal reminiscences; he brings together 
all the iniiiortant facts of Emerson's life, and presents a full account of his governing 
ideas — Indicating their mutual relations, and tracing the processes by which Kmorson 
gradually arrived at them in their matui-o form." — SI. Javies's OazcUe. 



Fifteenth Edition. Post 8vo, pp. xx. — 314, cloth, los. 6d. 

ENIGMAS OF LIFE. 

By W. R. GREG. 

" What is to be the future of tlie human race? What are the great obstacles in the 
way of progress? What are the best means of surmounting these obstacles? Such, in 
rough statement, are some of the problems which are more or less present to Mr. Greg's 
mind ; and altliough he does not pretend to discuss tliem fully, he makes a great many 
observations about them, always expressed in a graceful style, frequently eloquent, and 
occasionally putting old subjects in a new light, and recording a large amount of read- 
ing and study." — Saturday/ Review. 



Post 8vo, pp. 328, cloth, ICS. 6d. 

ETHIC 

DEMONSTRATED IN GEOMETRICAL ORDER AND DIVIDED 
INTO FIVE PARTS, 

WHICH TREAT 

I. Of God. 

II. Of the Nature and Origin of the Mind. 

III. Of the Origin and Nature op the Affects. 

IV. Op Human Bondage, or op the Strength of the Affects. 
V. Op the Power of the Intellect, or op Human Liberty. 

By BENEDICT DE SPINOZA. 

Translated from the Latin by WILLIAM Hale White. 

" Mr. White only lays claim to accuracy, the Euclidian form of the work giving but 
small scope for literary finish. We have carefully examined a number of passages with 
the original, and have in every case found the sense correctly given in fairly readable 
English. For tlie iiurposes of study it may in most cases replace the original ; more Mr. 
White could not claim or desire." — Atherwiu,m. 



lu Three Volumes. Post 8vo, Vol. I., pp. xxxii. — 532, cloth, iSs. ; Vols. II. 
and III., pp. viii. — 496; and pp. viii. — 510, cloth, 32s. 

THE WORLD AS WILL AND IDEA. 

By ARTHUR SCHOPENHAUER. 

Translated from the German by R. B. Haldane, M. A., and John Kemp, M.A. 

" The translators have done their part very well, for, as they say, their work has 
been one of difficulty, especially as the style of the original is occasionally ' involved and 
loose.' At the same time there is a force, a vivacity, a directness, in the phrases and 
sentences of Schopenhauer wliieh are very dilTerent from the manner of ordinary German 
philosophical treatises. He knew English and English literature tlioroughly ; he ad- 
mired the clearness of their m.auner, and the popular strain even in then- pliilosophy, 
and these qualities he tried to introduce into Ins own worKs and discourse." — kcoiaman. 



THE ENGLISH AND FOREIGN PHILOSOPHICAL LIBRARY. 



Ill Three Volumes, post 8vo, pp. xxxii. — 372 ; vi. — 368 ; and viii. — 360, 
cloth, /^i, IIS. 6ti. 

THE PHILOSOPHY OF THE UNCONSCIOUS. 

By EDWARD VON HARTMANN. 

[Speculative Results, according to the Inductive Method of Physical Science.] 
Authorised Translation, by William C. Coupland, M.A. 

** Ten Editions of the German original have Icen sold since its first appearance in j868. 

"Mr. Coupland has been remarkably successful in dealing with the difficulties of 
Hartmann. ... It must be owned that tlie book merited the honour of translation. Its 
collection of facts alone would be sufficient to deserve this, and the appendix in the 
third volume, giving a readable resumi of Wurdt's psycho-physics, is a valuable addition 
to English psychology." — Athenceum. 



Three Vols., post 8vo, pp. viii. — 368 ; ix. — 225 ; and xxvii. — 327, 
cloth, £1, IIS. 6d. 

THE GUIDE OF THE PERPLEXED OF MAIMONIDES. 

Translated from the Original Text, and Annotated 
by M. Fbiedlandk.r, Ph.D. 

Vol. I. has already been published under the auspices of the Hebrew Litera- 
ture Society ; but it has now been determined that the complete work, in three 
volumes, shall be issued in the English and Foreign Philosophical Library. 

" It is with sincere satisfaction that we welcome an English translation of the well- 
known tractate of Maimonides, Moreh Nebhukhim, or, 'Guide of the Perplexed.' . . . 
Dr. Friedliiuder has performed his work in a manner to secure the hearty acknowledg- 
ment of students," — Saturday/ Review. 

" From every point of view a successful production." — Academy. 

"Dr. Friedlander has conferred a distinct boon on the Jews of Eugland and 
America. " — Jewish Clironicle. 



Post 8vo, pp. xii. and 395, cloth, with Portrait, 14s. 

LIFE OF GIORDANO BRUNO, THE NOLAN. 

By I. FRITH. 

Revised by Professor MoRiz Careieee. 

" The interest of the book lies in tlie conception of Bruno's character and in the 
elucidation of his philosophy. . . . His writings dropped from him wherever he went, 
and were published in many places. Their number is very larire, and the bibliographical 
appendix is not the least valuable part of this volume. . . . We are tempted to multiply 
quotations from the pages before us, for Bruno's utterances have a rare cliarm through 
their directness, their vividness, their poetic force. Bruno stands in relation to later 
philosophy, to ICant or Hegel, .as Giotto stands to Raphael. We feel the merit of the 
more complete and perfect work ; but we are moved and attracted by the greater indi- 
viduality wliich accompanies tlie struj^gle after expression in an earlier and simpler age. 
Students of philosophy will know at once how nuicli labour has been bestowed upon this 
modest attempt to set forth Bruno's significance as a philosopher. We have contented 
ourselves with showing how much the general reader may gain from a study of its pages, 
which are never overburdened by technicalities and are never d\M." — Athena:uin. 



THE ENGLISH AND FOREIGN PHILOSOPHICAL LIBRARY. 



Post 8vo, pp. xxvi.— 413, cloth, price 14a. 
MORAL ORDER AND PROGRESS: 

AN ANALYSIS OF ETHICAL CONCEPTIONS. 

By S. ALEXANDER, 

Fellow of Lincoln College, Oxford. 

This work is an account of tlio factors involved in tlio two central phenomena 
of Order or Eiinilibriuni, and Progress, which are sliown to be essential to 
morality. Its method is to group ethical facts under tlie main working concep- 
tions of morality. It treats Kthics independently of Biology, but the result is 
to confirm the theory of Evolution by showing that the characteristic differences 
of moral action are such as should be expected if that theory were true. In 
particular, Book III. aims at jnoving that m0r.1l ideals follow, in their origin 
and development, the same law as natural species. 



Post Svo, clotli. 
THE SCIENCE OF KNOWLEDGE. 

By J. G. PICHTB. 
Translated from the German by A. E. Kroeger. 
With a New Introduction by Professor W. T. Harris. 



Post Svo, cloth. 
THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 

By J. G. FICHTE. 

Translated from the German by A. E. Kroegeh. 

With a New Introduction by Professor W. T. ^ARRIS. 

Fichte belongs to those great men whose lives ai'e an everlasting possession 
to mankind, and whose words the world does not willingly let die. His character 
stands written in his life, a massive but severely simple whole. It has no parts, 
the depth and earnestness on wliich it rests speak forth alike in his thoughts, 
words and actions. No man of his time — few, perhaps, of any time — exercised 
a more powerful, spirit-stirring influence over the minds of his fellow-countrymen. 
The impulse which he communicated to the national thouglit extended far 
beyoud the sphere of his personal influences ; it has awakened, it will still 
aw.aken, hij;h emotion and manly resolution in thousands who never heard his 
voice. The ceaseless effort of his life was to rouse men to a sense of the divinity 
of their own nature, to fix their thoughts upon a spiritual life as the only true 
and real life ; to teach them to look upon all else as mere show and unreality ; 
and thus to lead them to constant effort after the highest ideal of purity, virtue, 
independence and self-denial. 



IN THE PRESS. 
In Two Volumes, post Svo. 

JOHANN GOTTLIEB FICHTE'S POPULAR WORKS. 

THE NATURE OF THE SCHOLAR ; THE VOCATION OF THE SCHOLAR ; 
THE VOCATION OF MAN; THE DOCTRINE OF RELIGION; 
CHARACTERISTICS OF THE PRESENT AGE. 

With a Memoir by William Smith, LL.D. 



THE ENGLISH AMD FOREIGN PHILOSOPHICAL LIBRARY. 



EXTRA SERIES. 

Two Volumes, post 8vo, pp. xxii. — 328 and xvi. — 358, with Portrait, 
cloth, 2IS. 

LESSING : His Life and Writings. 

By JAMES SIMB, M.A. 

Second Edition. 

" It Is to Lessiiis; that an Eiiglishmai\ wmiUi turn with readiest affection. We cannot 
but wonder that more of tliis man is not known amongst us." — Thomas Caulyle. 

" But to Mr. .lames Sinie lias been reserved the honour of presenting to tl-.e English 
p<il)Uc a full-lcngtli pnrtriiit of Lessing, in which no poi'tion of the canvas is uncovered, 
and in whieli tlicre is hardly a touch but tells. We can say that a clearer or more 
compact piece of biographic criticism has not been produced in England for many a 
day.'- — We.ttmlnxter Revteio. 

" An account of Lessing's life and work on ilie scale which he deserves is now for the 
first time offere i to English readers. Mr. Sime lias performed his task with industry, 
knowledge, and sympatliy ; qualities which must concur to make a successful biogra- 
pher." — Pall Mall tiazetle, 

" This is .an admirable book. Tt lacks no quality that a biography ought to have. Its 
metliod is excellent, its theme is profoundly interesting : its tone is the happiest mixture 
of .synip.atliy .and discrimination : its style is clear, masculine, free from ell'ort or affecta- 
tion, yet eloquent by its very sincerity." — Standard. 

"He has given a life of Lessing clear, interesting, .and full, while he has given a 
study of his writings which beais distinct marks of au intimate acquaintance with his 
subject, and of a solid and appreciative judgment." — Scotsman. 



In Three Volumes, post 8vo. Vol. I. pp. xvi. — 248, cloth, 7s. 6d. ; Vol. II. 
pp. viii. — 400, cloth, los. 6d. ; Vol. III. pp. xii. — 292, cloth, ga, 

AN ACCOUNT OF THE POLYNESIAN RACE : 

ITS ORIGIN AND MIGRATIONS, 
AND THE ANCIENT HISTORY OF THE HAWAIIAN PEOPLE TO THE TIMES OF 
KAMEHAMEHA I. 

By ABRAHAM FORNANDER, Circuit Judge of the Island of Maui, H.I. 

"Mr. Fomander has evidently enjoyed excellent opportunities for promoting the 
study which has produced this work. Unlike most foreign residents in Polynesia, he has 
acquired a good knowledge of the language spoken by the people among wiiom he dwelt. 
This h.as enabled him, during his thirty-four years' residence in the Hawaiian Islands, to 
collect material which could be obtained only by a person possessing sncli an advantage. 
It is so seldom that a priv.ate settler iu the Polynesian Islands takes an intelligent interest 
in local ethnology and archieology, and makes use of the advantage he possesses, that 
we feel especially thankful to Mr. Fomander for his labours in this comparatively little- 
known field of research." — Academy. 

" Offers almost portentous evidence of the acquaintance of the author with the 
Polynesian customs and laugu.agos, and of his industry and erudite care in the analysis 
and comparison of the tongues spoken in the Pacific Archipelagoes." — Scolsman. 



In Two Volumes, post 8vo, pp. viii. — 40S ; viii.— 402, cloth, 21s. 

ORIENTAL RELIGIONS, 

AND THEIR RELATION TO UNIVERSAL RELIGION. 
By SAMUEL JOHNSON. 
I.— I N D I A. 



LONDON : TRUBNER & CO., LUDGATE HILL. 



503 — 4/6/89 — G. 



PRINTKO BY BM.LANTVNE. HA\.SON AND CO. 
KUINIJUKGH AND LONUON. 



THE 

ENGLISH AND FOREIGN 

PHILOSOPHICAL LIBRARY 



THE 

SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



THE 



SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 

BY 

. / 

J. G. FICHTE. 

TR AN SLATED FROM THE GERMAN 

BY 

A. E. KROEGER. 

WITH A PREFACE 

BY 

WILLIAM T. HARRIS, 

professor of the school of philosophy, concord, mass. ; editor of the 
"journal of speculative philosophy," etc. 



LONDON: 

TRUBNER & CO., LUDGATE HILL. 
1889. 

[All right i reserved.] 



PREFACE. 



Fichte's system of philosophy is pre-eminently a philo- 
sophy of the free will. Free will is certainly not an 
object of external perception, but rather of introspection. 
When we look outwardly, and behold things and events 
in time and space, we contemplate each thing limited on 
all sides by other things ; each event limited before and 
after by other events. Such limitation, according to the 
philosophy of Kant and Fichte, belongs to the category 
of quality. This category includes affirmation, negation, 
and limitation : affirmation of the thing or event ; nega- 
tion of it by others which we perceive to exclude it ; 
limitation of the thing or event by others and their 
limitation by it. This gives reciprocity for the third sub- 
category of quality. In the " Science of Knowledge " 
Fichte deduces these three immediate categories of con- 
sciousness : the ego, the non-ego, and the mutual limita- 
tion of the ego and non-ego. He thus finds the category 
of quality as the first and most direct form of conscious- 
ness. This category of quality considers all manner of 
objects always under the condition of being limited from 
outside. 

People do most of their conscious thinking in the 
category of quality, and consequently find all thoughts 
that do not fit that category " unthinkable." This is the 

A 



vi 



PREFACE. 



supreme category with " agnostics." But all people do a 
great deal of thinking in the other great category of the 
Mind — the category of Freedom, variously called self- 
activity and self-determination. While quality or mutual 
limitation is the general form of sense-perception and 
the understanding, the category of self-activity (called by 
Spinoza causa sui), or freedom, is the basis of the three 
great realms of thought that are accounted supreme in 
human life — the realms of rights and morals, of art and 
literature, and of the revelation of the divine. The 
realm of rights and morals concerns the good, a sub- 
category under the idea of self-activity, and itself in- 
cluding many subordinate categories, like justice, virtue, 
duty, obedience to the authority of institutions, &c. 
These categories can have no significance in regard to 
inanimate things and none in regard to living beings 
which have not developed self-activity to the point of 
freedonri and responsibility. 

The lealm of art and literature is governed by the 
category of the beautiful, another sub-category of free- 
dom. For the beautiful is the manifestation of free 
personality, and the epochs of art take rank in accord- 
ance with the adequacy of their manifestation of this 
attribute. Homer taught the world how to recognize 
freedom under all phases of nature ; the essence of the 
poetic is trope and personification. It indicates a view 
of nature that refuses to see mechanical forces, but 
insists that all movement is free and personal. Modern 
poetry still imitates Homer, and modern art ornaments 
all things by decking them out with shapes that seem 
to realize inward purposes. Thus the real intention 
(of usefulness for man) is concealed by the appearance 
of freedom. The ornamented utensil looks as though 



PREFACE. 



vii 



it assumed its form for its own use and not for the sake 
of usefulness to others. 

The realm of religion, finally, implies the same funda- 
mental category of free personality as all in all. For it 
looks upon all things as creations of an absolute Person 
who has made all things for the sake of the manifestation 
of His infinite freedom. 

This category of self-activity is the fundamental form 
of our inward sense — i.e., of introspection — just as quality 
is the form of our external sense — i.e., sense-perception. 
Quality is the form of fate, and its insight sees that all 
things are what they are because the totality of conditions 
has necessitated them to be so. The category of self- 
activity is the form of freedom, and its insight sees that 
the supreme condition of everything is freedom, and that 
there is no fate except as secondary or derivative from 
freedom. In other words, the ultimate motive power in 
all force is will. 

Fichte's system of philosophy sets out from the cate- 
gory of quality and proceeds towards the category of 
freedom, demonstrating at every step that self activity is 
the foundation of the qualitative and showing how the 
qualitative comes to arise from the self-active. Being or 
existence is not a sort of quiescent substrate underlying 
all manner of activity, but the very substance of being 
itself is pure activity. Having shown how the appearance 
of being and the qualitative arises in the mind through 
the process of self-activity, Fichte has completed his 
theory of the intellect and arrived at the beginning of 
his theory of the will. He calls this the Practical Part of 
the Science of Knowledge. It is this Practical Part of 
the Science of Knowledge which furnishes the standpoint 
of the present work. 



viii 



PREFACE. 



The one supreme fact in the universe, from Fichte's 
point of view, is the free will. To discuss this idea in its 
relation to civil society and the State, both of which 
institutions arise from the recognition of freedom as the 
most sacred object in the secular world, is the object of 
the book before us — " The Science of Rights," or of juris- 
prudence. 

Mr. Kroeger, the translator, says in regard to it : " The 
Science of Knowledge having been established as the 
science of all sciences, Fichte, soon after its discovery 
and publication, deemed it advisable to illustrate by an 
example in what manner other sciences take their start- 
ing point from it, and apply the form which it prescribes 
for all sciences. Intensely interested in the political 
state of affairs in Europe, he naturally hit upon the 
Science of Rights, or of Law generally, as the science 
which it would be most congenial for him to treat ; and 
this preference was strengthened by the reflection that 
the deduction of the principle of law would involve 
a circumstantial deduction of the principle of indivi- 
duality — an extremely difficult and important point in 

the science of knowledge What our law-books 

and political treatises lack, the a priori deduction of our 
fundamental principle of government and law from the 
conception of reason as reason (or from the ego), 
Fichte's Science of Rights supplies." 

The present work is a translation of Fichte's first 
sketch of the Philosophy of Rights which appeared in 
1796 under the title : "Grundlage des Naturrechts nach 
Principien der Wissenschaftslehre von Johann Gottlieb 
Fichte. Jena and Leipzig." 

It seems that Kant published a little later in the same 
year a work on the Science of Right (Rechtslehre), as the 



PREFACE. 



ix 



first part of his Metaphysic of Morals. (An English 
translation of Kant's work, by W. Hastie, B.D., 1887, 
is published by T. & T. Clark, of Edinburgh). 

There is an essential agreement between the two 
works. Fichte held substantially the Kantian doctrine. 
The two works deserve the careful study of all who wish 
to see the profound rational principles that exist in the 
complex of usages and compromises that have grown 
into our system of law. Hegel wrote his first sketch of 
a Philosophy of Rights in 1802-3, and published a more 
elaborate work in 1821. These three works respectively 
by the three greatest thinkers in modern times furnish a 
great storehouse of ideas on the subject of jurisprudence 
and the constitutional framework of States. As a sample, 
one may refer to Kant's discussion of the three great 
fundamental powers into which the government is divided, 
and especially their co-ordination (see pp. 165-173 of 
Hastie's translation), as a treatment that cannot fail to be 
of great interest to Englishmen and to all peoples deri- 
vative from England. To the English nation belongs 
the great honour of having invented local self-government 
and the complete co-ordination of the three departments 
of government — the executive, the judiciary, and the 
legislative. In Great Britain this constitution grew as 
a natural growth. In English colonies its essential 
principles are in process of being reformulated with great 
success. 

In the present active state of the public mind on 
questions of the ownership of property and the socialistic 
reorganization of society, it is necessary to appeal to 
reason rather than to tradition, and show the rationale of 
the institutions that have come down to us from our 
forefathers. It has become essential to know what this or 



X 



PREFACE. 



that right brings with it — what coheres with the ownership 
of land, what with the use of money, or the right of 
taxation, or of the ballot. The system is so complex 
and the interdependences are so subtle that if one link is 
thrust out there follow entirely unexpected results in 
apparently disconnected spheres of rights. The reflec- 
tions of a Kant, a Fichte, or a Hegel will doubtless 
provoke dissent in the reader's mind. But they will 
already have served a good purpose when they have been 
the occasion for so much study as dissent implies. 
There is one thing that their study will surely produce. 
This is the conviction that the progress of the world 
moves from the consolidation of the three powers of 
government in one person to the co-ordination of those 
powers in separate departments ; from the constitutional 
forms in which one type prevails (as that of the family 
prevails in the patriarchal government of China) to the 
form in which the family, civil society, the State, and the 
Church are independent and complete in their functions 
without usurping the functions of one another. This 
will destroy the illusion of socialism, which wishes the 
State to absorb civil society, as well as the illusion of the 
" Nihilist," who wishes civil society to absorb the State. 

W. T. HARRIS. 

Concord, Massachusetts, 
1888. 



INDEX. 



PAGES 

Introduction > 9-27 

First Part of the Science of Rights ; or, The 

Science of Natural Rights .... 30-202 

Book First : Deduction of the Conception of 

Rights 30-83 

Book Second : Deduction of the Applicability of 

the Conception of Rights 86-132 

Book Third : Application of the Conception of 

Rights ■ . . 137-202 

Second Part of the Science of Rights . . 205-387 
Book First : Concerning State Organization . 205-234 
Book Second : Concerning the State Constitution 237-285 
Book Third : Concerning Municipal Law . . 287-3S7 

First Appendix to the Science of Rights : Fun- 
damental Principjes of the Rights of Family . . 391-469 

Second Appendix to the Suence of Rights: 

International and Cosmopolitan Law . . . 473-492 

Concerning the Nature of Animals . - . 495-505 



CONTENTS. 



INTRODUCTION. 

I. How a real Philosophical Science is distinguished 
from a mere formal Philosophy .... 
II. What the problem of the Science of Rights, as a real 
Philosophical Science, will be ... . 
III. Concerning the relation of the present theory of Rights 
to Kant's Science 

FIRST PART. 

BOOK FIRST. 

Deduction ok the Conception of Rights. 
§ 1. A finite rational being can not posit itself without as- 
cribing to itself a free causality .... 31-43 

§ 2. Through this positing of its power to have free cau- 
sality, the rational being posits and determines a 
sensuous world outside of itself .... 40- 48 



PAGES 

9-iS 
16-21 
22-27 



4 



CONTENTS. 



§ 3. The finite rational being can not ascribe to itself a ' 
free causality in the sensuous world, wiihout as- 
cribing the same to others, and hence, without like- 
wise assuming other rational beings outside of itself. 48-62 

§ 4. The finite being cannot assume other finite rational 
beings outside of itself, without positing itself as oc- 
cupying a determined relation toward them, which 
is called the legal relation 62-83 



BOOK SECOND. 

DeDXJCTION CF the ApPLICAniLITY OF THE 

Conception of Rights. 

§ 5. The rational being can not posit itself as an individual 
being having causality, unless it ascribes to itself 
a material body, and thereby determines that body. 87-94. 

§ 6. Tlie person can ascribe to itself no body, without 
positing such body as under the influence of another 
outside person, and without, therefore, further deter- 
mining such body 94-125 

§ 7. Proof, that through the foregoing six propositions, 
the applicability of the Conception of Rights has 
become possible 125-134 



CONTENTS. 5 

BOOK THIRD. 
Application of the Conception of Rights. 

PAGES 

§ I. Systematic Division of the Science of Natural Rights 137-1S9 
§2. Concerning the Original Rights of Men . . . 159-170 
§ 3. Concerning the Right of Compulsion . . .171-202 

SECOND PART. 
BOOK FIRST. 
Concerning State Organization. 



§ I. Systematic Division of this Science .... 205-209 
§ 2. Concerning State Organization ..... 209-234 

BOOK SECOND. 
Concerning the State Constitution. 
§ I. The Establishment of a Government . . . 237-252 
§ 2. The Establishment of a Check upon the Government 253-285 

BOOK THIRD. 
Concerning Municipal Law. 

§ I. Civil Law 289-343 

Property in Land 298-300 

Mineral Lands 300-302 

Property in Animals ...... 302-3H 



6 CONTENTS. 

PACES 

Property in Products of Industry and Art . . 311-317 

Money 317-321 

The House , 322-326 

Good Name 326-328 

I 

The Right of Personal Security .... 328-333 

The Right of Self- Defence 333-338 

Acquisition and Dereliction of Property . , . 338-343 

§ 2. Penal Law 343-373 

Preliminary 343-346 

Punishment by fines 347-355 

Punishment by confinement 355-3^3 

Murder 363-364 

The punishment by outlawing . . . .364-366 
The punishment of death ..... 366-371 
Pillory, Damages, etc. 371-373 

§ 3, Police Law 374-38? 

FIRST APPENDIX TO THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 

The Fundamental Principles of the Rights of Family . 391-469 

§ I. Deduction of Marriage 391-408 

§ 2. Law of Marriage 409-438 

§ 3. Concerning the Legal Relation of both Sexes in 

general to each other in the State .... 439-451 
§ 4. Concerning the Legal Relation between Parents and 

Children in a State 451-469 



CONTENTS. 



7 



SECOND APPENDIX TO THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 

PAGES 

International and Cosmopolitan Law . • . . 473-492 
§ I. Concerning International Law . . . , 473-489 
§ 2. Concerning Cosmopolitan Law .... 489-492 

Concerning the Nature of Animals . , . 495-505 



INTRODUCTION. 



I. 

HOW A REAL PHILOSOPHICAL SCIENCE IS DISTIN- 
GUISHED FROM A MERE FORMULAR PHILOSOPHY. 

The character of Reason consists in this, that 
the acting and the object of the acting are one and 
the same ; and this description completely exhausts 
the sphere of Reason. Use of language has desig- 
nated this sublime conception for those who are 
able to think it, that is, for those who are able to 
abstract from their own Ego, by the word Ego. 
Hence, Reason generally has been characterized as 
Egohood. Whatsoever exists for a rational being 
exists in it ; but nothing is in it except by virtue 
of an acting upon itself ; what it contemplates it 
contemplates in itself, but there is nothing to be con- 
templated in it but its acting ; and the Ego itself 
is nothing but an acting upon itself* To enter 
into explanations about this matter is not worth 

* I should not even like to say an active, lest I might suggest 
the conception of a substrate, in which this power of acting would 
be supposed to be wrapped up. Such a substrate would be again 
the thing per se, only in the present case it would make the Ego 
itself such a thing per se. 



10 



INTRODUCTION. 



while. This insight is the exclusive condition of 
all philosophizing ; and unless a person has attainea 
this insight, he is not yet ripe for philosophy 
And, indeed, all true philosophers have philoso- 
phized from this stand-point ; only without being 
clearly conscious of it. 

This inner acting of the rational being occurs 
either necessarily or tlirotigJi fi-ecdom. 

The rational being is simply in so far as it posits 
itself as being ; that is, in so far as it is self-con- 
scious. All Being, that of the Ego as well as that 
of the Non-Ego, is a determined modification of 
consciousness ; and without consciousness there is 
no Being. Whosoever assumes the latter assumes 
a substrate of the Ego, which is to be an Ego 
without being such, and thus contradicts himself 
Hence, only those are necessary acts which result 
from the conception of the rational being, or through 
which the possibility of self-consciousness is con- 
ditioned ; but these acts are most certainly all 
necessary, and result as certainly as there is a ra- 
tional being. The rational being necessarily posits 
itself ; hence, it necessarily does also all that may 
belong to this act of positing itself through itself 

The rational being in acting does not become 
conscious of its acting, since itself is its acting, and 
nothing more ; but that whereof we are conscious 
is assumed to be external to consciousness, and 
hence external to the acting — it is the object of the 
acting. The Ego becomes conscious only of that 
which arises for it in and through this acting ; and 



INTRODUCTION. 



II 



that which thus arises is the object of conscious- 
ness, or the thing. No other sort of thing exists 
for a rational being ; and since we can speak of a 
thing and of being only in their relation to a ra- 
tional being, no other sort of thing exists at all. 
Whosoever speaks of another thing does not know 
what he says. 

That which arises in a necessary* acting of the 
Ego, but whereof the Ego does not become con- 
scious, from the reason adduced, itself appears as 
necessary ; that is, in representing it the Ego feels 
itself not free. Hence, objects are said to have 
Reality. The criterion of all reality is the feeling 
of being forced to represent something in the man- 
ner in which it is represented. The ground of this 
necessity we have seen ; if the rational being is to 
be as such, it must act in this necessary manner. 
Hence, the expression of our conviction of the 
reality of a thing is this : as true as I live, or as 
true as I am. 

If the object has its ground solely in the acting 
of the Ego, and is completely determined through 
the Ego alone, it follows that, if there be distinc- 
tions amongst the objects, these their distinctions 
can arise only through different modes of acting on 

* When the Science of Knowledge said : Every thing which is 
exists through an acting of the Ego, (particularly through the pro- 
ductive power of imagination,) it was interpreted as if the science 
had spoken of a free acting. Thus it became easy to cry down the 
whole system as most visionary. But to say visionary is not to say 
nearly enough. To mistake the products of free acting for the 
products of necessary acting, and vice versa, is insanity. 

B 



12 



INTR ODUC TION. 



the part of the Ego. Every object became for the 
Ego determuied in this particular manner, in which 
it is determined, simply because the Ego acted in 
the manner in which it did act ; but that the Ego 
did so act was necessary, for just such an act was 
one of the conditions of self-consciousness. By 
reflecting on the object, and distinguishing from it 
the mode of acting whereby it arises, this mode of 
acting becomes — since the object appears, as we 
have shown, as not the product of the free Ego — a 
mere comprehending, a mere taking hold of a given 
object. Hence, also, this mode of acting, whenever 
it occurs in the (described) abstraction, is called a 
coinp7'chension, or a conception.* 

Only through a certain determined mode of act- 
ing does a certain determined object arise in us ; 
but if this acting is necessary, then also this object 
surely arises. The conception (or comprehension) 
and its object are, therefore, never separated ; nor 
can they be separated. The object is not without 
the comprehension, for it is through the compre- 
hension ; and the comprehension is not without the 
object, for it is that through which the object neces- 

* A reader — who in his joy at having finally found a well-known 
word, should hurry to transfer to it all that he may heretofore have 
thought as characterized by this word, conception — would soon be 
utterly confused, and unable to understand any thing further ; and 
this by his own fault. The word conception is here used to desig- 
nate neither more nor less than I have described, no matter what 
the reader may have heretofore understood it as designating. I do 
not appeal to a conception already in him, but wish to develop one 
in his mind. 



INTRODUCTION. 



13 



sarily arises. Both arc one and the same, viewed 
from different sides. If you view the act of the 
Ego as such, that is, in its form, then it is com- 
prehension ; but if you view the content of the 
act, the what is done — abstracting from the that 
is done — then it is an object. When one hears 
some Kantians speak about a priori conceptions, 
one would bcHeve that they existed in the human 
mind in advance of all experience, like empty rows 
of shelves, waiting to have something put on them. 
What can such people take a conception to be, and 
what can have induced them to accept Kant's doc- 
trines thus interpreted } 

We have said that, in advance of tJiat wJiich arises 
throtigh an acting, the acting itself and the deter- 
mined mode of acting can not be perceived. 
Hence, for the common man, and upon the stand- 
point of common consciousness, there are only 
objects and no conceptions ; the comprehension 
vanishes in the object, and becomes one with it. 
The philosophical genius, that is, the talent to find 
in and during the acting not only that which arises 
in it, but also the acting itself, as such, and to unite 
these utterly opposite directions in one comprehen- 
sion, thus to catch one's own mind in the act, as it 
were ; this talent first discovered the conception in 
the object, and it was thus that a new field was 
added to the sphere of consciousness. 

Those men of philosophical mind made known 
their discoveries. Nothing is easier than to pro- 
duce with freedom, and under no necessity of think- 



14 



INTROD UCTION. 



ing, every possible determination in our minds, and 
to cause our mind arbitrarily to act in every possi- 
ble manner ; but nothing is more difficult than to 
observe that mind as acting in real, that is, in 
necessary acting. The former mode of proceeding 
gives us conceptions without objects, or an empty 
thinking ; and only in the second manner does the 
philosopher become the observer of an actual think- 
ing of his .mind.* The former is an arbitrary re- 
petition of the original modes of Reason's acting, 
after the necessity, which gave them significance 
and reality, has passed away ; the latter alone is 
the true observation of reason in its modes of pro- 
ceeding. From the former arises an empty, f ormu- 
lar-p kilos op hy, which considers itself as having 

* The formular-philosopher thinks this or that, observes himself 
in this thinking, and then places the whole series of thoughts, 
which occurred to him, before the public as truth, and this simply 
because he could think them. The ohjeci of his observation is him- 
self, in his free productions, which he either undertakes without any 
clear direction, as chance may determine, or with a direction given 
him externally. But the true philosopher has to observe Reason in 
its orightal and necessary procedure, by which his Ego, with every 
thing which exists for it, has first derived Being. But since he can 
no longer find this originally acting Ego in empirical consciousness, 
he, by the only act of arbitrariness which is permitted to him, 
namely, by the free resolve to philosophize, places that Ego back 
at its first starting-point, and then causes it to describe all its act- 
ing from that point after its own Liws, which to the philosopher 
are well-known. Hence, the object of his observation is general 
Reason itself, following its own laws of development, and having 
no external object in view. The former observes an individual, 
(his own,) lawless thinking ; the other, Reason itself, in its neces- 
sary acting. 



INTRODUCTION. 



15 



done enough when it has proved that one may think 
any thing without being anxious concerning the 
object, that is, concerning the conditions of the 
necessity of this thinking. A real philosophy po- 
sits conception and object together, and never 
treats one without the other. To introduce such 
a real philosophy, and to abolish all merely formal 
philosophy, was the object of Kant's writings. I 
can not say whether this his object has as yet been 
observed by but one philosophical author. But I 
can say this, that the misunderstanding of that sys- 
tem has shown itself in a two-fold manner : firstly, 
through the so-called Kantians in this, that they 
also conceived Kant's system to be such an empty 
formular-philosophy, and held the difference to be 
only that it was the former one reversed ; and 
hence they continued to philosophize in the same 
empty manner, as had always been done before — 
lonly from an opposite side ; and secondly, through 
some sharp-sighted skeptics, who saw clearly enough 
where philosophy was at fault, but who did not see 
that Kant had remedied this fault. Mere formal 
thinking has been indescribably injurious in philo- 
sophy, in mathematics,* in the natural Sciences, and 
indeed in all pure Sciences. 

* In mathematics this is shown, particularly in the abuse of 
algebra by mere formal minds. Thus, to cite an example, it has 
not yet been rightly comprehended that it is impossible to square 
a circle, and that this is contradictory to the conception of a circle. 
A critic has asked me, " Whether the squaring of the circle is im- 
possible because straightttess and crookedness have nothing in com- 
mon ?" He thinks he has been very smart in having asked this 



i6 



INTRODUCTION. 



II. 

WHAT THE PROBLEM OF THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS, 
AS A REAL PHILOSOPHICAL SCIENCE, WILL BE. 

To say, therefore, a certain determined concep- 
tion is originally contained through and in Reason, 

question, looks around, laughs, and leaves me to sink under my 
disgrace. But I look at him and laugh at his question. " Most 
truly, such is my serious opinion, dear sir !" " Attsarn philosophies 
11071 habes P says he pityingly ; and I reply, " Your great wisdom 
has run away with your common sense. Knowledge on this point, 
my dear sir, I do not lack exactly ; but understanding of it — most 
sorely. When I was still at college, I heard often enough that the 
circumference is equal to a polygon of an infinite number of sides, 
and that we can square the circle when we get the content of that 
content. But I never could understand it. And I hope to God 
that I shall never understand how it is possible to measure that 
content. For what is the conception of an Infinite ? I suppose 
that of 2. problem, to divide infinitely the side of the polygon ; and 
hence the problem of an ijtfitiite determining ? But what, then, is a 
measure, for which you want to use the infinitely-sided polygon? 
I suppose a determined something. Now, if you keep on dividing 
ad infinitum, as the problem requires you, you will never get to 
measuring it. But if you proceed to measure it, you must first 
stop dividing, and then your polygon is finite, and not, as you have 
posited it, infinite. — But because you can take hold of your manner 
of acting in describing an Infinite, that is, because you can seize 
the empty comprehension of the Infinite, and designate it, for in- 
stance, as A, you now pay no further attention, to whether you have 
really accomplished the act — no, not even to whether you can ac- 
complish it ; you take your A calmly and proceed to business. 
Common sense looks at your doings admiringly, and cheerfully con- 
fesses it its own fault that it does not understand you ; but when 
some one who is not so modest takes it upon himself merely to 
utter his opinion on the subject, you can not explain his inability to 
understand a matter which to you seems so very clear, except on 
the presumption that the poor man has not gone through the rudi- 
ments of the Sciences." 



INTROD UCTION. 



can only signify : a rational being, as sure as it is 
such, acts in a determined manner. The philoso- 
pher has to show of this determined act, first, that 
it is a condition of self-consciousness, and this fur- 
nishes the deduction thereof; but he has also to 
describe this determined act as well in regard, 
secondly, to its form, to tlie manner of acting in it, 
as, thirdly, in regard to its content, to that which 
arises in this act for the reflection. He thus fur- 
nishes at the same time the proof of the necessity 
of this conception, determines it, and shows its 
application. None of these parts can be separated 
from the others, without wrongly treating even 
these separates, and without falling into formal 
philosophy. The conception of Rights is assumed 
to be an original conception of Reason ; it must, 
therefore, be treated in the above manner. 

1. Now, in regard to this conception of Rights, 
it results — as we shall hereafter show in its deduc- 
tion — that this conception becomes a necessary 
condition of self-consciousness, because a rational 
being can not self-consciously posit itself as such, 
without positing itself as an individual, or as one 
of many rational beings, which many it assumes 
outside of it by assuming itself. 

2. What the manner of acting in the positing of 
the conception of Rights is, can be even sensuously 
represented. I posit myself as rational, that is, as 
free. In doing so I have the representation of 
freedom. In the same undivided act I posit other 
free beings. Hence, I describe through my power 



i8 



INTRO D UCTION: 



of imagination a sphere of freedom, which these 
many separate beings divide amongst themselves. 
I do not ascribe to myself all the freedom which I 
have posited, because I must also posit other free 
beings, and must ascribe part of it to them. Thus, 
in appropriating freedom to myself, I at the same 
time restrict myself, by leaving freedom to others. 
The conception of Rights is, therefore, the concep- 
tion of the necessary relation of free beings to each 
other. 

3. Finally, as regards the content of the concep- 
tion of Rights. The conception of freedom in- 
volves originally only the power, through absolute 
spontaneity, to form conceptions of our possible 
causality ; and it is only this power which rational 
beings necessarily ascribe to each other. But that 
a rational individual, or a person, should find him- 
self to be free requires something more, namely, that 
a result in the external world should follow the 
thinking of his activity, or that he should perceive 
the effect of his free causality. 

Now, if the causalities of rational beings should 
work upon the same world, and should thus be able 
to influence, check, and oppose each other, as is 
indeed the case, then freedom — in the latter signifi- 
cation of the word — would be possible for persons 
who stand under this reciprocal influence, only on 
condition that all of them restrict their cau.sality 
within certain limits, and divide the world, as it 
were, amongst them. But since they are pos.ited 
as free, such a limit to their freedom could not lie 



introduction: 



19 



beyond freedom — since then the limit would camels 
but not restrict it as freedom ; but must rather be 
freely posited by all ; in other words, all must have 
made it their rule, not to disturb the freedom of 
those with whom they are placed under reciprocal 
influence. 

And thus we have the wJwle object of the con- 
ception of Rights, namely, a coinimmity between 
free Beings as such. It is necessary that every free 
being should assume other free beings as exist- 
ing ; but it is not necessary that all these free be- 
ings, as free beings, should coexist together ; the 
thought of such a community and its realization 
are, therefore, altogether arbitrary. But when it is 
thought, through what conception or determined 
mode of acting is it thought ? It appears that it is 
possible in thought to have every member of this 
community so restrict his own external freedom 
through inner freedom as to make it possible that 
all other members shall also be free. Now, this is 
the conception of Rights. — If this conception is 
thought as a practical conception — because the 
thought as well as the realization of such a commu- 
nity is arbitrary — then it is purely of a technical- 
practical character ; that is to say, the conception 
of Rights does not demand that such a community 
be erected, but merely demands that, if it be erect- 
ed, it shall be established on the basis of the con- 
ception of Rights. 

In all this our representation of the conception 
of Rights we have refrained from expressly refut- 



20 



TN-TROD UCTION. 



ing those who attempt to deduce the conception of 
Rights from the Moral Law, because, as soon as the 
true deduction of that conception has been estab- 
lished, every impartial mind will accept it as the 
true one without demanding that the incorrectness 
of other deductions be shown up. But for parti- 
sans and narrow-minded disputants, it would be 
lost time to write. The rule of law. Restrict your 
freedom through the conception of the freedom of 
all other persons with whom you come in contact ! 
receives, it is true, a new sanction for conscience 
through the Moral Law ; but the deduction of this 
sanction forms a part of the Science of Morality, 
and does not belong to the Science of Rights. It 
might be said that many learned men, who have 
written systems of natural law, have treated in 
them without knowing it that very part of the 
Science of Morality, had they not forgotten to state 
why obedience to the Moral Law always conditions 
absolute inner harmony of the rational Being. In- 
deed, most teachers of morality seem not to have 
considered that the Moral Law is purely formal, 
and hence empty ; and that a content for it must 
not be surreptitiously obtained elsewhere, but must 
be thoroughly deduced. We can state at once how 
the matter stands in our case. I must necessarily 
think myself in contact with the men nature has 
placed me amongst, but this I can not do without 
thinking my freedom as restricted by their freedom, 
and hence I must act in accordance with this neces- 



INTROD UCTION. 



21 



sary thinking, or my thinking and my acting* are 
in contradiction, and I am not in that absolute har- 
mony with myself which constitutes morality. I 
am, therefore, bound in conscience, through my 
knowledge of what s/ia// be, to restrict my freedom ; 
or, in other words, morally bound to respect the 
conception of Rights. Now, it is this moral aspect 
of the question which belongs to the Science of 
Morality, and not to the Science of Rights ; in the 
latter science men are bound only by their arbi- 
trary resolution to live in community with others ; 
and if any one is not willing to restrict his arbitra- 
riness at all, the Science of Rights has nothing to 
say to him other than this : that he must, in that 
case, remove from all human society. 

In the present work the conception of Rights, as 
the condition of self-consciousness, is deduced at 
the same time with its object ; it is derived, deter- 
mined, and secured in its application, as should be 
done by a real science. This has been done in the 
first, second, and third books of our science. It is 
then further determined in the second part, and the 
manner stated, in which it must be realized in the 
sensuous world. 

* I have read somewhere that the fundamental principle of the 
Science of Morality is, that " The manifold acts of the free will 
should be in harmony." This is a very unfortunate application of 
my statem;nt of the absolute self-harmony of rational beings in my 
Lectures o?t the Vocation of the Scholar. For if it were correct, a man 
might merely resolve to be a very thorough and consequent rascal 
— in which case all the acts of his free will would perfectly agree, 
being, all of them, opposed to the condition of what shall be ; and 
he would have done enough to satisfy such a morality. 



22 



INTRODUCTION. 



III. 

CONCERNING THE RELATION OF THE PRESENT THE- 
ORY OF RIGHTS TO KANt's SCIENCE. 

With the exception of some excellent sugges- 
tions in recent writings by Mr. Ehrhardt and Mr. 
Maimon, the writer of this had discovered no trace 
of a distrust in the manner in which the Science of 
Rights had been heretofore treated, until — after 
the completion of the present work — he was most 
agreeably surprised by Kant's important work, A 
Perennial Peace. 

A comparison of Kant's doctrines of Rights, as 
they appear from that work, and the principles of 
the present science may not be disagreeable to 
many readers. 

It can not be clearly seen from Kant's work, 
whether he deduces the conception of Rights, ac- 
cording to the usual method, from Morality, or whe- 
ther he assumes another deduction. But some re- 
marks (page 15) concerning the conception of a 
Law of Permission make it very probable that his 
deduction agrees with our own. 

A Right is evidently something which one may 
use or not use, and is, therefore, the result of a 
pure Law of Permission ; of a law which simply 
allows you rights, leaving you at liberty to use them 
or not as you please — a law, moreover, which, being 
restricted to a certain sphere, permits the conclu- 
sion, that beyond that sphere each one is left to his 
own free will. This permission does not lie ex- 



INTRODUCTION. 



23 



pressly in the law, but is merely argued from the 
limitedness of the law. The limitcdness of a law 
shows itself in this, that it is a conditioned law. 
Now, it is absolutely not comprehensible how from 
the unconditionally commanding and thus universal 
Law of Morality it were possible to derive a Law 
of Permission. 

Kant's assertions that the state of peace or of 
law amongst men is not a condition of nature, but 
of art ; and that we have the right to compel per- 
sons, though they have not attacked us, to submit 
to the supremacy of government as the only secu- 
rity against future possible attacks from them ; 
agree wholly with our science, and are deduced in 
our science in the same manner as in Kant's 
work. 

Our science also agrees with Kant's work in its 
deduction of the principle, that a state government 
can be erected only on the basis of an original but 
necessary compact ; and, furthermore, of the prin- 
ciple, that the people must not themselves exercise 
the executive power, but confer it, and that hence 
a Democracy, in the pure significance of the word, 
is an utterly unlawful form of government. 

But I differ with Kant in his statement, that the 
division of legislative and executive power is suffi- 
cient to secure the maintenance of rights in a state. 
The chief points which I hold on this subject, and 
which are developed at length in the present work, 
I shall here state as concisely as possible. 

The conception of Rights involves that when 



24 



introduction: 



men are to live in a community, eacli must so re- 
strict his freedom as to permit tlie coexistence of 
the freedom of all others. But it does not involve 
that this particular person, A, is to restrict his free- 
dom by the freedom of those particular persons, 
B, C, and D. That it has happened so that I, A, 
must conform myself particularly to the freedom of 
these, B, C, and D, of all other men, is purely the 
result of my living together with them ; and I so 
live with them, simply by my free-will, not because 
there is an obligation for me to do so. Thus it 
is originally within the free-will of every citizen, 
whether he chooses to live in this particular state 
or not — though he must Hve in some state, if he 
wants to live at all with other men. Now, as soon 
as he expresses the resolve to enter a particular 
state, and is accepted as a member of it, then he is, 
by this simple, natural declaration, subjected to all 
the restrictions which law prescribes for that state. 
By his mere statement, I will live in this state, he 
has adopted all its laws. The laws of the state 
become formally his laws by his resolve to live in 
the state ; but, materially, they have been deter- 
mined without his consent by the conception of 
Rights and the position of the state. Again, the 
law, Restrict your freedom by the freedom of all 
others, is a purely formal law, and as such not capa- 
ble of application. For how far is the sphere to 
extend, within which no one may hurt him, but be- 
yond which he may also not go, without being re- 
garded as a disturber of the freedom of others 



LVTRODUCTIOI/. 



25 



This the parties must arrange amongst themselves. 
Applying this to the state : each one, on entering 
the state, must arrange with the state what is to be 
his particular sphere of free activity, (his property 
and his civil rights.) When he has so arranged, by 
what has his sphere been determined ? Evidently, 
by his own free resolve ; for without it he would 
have had as much right to what the others possess 
as they have themselves. But how is it determined, 
how much can be allowed to each individual ? 
Clearly, by the common will in accordance with the 
rule : This number of men are to be free in this 
particular sphere of general freedom, hence, each 
one has as his share so much. 

Now, within these self-imposed restrictions, the 
citizens must be kept by force, and a certain threat 
of punishment, should they transgress them, must 
keep them from such transgressions. It is also 
clear that this punishment must be known to them 
if it is to affect their wills ; that they must have 
consented to receive such punishment for a trans- 
gression of their sphere of freedom upon entering 
the state. (In other words, no ex post facto laws are 
admitted.) 

But who is to proclaim the common will, thus de- 
termined in all respects, regarding the rights of the 
individual citizen as well as regarding the punish- 
ment to be inflicted upon their transgression ? Who 
is to interpret this necessary arrangement and 
agreement ? The masses themselves would be the 
most improper body for it, and by counting together 



26 



INTRODUCTION. 



the expressed wills of the individuals, the true com- 
mon will could scarcely be obtained in its purity. 

This business can only belong to him who con- 
tinually overlooks the whole community and its 
requirements, and who is responsible for the 
continuous supreme rule of the law : to the ad- 
ministrator of the executive power. He pro- 
claims the matter of the law, as given in the con- 
ception of Rights and in the geographical position 
of the state ; which matter receives its form, that is, 
its binding power over each individual, only by that 
individual's consent, that is, his consent to remain 
in the state, but not expressly his consent to any 
particular law. 

From these reasons we, in our theory, have 
asserted, that in civil law the legislative and the 
executive powers are inseparable, and not to be 
divided. Indeed, civil legislation is itself a branch 
of the executive, if the law is really to be executed. 
The administrator of the executive power is the 
natural interpreter of the common will, announcing 
the relations of the individuals to each other in the 
state ; not exactly of the will which they actually 
aave, but of the will which they must have, to make 
.heir coexistence in a community possible. 

Of quite a different nature is the law concerning 
the manner in which the laws are to be executed, 
or the constitution. The constitution must be 
adopted by the vote of every citizen, and can be 
adopted only by unanimity ; since it is the guaran- 
tee which each one has given him by all others for 



introduction: 



27 



the security of all his rights in the community. The 
essential component of every constitution is the 
ephorate, explained in our work. Whether this is 
sufificient to secure the rights of all — without the 
separation of the legislative and executive powers, 
which to me seems inadmissible, I must leave to 
the judgment of more competent mca. 



c 



First Pakt of the Science of Rights. 



•pART J^IRST. 



DEDUCTION 

OF THE 

CONCEPTION OF RIGHTS. 



§ I- 

A FINITE, RATIONAL BEING CAN NOT POSIT ITSELF 
WITHOUT ASCRIBING TO ITSELF A FREE CAUS- 
ALITY. 

PROOF. 

A. If a rational being is to posit itself as stick, it 
must ascribe to itself an activity which shall have 
its last ground in itself. 

An in itself returning activity (Egohood, subjec- 
tivity) is character of the rational being. The posit- 
ing of itself (reflecting about itself) is an. act of this 
activity. Let this reflection be called A. The 
rational being posits itself through the act of such 
an activity. All reflection reflects something as its 
object ; let this object be called B. Now, what sort 
of a something must this object be as object of the 
reflection A In A the rational being is to posit 
itself, is to be its own object ; but its character is 
in itself returning activity. The last highest object 
(B) of its reflection must therefore also be in itself 
returning, or itself determining activity, since other- 
wise it would not posit itself as a rational being, 
and hence would not posit itself at all. 

This assumed rational being is a finite being ; but 



32 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



a finite rational being is one which can irflcct only 
upon a Limited. Hence, tlie in itself returning ac- 
tivity B, must be a limited activity, that is, beyond 
this activity B there must be, and must be posited 
by the reflecting, a C, wh'ch is not this in itself 
returning activity, but rather its opposite. 

B. Its activity in contemplating the world can not 
be posited by the rational being as sncJi an activity, 
which has its last ground in itself : 

For this contemplating activity is posited by its 
very conception as an activity which does not re- 
turn into the Contemplating, but rather has an ex- 
ternality, an opposite of the Contemplating, a World 
for its object. 

(After the contemplation, the activity in this con- 
templating may certainly also be ascribed by the ra- 
tional being to itself, or raised into its consciousness ; 
that is, the rational being may posit itself as the Con- 
templating. Nay, from the stand-point of tran- 
scendental philosophy, it appears quite clearly that 
even this Contemplating is nothing but an in itself 
returning Ego, and that the World is nothing but 
the Ego contemplated in its original limits. But if 
the Ego is to ascribe that activity in the contem- 
plation of the world to itself, it must already have 
existence ; and, at present, the question is only, how 
the Ego can originally be for itself, and this we 
can not explain from the world-contemplation, since, 
on the contrary, the latter becomes possible only 
through the former, which we are in search of) 

C. But the rational being can opposit such an ac- 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



33 



tivity as ivc arc in search of, to the world, as that 
which limits this activity, and in order to opposit it 
can generate it. Moreover, if such an activity is the 
sole condition of the possibility of self consciousness, 
and if self consciousness must be ascribed to a ra- 
tional being, as indeed that which constitutes it a ra- 
tional being, tJien it must opposit and generate such 
an activity. 

The activity of the rational being, in contem- 
plating the world, which must be known to the 
philosopher, when his speculation has advanced to 
the Science of Rights, but which may not yet be 
known to the rational being, about which he philo- 
sophizes, is necessitated and bound, if not in regard 
to its form, that is, that it occurs at all, at least in 
regard to its content ; that is, that, if it occurs, it 
must occur in such or such a manner. We must 
represent objects as they are — in our belief — without 
our cooperation ; our representation must be de- 
termined by their being. An activity opposed to 
this activity would therefore, in order to be its op- 
posite, have to be free in regard to its content ; or, 
there must be in it a possibility of acting thus or 
otherwise. 

Again, this free activity is to be limited by the 
activity in contemplating the world ; that is, the ac- 
tivity in the world-contemplation is itself that free 
activity, but in, a state of limitedness ; and vice versa, 
the free activity is the activity in the world-con- 
templation, whenever that limitedness falls away. 
In other words, objects are objects merely in so 



34 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



far as and through this, that they do not exist 
through free activity ; and this free activity must 
be checked and Hmited, if objects are to be. For 
free activity tends to cancel these objects, in so 
far as they bind it. Hence, free activity is catisality 
upon the objects, and contemplation is cancelled 
causality, causality voluntarily renounced by the 
rational being itself 

We have now described what the activity B is 
in its relation to the world-contemplation, and to 
the world itself But it is also to be a return of the 
rational being into itself, and in so far as it is di- 
rected upon objects, it is not this. Hence, when 
related to the rational being itself, it must be a free 
determining of itself to have causality. Only in so 
far as this activity is directed upon objects, is it de- 
termined in its content. But originally, and in its 
essence, it must not be so determined. Hence, it 
must be determined through itself — must be de- 
termined and determining at the same time, and is, 
therefore, most truly, an in itself returning activity. 

What we have just said may be systematically 
expressed thus : The activity B, which we were in 
search of, must \>z posited as an opposite to the con- 
templation, and is, in so far, absolutely free, pre- 
cisely because that contemplating activity is not 
free ; this activity B, moreover, is directed upon 
the rational being, or, which means the same, returns 
into itself, precisely because the contemplating ac- 
tivity is directed upon something external to the 
rational being ; and in so far this activity B is the 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



35 



creating oi the conception of an intentional causality 
outside of us, or of the conception of an end, (object.) 
At the same time, this activity B must be related 
to the contemplation, that is, posited as equal to it ; 
and in this relation it is a causality directed upon 
objects. But it is to be carefully remembered that 
this causality upon objects follows immediately from 
that conception of an end, and is the very same, 
only viewed from another point of view. 

By means of such an activity B the required 
self-consciousness becomes possible. B is some- 
thing which has its last ground in the rational being 
itself, and can, as such, be posited only by means of 
the possible opposition of a something which has 
not its ground in the rational being. The Ego (the 
rational being itself as such) is thus now limited 
and determined, and hence, can be taken hold of by 
reflection ; that is to say, the practical Ego is the 
Ego for the reflection ; the reflection takes hold of 
this practical Ego, which is posited through itself, 
and which, in the reflection, must be posited as 
through itself; and of this Ego, as logical subject, 
a possible predicate may assert something, as, for 
instance, in our case — the contemplation of the 
world. 

It is only by means of such an activity that self- 
consciousness becomes possible ; for our result in- 
volves only the characteristics, which, at the com- 



36 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



mencemcnt, we showed to be the conditions of self- 
consciousness ; namely, first, the existence of such 
an in itself returning activity, or of an activity which 
should have its last ground in the rational being 
itself ; secondly, the finity and limitedness of this 
activity ; and thirdly, the being posited of this ac- 
tivity in opposition and relation to the limiting ; as 
which it is posited indeed by merely being reflected 
about. 

Hence, such an activity, and the positing thereof, 
is necessarily assumed when self-consciousness is as- 
sumed ; and both conceptions are identical. 



COROLLARIA. 

I. It is here maintained, that the practical Ego 
is the Ego of original self-consciousness ; that a 
rational being perceives itself immediately only in 
Willing, and that it would not perceive itself, and 
hence would also not perceive tue world, and that it 
would therefore not be Intelligence, if it were not a 
practical being. Willing is the real essential cha- 
racter of reason ; and representation — although in 
the insight of the philosopher it stands in recipro- 
cal causality with willing — is posited as the acciden- 
tal. The practical faculty is the inmost root of the 
Ego ; to it every thing else is attached, and with it 
connected. 

All other attempts to deduce the Ego in self-con- 
sciousness have failed, because they must always 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



37 



presuppose what they wish to deduce ; and we here 
see why they must fail. How was it indeed possi- 
ble to assume, that the Ego arises through the con- 
nection of many representations, in none of which 
the Ego is contained ? that an Ego is produced by 
the mere connection ? On the contrary, only after 
the Ego is, can any thing be connected in it. The 
Ego must, therefore, exist * — of course for the Ego 
— in advance of all connection. 

2. Willing and Representing are, therefore, in 
continual and necessary reciprocal causality, and 
neither is possible unless the other is at the same 
time. The first assertion, that willing is not possi- 
ble without representing, will be admitted without 
much trouble : I must represent what I will. The 
other, that every representing is conditioned by a 
willing, may, however, meet difficulties. But a rep- 
resentation can not be without a Representing sub- 
ject, and can not be posited in consciousness unless 
this representing subject is posited. This repre- 

* The Ego, whicJi is to reflect, or which is to determine itself to 
have causality, or zvhich is to contemplate the world, is the prior — 
of course, for the philosophizing Ego, which, however, let us hope, 
is also an Ego, and follows the laws of its being — by virtue of those 
very laws ; and it is this prior Ego, of which the first fundamental 
principle of the Science of Knowledge speaks. 

Now another Ego is to be object for this reflecting Ego ; that is, 
this Ego is to be object for itself. How is this possible ? Such is 
the question we are here answering. 

Attentive readers must pardon this note. It is not for them, but 
for the careless and superficial readers, who need such a reminder ; 
and these are requested to recall it to mind whenever they need it 
hereafter. 



38 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



senting subject is — not accidentalitcr, in so far as it 
now represents, but siibstantialiter, in so far as it is 
at all, and as it is a somewhat — either a really Will- 
ing, or, at least, a something, which is posited and 
characterized through its ability to will. Not In- 
telligence alone constitutes a rational being, for it 
alone is not possible ; nor does the practical activity 
alone constitute a rational being, for it also is not 
possible alone ; it is only both united which com- 
plete it and make it a Whole. 

3. It is through this reciprocal causality between 
the Contemplation and Willing of the Ego, that the 
Ego and every thing which is for the Ego, that is, 
every thing which is at all, first becomes possible. 

First of all, the Ego itself It might be said, that 
a reciprocal causality between the Contemplation 
and the Willing of the Ego must precede the possi- 
bility of the Ego itself ; that there must be some- 
thing in the Ego, which stands in reciprocal causal- 
ity, before the Ego is itself ; and that this is a con- 
tradiction. But here lies the very deception which 
we wish to remove. Contemplation and Willing 
neither precede nor follow the Ego, but are the 
Ego ; occur only in so far as the Ego posits itself ; 
occur only in this positing and through this positing 
of its occurrence ; and it is nonsense to think of 
any occurrence outside of and independent of this 
positing. Vice versa, the Ego posits itself in so far 
as both occur and in so far as it posits the occur- 
rence of both ; and it is equally nonsense to think 
of any other positing of the Ego. It is, at any 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



39 



rate, very iinphilosophical to believe, that the Ego 
is something else than both its deed and product at 
once. Usually, however, as soon as we hear the 
Ego spoken of as an active, we hasten to picture a 
substrate, of which we proclaim this activity to be 
mere power or faculty. This substrate, however, is 
not the Ego, but is a product of our own imagination, 
which we sketch in consequence of the demand made 
upon us to think the Ego. The Ego is not some- 
thing, ivhich has powers ; it is no power at all ; but 
it is simply Actitig ; it is what it acts, and when it 
does not act, it is not at all. 

It has been asked : How does the Representing 
subject arrive at the conviction that there exists an 
object of its representation outside of it, and that 
this object is determined precisely as it represents 
it If those who asked this question had but con- 
sidered what it really meant, they would themselves 
have arrived at the correct conception. 

The Ego itself, through its acting, makes the ob- 
ject ; the form of its acting is itself the object, and 
no other object is to be thought of. That, the man- 
ner of acting whereof necessarily becomes an object, 
is an Ego ; and the Ego is nothing but that, the 
mere manner of acting whereof becomes an object. 
If it acts with its whole power — I must use this 
expression if but to express myself — then it is ob- 
ject to itself; but if it acts only with part of its 
power, then it acts upon something which is exter- 
nal, or upon an object. 

To grasp itself in this identity of acting and be- 



40 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



ing acted upon — not in the acting, nor in the being 
acted upon, but in the identity of both ; and to sur- 
prise itself as it were in this act of grasping itself, 
is to comprehend the pure Ego and to get posses- 
sion of the stand-point of all transcendental philoso- 
phy. This talent seems to be altogether deficient 
in some men. He who can only view each apart 
and separate, and who, though he takes the greatest 
pains, always grasps either the active or the object 
of the activity, obtains through both in their sepa- 
ration utterly distinct results, which can only be 
seemingly united, because they have not been so 
united from the beginning. 

§ 2. 

THROUGH THIS POSITING OF ITS POWER TO HAVE 
FREE CAUSALITY, THE RATIONAL BEING POSITS 
AND DETERMINES A SENSUOUS WORLD OUTSIDE 
OF ITSELF. 

A. It posits this external sensuous world. Only 
the absolutely self-active, or practical, is posited as 
subjective, as belonging to the Ego, and by its 
limitation the Ego is limited. Whatsoever lies 
beyond this sphere of the absolutely self-active, is 
posited, for the very reason that it lies beyond it, as 
not produced nor producible through the activity of 
the Ego ; hence, it is excluded from the sphere of 
the Ego, and the Ego is excluded from its sphere; 
and thus there arises a system of objects, that is, a 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



41 



world, which exists independently of the Ego, that is 
to say, of the practical Ego, which here stands for 
the Ego generally, and independently of which 
world tlie Ego (also, of course, the practical Ego, 
which determines its ends) exists likewise ; both of 
which, therefore, exist independently and externally 
of each other, and have both their separate ex- 
istences. 

COROLLARIA. 

I. The transcendental philosopher must assume 
that every thing which is, is only for an Ego ; and 
whatsoever is for an Ego, can only be through the 
Ego. But common sense, on the contrary, claims 
an independent existence for both ; and maintains 
that the world would be, though it (common sense) 
were not. The latter has no need to take cog- 
nizance of the assertion of the philosopher, and can 
not do so, for it stands on a lower stand-point ; but 
the former must certainly take cognizance of com- 
mon sense ; and his assertions are indefinite, and 
hence, in part, incorrect, until he has shown how, 
front these very assertions, the precise results of com- 
mon sense follow, and how they can indeed only be 
explained by those assertions. Philosophy must de- 
duce our conviction of the existence of a world. 

Now, this has been done here from the possibility 
of self-consciousness ; and that conviction has been 
shown up as a condition of this self-consciousness. 
The Ego must posit an external world, because it 



42 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



can posit itself in self-consciousness only as prac- 
tical activity ; and because, since it can not posit 
any thing but a limited, it must posit a limit to 
this, its practical activity. This is the original pro- 
cedure of every rational being, and is, doubtless, 
also the procedure of the philosopher. 

Now, although the philosopher immediately after- 
ward sees that the rational being must first posit 
its suppressed practical activity before it can posit 
and determine the object, and that thus the object 
itself is not immediately given, but is originally pro- 
duced only by virtue of another — this need not dis- 
turb common sense ; for it can not become con- 
scious of the just now postulated process, since that 
process conditions the possibility of all conscious- 
ness, and is therefore beyond its sphere ; it even 
does not disturb the philosopher as soon as he gets 
to the sphere of common sense. 

It might be asked, What reality shall be ascribed 
to those acts which lie beyond the sphere of con- 
sciousness, and are not posited in consciousness, if 
reality is properly ascribed only to that which is 
necessarily posited by the Ego Of course, no re- 
ality, except in so far as it is thus necessarily posited. 
Those acts beyond common consciousness have re- 
ality, therefore, only for the philosopher who posits 
them, //"the activities of the human mind are to 
be systematically united in an ultimate ground, then 
this and that must be assumed as necessary acts ; 
such, and nothing more, is what the philosopher 
asserts. Those original deed-acts have the same 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



43 



reality which the causality of things upon eac h other 
in the sensuous world, and their universal recipro- 
cal relation, claim to have. For those primitive 
peoples, of which we still have memorials, who little 
united their experiences, but rather allowed their 
observations to lie scattered and separate in their 
consciousness, no such causality or universal rela- 
tion of things had existence. They gave sepa- 
rate life to almost every object of the sensuous world, 
and thus made those objects first free causes, as 
they were themselves. The universal connection 
we speak of, had not only no reality for them, it even 
did not exist for them. But the man who connects 
his experiences into unity — and this problem lies 
in the way of the synthetically progressive human 
reason, and had to be taken up sooner or later — 
must necessarily connect in such a determined 
manner ; and for him the whole connection thus 
obtained has reality. Moreover, as soon as this 
problem had been taken up and solved, and as hu- 
man reason had once again returned into itself — as 
it did for the first time with clear consciousness, and 
completely, in one of its sublimest representatives, 
Kant — and had thus discovered, that all its seem- 
ing external perceptions were, after all, produced 
by itself ; the following additional problem proposed 
itself to the still synthetically progressive reason : 
namely, to unite all these, its modes of acting, also in 
an ultimate ground ; and this proceeding had reality 
from the same ground which gave reality to the 
category of causality, of a universal connection of 

D 



44 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



objects, etc. etc. This final problem for the syn- 
thetical faculty, moreover, after the solution of which 
mankind returns forever again to analysis, which 
analysis has thus, however, received quite a different 
significance — had also to be solved sooner or later ; 
and all we might wish is this, that those persons 
who are not called by their talents to take part in 
this branch of science, would also take no notice of 
it, would leave, as has been heretofore customary, 
philosophy to the philosophers, and would not be 
so foolish in their anxiety for the reality of the re- 
sults of that science, as to demand that we ought to 
give to those results the same kind of reality which 
alone is known to them. To say, " A pure Ego and 
its acts have no reality prior to consciousness," is as 
foolish as if a savage were to say, " Your causality 
and your reciprocal connection have no reality, be- 
cause I can not eat them." 

2. From the deduction of our conviction of the 
existence of a sensuous world, it results at the same 
time, how far this conviction extends, and in what 
condition of mind it occurs : for no grounded goes 
further than the ground, and as soon as we know 
the ground of a certain mode of thinking we also 
know its extent. It extends so far as our practical 
faculty is distinguished from and opposed to the 
theoretical faculty ; so far as our representation of 
the influence of things upon us and of our reaction 
upon them extends, since only by this representa- 
tion is our practical faculty posited as limited. This 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



45 



is the reason why philosophers have always proved 
the reality of an external world by its influence upon 
us ; a proof which certainly presupposes what it 
would prove, but which pleases common sense, be- 
cause it is the same proof common sense makes use 
of for itself. I 

But how does the speculative philosopher pro- 
ceed in order to remove this conviction for some 
time, so that he may investigate beyond its range ? 
Evidently by not drawing the distinction which con- 
ditions this conviction. As soon as we look merely 
at the activity in the representation and seek only 
to explain it, a necessary doubt regarding the exist- 
ence of external things will arise. The transcenden- 
tal idealist comprehends the practical and theoretical 
activity at the same time as activity generally ; and 
hence — there being now no passivity in the Ego, as, 
indeed, there can not be — he arrives at the result, 
that the whole system of objects must be produced 
for the Ego by the Ego itself But for the very 
reason that he has thus comprehended both activi- 
ties, he can also, at the proper time, distinguish 
both, and show up the stand-point which common 
sense must necessarily occupy. The dogmatic 
idealist excludes the practical activity wholly from 
his investigations, looks only at the theoretical ac- 
tivity, which he desires to ground through itself; 
and hence he naturally makes the theoretical activ- 
ity unconditioned. 

But these speculations are possible for both sorts 
of philosophers only so long as they remain in the 



46 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



solitude of thinking ; as soon as their practical ac- 
tivity is excited, both immediately forget their spec- 
ulative convictions and return to the ordinary hu- 
man view of things, simply because they must. 
There never has been an idealist who extended his 
doubts or his certitude to his actions, and there 
never will be one ; for if he did, he could not act 
at all, and hence could not live at all, 

B. The rational being also determines the sensu- 
ous world by that positing of its free activity ; that 
is, in positing that sensuous world it at the same 
time invests it with certain general and unchange- 
able characteristics. 

Firstly. The conception of the causality of the 
rational being is produced through absolute free- 
dom ; and hence the object of this causality in the 
sensuous world, being its opposite, must be fixed 
and unalterably determined. The Ego is infinitely 
determinable ; the object, because it is an object, is 
once and for ever determined. The Ego is what it 
is in Acting ; the object is what it is in Being. The 
Ego is incessantly becoming, and there is nothing 
permanent in it ; the object is, as it is, forever ; is 
what it is and is what it will be. In the Ego lies 
the ultimate ground of its acting ; in the object 
lies the ultimate ground of its being ; for it has 
nothing but being. 

Secondly. The conception of causality, produced 
through absolute freedom, and which, under this 
same circumstance, might be infinitely different, 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



47 



tends upon a causality in the object. Hence the 
object must be infinitely changeable through an 
infinitely changeable conception ; that is to say, it 
must be possible to make out of the object what- 
ever one may possibly will to make out of it. The 
object is fixed, is permanently determined, as we 
said at first, and may, therefore, by virtue of this its 
permanency, resist the causality of a rational being ; 
but it can not change itself through itself, (it can not 
ioimnence any effort ;) and hence it can not act con- 
trary or in opposition to this causality of a rational 
being. 

Finally, the rational being can not posit itself as 
having causality, without positing itself, at the same 
time, as representing ; it can not posit itself as act- 
ing upon a determined object, without constantly re- 
presenting this determined object ; it can not posit 
a determined causality as completed, without posit- 
ing the object upon which it was directed. For, 
since the object is posited as annihilating the cau- 
sality, although the causality must remain together 
with the object, there arises here an opposition, 
which can only be mediated by a floating of the 
imagination between object and causality, through 
which floating there arises a Time. Hence, the 
causality, in its working upon the object, occurs 
successively in Time. Now, if the causality is di- 
rected upon one and the same object, and if thus 
the causality is regarded in every present moment 
as conditioned by the previous moment, then the 
condition of the object is also regarded in each mo- 



48 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



ment as conditioned by its condition in all previous 
moments, beginning at the first cognition of the 
object ; and thus the object remains the same, al- 
though it is incessantly changed ; that is to say, 
the substrate produced by imagination, in order to 
connect in it the manyfold of the qualties, or in 
other words, the basis of the incessantly each other 
excluding accidences, which is called their sub- 
stance, always remains the same. This is the rea- 
son why we can posit ourselves only as changing 
the form of the things, and not their substance, and 
why we are well conscious of the power to infinitely 
alter the shapes of things, but also of our inability 
to produce or annihilate them, and, likewise, why 
matter can be neither increased nor diminished for 
us. On this stand-point of common consciousness 
— but by no means on the stand-point of transcen- 
dental philosophy — it is true that matter is origi- 
nally given to us. 

§ 3- 

THE FINITE RATIONAL BEING CAN NOT ASCRIBE TO 
ITSELF A FREE CAUSALITY IN THE SENSUOUS 
WORLD, WITHOUT ASCRIBING THE SAME TO 
OTHERS, AND, HENCE, WITHOUT LIKEWISE AS- 
SUMING OTHER FINITE RATIONAL BEINGS OUT- 
SIDE OF ITSELF, 

PROOF. 

A. We have shown in § i that a rational being 
can not posit (perceive and comprehend) an object, 



THE SCIENCE OF KICIITS. 



49 



without, in the same undivided synthesis, ascribing 
to itself a causality. 

But it can not ascribe to itself a causality without 
having- posited an object, upon which that causality 
is directed. The positing of the object, as a some- 
thing determined through itself, and in so far 
checking the free activity of the rational being, 
must be posited in a previous time-moment, and 
it is only through this positing of a previous time- 
moment, that the time-moment, in which we com- 
prehend the conception of causality, becomes the 
present. All comprehending is conditioned by the 
positing of a causality of the rational being, and all 
causality is conditioned by a previous comprehend- 
ing of the same. Hence, every possible moment of 
consciousness is conditioned by a previous moment 
of the same ; and thus, in the explanation of the pos- 
sibility of consciousness, consciousness is already 
presupposed. Consciousness can only be explained 
through a circle ; hence it can not be explained at 
all, and appears impossible. 

The problem was to show : how self-conscious- 
ness can be possible. Our reply was : self-con- 
sciousness is possible, when the rational being can 
ascribe to itself a causality in one and the same 
undivided moment wherein it opposes something 
to this causality. Let us suppose this to occur in 
the time-moment Z. You ask now, under what 
condition this occurrence is possible .'' and it ap- 
pears at once that the causality, which the rational 
being is to ascribe to itself, can be posited only in 



50 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



relation to a determined object, A, upon which it 
is directed. For no one must say that a general 
causality, a merely possible causality might be posi- 
ted, since such would be an indefinite thinking ; 
and Philosophy has already received injury enough 
from this sort of arguments. Such a merely possi- 
ble causality, or causality in general, is posited only 
through abstraction from a certain or ixQ)m.?i&. actual 
causality ; but you can not abstract from any thing, 
unless it has been previously posited ; and hence 
here, as ever, the indefinite conception of the gene- 
ral is preceded by a definite conception of a definite 
actual, and the former is conditioned through the 
latter. Nor must any one say that the causality 
might be posited as directed upon the object B, 
which is posited in the same moment, Z, for B is 
posited as object solely in so far as no causality is 
directed upon it. 

Hence, the moment Z must be explained from 
another moment, in which the object A must have 
been posited and comprehended ; but A also can 
be comprehended only under the same conditions 
under which alone B could be comprehended ; that 
is to say, the moment in which A is comprehended, 
is also possible only on condition of a previous mo- 
ment, and so on, ad infinitum. We find no possible 
point wherein we might connect the thread of self- 
consciousness, through which all consciousness first 
becomes possible, and hence our problem is not 
solved. 

It is important for the whole science which '\» 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



51 



here to be established, that the reader should ob- 
tain a clear insight into this argument. 

B. The ground of the impossibility of explaining 
self-consciousness, without constantly presupposing 
it as already existing, lay in this : that in order to 
be able to posit its causality, the subject of self- 
consciousness must previously have posited an ob- 
ject, merely as such ; and that thus, whenever we 
wanted to connect the thread of self-consciousness 
to a time-moment, we were always forced to go 
to a previous moment, wherein the connections 
must have been already made. This ground must 
be removed ; but it can be removed only by as- 
suming that the causality of the subject is syntheti- 
cally united with the object in one and the same 
time-moment ; that the causality of the subject is 
itself the perceived and comprehended object, and 
this object that causality of the subject, and that 
thus both are the same. Only from such a syn- 
thesis can we not be driven to a previous one ; only 
it contains all the conditions of self-consciousness, 
and gives us the point in which we can connect the 
thread thereof Only on this condition is self- 
consciousness possible. As sure, therefore, as self- 
consciousness occurs, must we make this assump- 
tion. The strict synthetical proof is, therefore, 
completed ; for what we have stated has shown 
itself to be the absolute condition of self-conscious- 
ness. 

The only question is yet, what our synthesis may 
signify, or what it may involve, and how its require- 



52 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



ments may be possible. Our business now is 
therefore to analyze what has been proven. 

C. It seems as if the synthesis we have under- 
taken, in place of dispelling the mere incompre- 
hensibility which it undertook to clear up, proposes 
to us a complete contradiction. That which the 
synthesis has established, must be an object ; 
but it is the characteristic of the object, that the 
free activity of the subject in taking hold of it be 
posited as checked. Now, the object in the present 
case is to be a causality of the subject ; but it is the 
character of such a causality that the activity of the 
subject be absolutely free, and determine itself. 
The activity of the subject is therefore by this syn- 
thesis required to be both checked and absolutely 
free. How is this contradiction possible It is 
possible, and both activities are united, when we 
think the subject as being determined to detcnniiie 
itself; or when we think a recjuirement adckessed 
to the subject to resolve on manifesting its cau- 
sality. 

In so far as that which the synthesis establishes 
is an object, it must be given in sensation, and in 
external, not in internal sensation ; for all internal 
sensation arises solely through reproduction of an 
external sensation, and hence presupposes the 
latter ; and thus, we should again by the assump- 
tion of such sensation, presuppose that self-con- 
sciousness, the possibility whereof is to be ex- 
plained. But that object is comprehended, and can 
be compi-ehended only as a requirement addressed 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



53 



to the Ego to act. As sure, therefore, as the sub- 
ject comprehends it, it has the conception of its 
own freedom and self-activity, and of this freedom 
and self-activity as given to it externally. It ob- 
tains the conception of its free causality, not as 
something which in the present moment is, for this 
were a real contradiction ; but as something 
which in the future moment sliall be. 

The question was, How can the subject find itself 
as object.'' To find itself, it could find itself only 
self-active ; for else it would not find itself ; and 
since it does not find at all unless it is, and is not 
unless it finds itself, it would not find at all. Again, 
in order to find itself as object, (of its reflection,) it 
could not find itself as determining itself to be self- 
active,* but as determined to self-activity through 
an external requirement, which requirement must 
leave it, however, in possession of its full freedom 
of self-determination ; for otherwise, the subject 
would not find itself as Ego. 

To make the latter point clearer, I shall here pre- 
state some future results. The subject can not find 
itself compelled to act ; for then it would not be 
free, would not be Ego ; nor, when it resolves to 
act, can it find itself necessitated to act in this or 
that determined manner ; for then, again, it would 
not be free, would not be Ego. How, then, must 

* The question here is not how the matter may be when viewei 
from the transcendental stand-point, but simply, how it must ap- 
pear to the subject under investigation. 



54 THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 

we ihink it as determined to be active, in order to 
find itself as object ? Only in so far, that the sub- 
ject finds itself as something which may be active 
or not, to which a requirement is addressed to be 
active or not, but which may also not follow that 
requirement. 

The rational being shall realize its free activity ; 
this requirement addressed to it lies in its very con- 
ception, and as sure as it comprehends that concep- 
tion it realizes that free activity. This it only can re- 
alize either through actual acting. All that is requir- 
ed is activity in general, but the conception expressly 
involves that the subject must choose in the sphere 
of possible acts one act through its free self-deter- 
mination. It can act only in one way ; can deter- 
mine its power of sensation, which is here the pow- 
er of sensuous causality, only in one manner. As 
sure as it acts, it chooses through absolute self-de- 
termination this one way, and is in so far absolutely 
free and a rational being ; and posits itself as such. 

Or it can realize that free activity through not act- 
ing. In this case it is also free, for according to 
our presupposition, it has comprehended the con- 
ception of its causality as something required of it. 
Now, in resisting this requirement and not acting, it 
chooses freely between acting and not acting. 

The conception here established is that of a free 
reciprocal causality, in its greatest precision, and 
is, therefore, nothing but this, I could add, for in- 
stance, to any free causality a free opposing cau- 
sality as accidental ; but that would not be the pre- 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



5S 



cise conception here required. In our conception 
Causality a Counter Causality ctsx). not be thought 
apart at all. Both are the integral parts of a whole 
event ; and such an event is now postulated as the 
necessary condition of the self-consciousness of a 
rational being. It must occur, as we have shown. 

Only to such an event is it possible to attach the 
thread of consciousness, which can then, we appre- 
hend, pass through all other objects without diffi- 
culty. 

This thread has been attached by our present rep- 
resentation. Under this condition the subject can 
and must posit itself as a free acting being : such 
was our proof If it does posit itself as such, then 
it can and must posit a sensuous world and must op- 
posit itself to the sensuous world. And now, after 
the chief problem has been solved, all the workings 
of the human mind proceed according to the laws 
thereof without further difficulty. 

D. Hitherto our analysis of the established syn- 
thesis has been simply explanatory : all we had to 
do was to make clear to ourselves what the mere 
conception of that synthesis involved. This anal- 
ysis still continues, but it now begins to draw con- 
clusions ; that is to say, perhaps the subject must 
posit many other things in consequence of the pos- 
ited influence upon it ; if so, how does it posit this 
other, or what does it posit, by virtue of the laws of 
its being, in consequence of its first positing 

The described influence was necessary condition 
of all self-consciousness ; it occurs as sure as self- 



56 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



consciousness occurs, and is, therefore, a necessary 
fact. If, by virtue of the necessary laws of rational 
beings, something else must be posited at the same 
time with this influence, then the positing of this 
other is a necessary fact like the former. 

In so far as the described influence enters sensa- 
tion, (is felt,) it is a limitation of the Ego ; and the 
subject must have posited it as such ; but there is 
no limitation without a limiting. Hence the sub- 
ject, in positing that influence, must have posited at 
the same time something outside of itself as the de- 
termining ground of that influence. This is evi- 
dent at a glance. 

But again : This influence is determined, and 
through the positing of it as determined there is 
posited, not merely a general ground, but a deter- 
mined ground of it. What sort of ground must 
this be, or what must be its characteristic as 
ground of this determined influence This is a 
question we shall have to dwell upon more at length. 
The influence was comprehended as a requirement 
addressed to the subject to manifest free causality ; 
and (which is of all-important significance) it could 
not be at all comprehended otherwise, and could 
not have been comprehended, had it not been com- 
prehended in this manner. 

This requirement to act, is the content of the in- 
fluence, and its ultimate end is a free causality of 
the rational being, to which that requirement is ad- 
dressed. The rational being is not determined or 
necessitated to act by this requirement — as in the 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



57 



conception of causality the effect is necessitated by 
the cause — but merely seizes this requirement as 
occasion to determine itself to act. To do this, 
however, it must first have understood and compre- 
hended the requirement, and this previous cogni- 
tion of it is taken into calculation. Hence the 
posited ground of the influence, or of the require- 
ment addressed to the subject, must, at least, pre- 
suppose the possibility, that the subject can under- 
stand and comprehend it, for otherwise its require- 
ment would have no End in view at all. Its having 
such End is conditioned by the understanding and 
freedom of the rational being, to whom it is ad- 
dressed. This ground must, therefore, necessarily 
have the conception of reason and freedom, and 
must, therefore, be itself a being, capable of com- 
prehending, that is, an intelligence, and since this 
is also not possible without freedom, it must be a 
free and hence a rational being, and must be posit- 
ed as such. 

In regard to the manner of drawing a conclu- 
sion, which has here been established, as a neces- 
sary manner, which is originally grounded in the 
nature of reason, and which most assuredly follows 
without our conscious cooperation, we add a few 
words of explanation. 

The question has justly been asked : What effects 
can be explained only as the effects of a rational 
cause The answer : Those effects, which must be 
necessarily preceded by a conception thereof; is 
true, but not sufficient, for the higher and more 



58 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



difficult question remains : What, then, are effects, 
of which it must be said, that they were possible 
only after a previous conception thereof? Every 
effect can be taken up in conception, after it once 
exists, and the manyfold of the effect arranges 
'.tself under the unity of the conception more easily 
and happily only as the observer himself has more 
sense and understanding. Now, this is a unity, 
which the observer himself has transferred into the 
manyfold through what Kant calls his reflective 
power of judgment, and which he must so transfer, if 
only one effect is to exist for him. But who guarantees 
him that, just as he now arranges the actual many- 
fold under the unity of his conception, so, previously 
to the effect, the conceptions of the manyfold, which 
he perceives, were subordinated by an understand- 
ing to the conception of that unity, which he now 
thinks ; and what may justify him in arriving at 
such a result .'' There must be a higher ground of 
justification, or the conclusion, that the effect is 
that of a rational cause, is false throughout. 

There is no doubt : a rational being, as sure as it 
is this, sketches out for itself the conception of the 
product, which is to be realized through its activity ; 
and by the conception thus traced out, it guides its 
activity, always looking at it in acting, as it were. 
This conception is called the conception of an end. 

Now, a rational being cannot at all obtain a con- 
ception of its causality, tmless it has a cognition of 
the object of this causality. For it cannot determine 
itself to act — of course, with a consciousness of this 



THE SCIEMCE OF RIGHTS. 



59 



self-determination, for only thereby does it become 
a free activity — unless it has posited this its activity 
as checked ; and when it posits a determined activ- 
ity as checked, it posits an external object as the 
^ checking. This is the reason, by the by, why na- 
ture, even if we should claim for her intelligence 
and freedom, cannot have the power to form the 
conception of an end, (and for that very reason, no 
one should claim for her intelligence and freedom.) 
For there is nothing external to nature, upon which 
she could direct her causality. Every thing upon 
which causality can be directed, is itself nature. 

A sure criterion of the effect of a rational being 
would, therefore, be this : that the effect couid only 
be thought possible on condition of a cognition of 
its object. Now, there is nothing which can not be 
thought possible through mere force of nature, and 
which must be thought as possible only through cog- 
nition, except cognition itself. Hence, when the ob- 
ject — and here also the end of an effect — can only 
be, to produce a cognition, then it is necessary to as- 
sume a rational cause of the effect. 

But the assumption, that a cognition was in- 
tended, must be necessary ; that is, it must be im- 
possible to think any other end of the act, and the 
act itself it must be possible to comprehend only 
when it is comprehended as intending to produce a 
cognition. 

(To illustrate by the contrary : Nature, we say, 
teaches us this or that by an event ; but in so say- 
ing, we do not mean to assert that nature had not 



6o 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



quite another end in view in producing the event 
than to teach us ; we only wish to say that, if any 
one chooses to regard the event from such a point 
of view, it may be instructive for him to do so.) 

The above case arises here. The cause of tlie in- 
fluence upon us has no end at all, unless it has, 
above all, the end in view, that we should recog- 
nize it as such cause. Hence we must assume a 
rational being as this cause. 

We have now proved what was to be proved. 
The rational being can not posit itself as such, un- 
less a requirement to act free is addressed to it. 
When such a requirement to free self-determination 
is addressed to it, it must necessarily posit a rational 
being outside of itself, as the cause thereof; and 
hence it must posit a rational being outside of itself 
generally. 

COROLLARIA. 

I. Man becomes man only amongst men ; and 
since he can only be man, and would not be at 
all unless he were m^n, it follows, that if man is 
to be at all, their must be men. This is not an 
arbitrary assumption, not an opinion based on past 
experience or on other probability-reasons ; but it 
is a truth to be strictly deduced from the concep- 
tion of man. As soon as you proceed to determine 
this conception fully, you are driven from the think- 
ing of a single man to the assumption of another 
one, by means of which to explain the first. Hence, 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. Cl 

the conception of man is not at all the conception 
of a single one, for such a one is unthinkable, but 
of a race. 

The requirement addressed to the rational being 
to manifest its free self-activity, is what is called 
education. All individuals must be educated to be 
men ; otherwise, they would not be men. The 
question here forces itself upon every one : If it 
should be necessary to assume an origin of the 
whole human race, and hence a first pair of human 
beings — and from a certain standpoint of reflection 
this assumption is assuredly necessary — who educa- 
ted that first pair They must have been educated, 
for our proof is universal, and a man could not edu- 
cate them, since they are assumed as the first men ; 
hence it is necessary to assume that another ration- 
al being, not of the race of men, educated them ; of 
course, only so far, until they could educate each 
other. A spirit took them in his charge, precisely 
as it is represented in an old and venerable chroni- 
cle, which, indeed, contains throughout the profound- 
est, sublimest wisdom, and establishes results, to 
which <±11 philosophy must, after all, return. 

II. Only free, reciprocal causality upon each 
other through conceptions and after conceptions, 
only this giving and receiving of knowledge, is the 
distinguishing characteristic of mankind, through 
which alone every person shows himself to be 
man. 

If man is, then there must also be necessarily a 
world, and precisely a world like our own, which 



62 THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 

contains irrational objects and rational beings. 
This is not the place to proceed further, and to 
show up the necessity of all determined objects in 
nature, and their necessary classification, which, 
however, can be demonstrated quite as strictly as 
the necessity of a world generally.* 

The question concerning the ground of the re- 
ality of objects is now answered. The reality of 
the world — of course for us, that is, for all finite 
reason — is a condition of self-consciousness ; for we 
can not posit ourselves without positing something 
outside of us, to which we must ascribe the same 
reality which we ascribe to ourselves. To ask for 
a reality which shall remain after having abstracted 
from all reason, is contradictory ; for he who asks 
that question, has also, in all probability, reason, and 
is impelled by reason to ask his question, and de- 
sires a rational answer ; hence he has not abstract- 
ed from reason. We can not go out of the sphere 
of our reason ; this has been well taken care of; 
and philosophy desires only that we shall become 
aware thereof, and shall not believe that we have 
gone beyond it, when we are always, as a matter of 
course, within it. 

§ 4. 

The finite rational being can not assume other fittite 
rational beings outside of itself, zvitli02it positing it- 

* Readers who can not see this, should have patience, and should 
draw no other conclusions from their not seeing, than the only le- 
gitimate one, that they do not see it. 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



03 



self as occupying a determined relatiofi toward them, 
which is called the Legal Relation. 

PROOF. 

A. The subject must distinguish itself through op- 
position from the rational being, which it has as- 
sumed outside of itself . The subject has posited it- 
self as one, which contains in itself the last ground 
of something that is in it, (for this is the condi- 
tion of Egohood, or of Rationality generally ;) but 
it has also posited a being outside of itself, as the 
last ground of this something in it. 

It is to have the power of distinguishing itself 
from this other being ; and this is, under our pre- 
supposition, possible only, if the subject can distin- 
guish in that given something how far the ground 
of this something lies in itself and how far it lies 
outside of itself. 

The ground of the acting of the subject lies both 
in the being ozitside of it, and in itself ; that is, the 
ground of the form of that acting, or that the sub- 
ject did act. For if the outside being had not in- 
fluenced the subject and thus called upon it to act, 
the subject would not have acted. Its acting, as 
such, is conditioned by the acting of the outside 
being. 

But moreover, its acting is also conditioned mate- 
rialiter ; for to the subject is assigned its general 
sphere of action. 

Within this sphere, however, the subject has 
chosen with freedom, has absolutely given to itself 



64 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



the further determination of its acting ; and of this 
further determination of its activity, the ground lies 
solely in the subject itself In so far alone, there- 
fore, can it posit itself as an absolutely free being, 
and as the sole ground of something ; in so far 
alone can it separate itself utterly from the free be- 
ing outside of itself, and ascribe its causality to it- 
self only. 

Within that sphere, that is, from the end point of 
the product of the outside being, X, to the end point 
of its own product, Y, it has chosen amongst the 
possibilities, which that sphere contains ; and from 
these possibilities and from this comprehension of 
them, as possibilities which it might have chosen, 
the subject constitutes for itself its freedom and 
self-determination. 

Within that sphere the subject had to choose, if 
the product, Y, was to become possible as a sepa- 
rate one of the effects given through that sphere. 
Again : 

Within this sphere only the subject could choose, 
and not the other being ; for the other being had left 
that sphere undetermined, according to our presup- 
position. 

That, which chose exclusively within this sphere, 
is its Ego, is the individual, is the rational being 
determined as such through opposition to another 
rational being ; and this individual is characterized 
through a determined utterance of freedom, pertain- 
ing exclusively to it. 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



65 



B. 1)1 this distinction through opposition the con- 
ception of the subject as a free being, and the concep- 
tion of the outside rational being, as also a free being, 
are mutually determined and conditiojted throicgh the 
subject. 

Opposition is not possible unless in the same un- 
divided moment of reflection the opposites are also 
posited as equals, related to each other, and com- 
pared with each other : this is a formal theoretical 
proposition, which has been proved in its place in 
the Science of Knowledge, but which we trust will 
be accepted here as self-evident by common sense, 
even without that proof We shall now apply this 
proposition. 

The subject determines itself as an individual and 
as a free individual through the sphere wherein it 
has chosen one of the possible acts given in that 
sphere ; and the subject also posits another indi- 
vidual outside of itself, as its opposite, and as de- 
termined through another sphere, wherein this other 
individual has chosen. Hence the subject posits 
both spheres at the same time, and only thus is the 
required opposition possible. 

The being outside of the subject is posited as 
free, hence as a being, which might also have over- 
stepped the sphere by which it is now determined, 
and might have overstepped it in such a manner as 
not to leave to the first subject the possibility of a 
free acting. It has voluntarily not overstepped that 
sphere, and has, therefore, itself restricted its own 
freedom, materialiter, that is to say, the sphere of 



65 THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 

the acts, which its formal freedom could have real- 
ized ; and all this the subject also posits necessarily 
in that stipulated oppositing, (as indeed it posits 
every thing that follows, which the reader will please 
bear constantly in mind.) 

Again : This outside being has addressed a re- 
quirement to the subject to manifest free activity ; 
hence it has restricted its freedom by a conception 
of an end entertained by the subject, wherein the 
freedom of the subject, be it only problematically, 
was presupposed ; it has therefore restricted its 
freedom through the conception of the (formal) 
freedom of the subject. 

Now, through this self-restriction of the other be- 
ing its cognition by the subject as a rational and 
free being is conditioned. For the subject has po- 
sited a free being outside of itself only by virtue of 
a requirement addressed to itself to manifest free 
activity, hence only by virtue of that self-restric- 
tion of the outside being. But again : This self- 
restriction was conditioned also by the cognition on 
the part of the outside being of the subject as a 
possibly free being. Hence the conception, which 
the subject has of the outside being, as a free be- 
ing, is conditioned by the same conception on the 
part of the outside being of the subject, and by an 
acting, determined through this conception. 

On the other hand, the completion of the cogni- 
tion on the part of the outside being of the subject, 
as a free being, is conditioned by the same cogni- 
tion and a correspondent acting on the part of the 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



67 



subject. If the subject had not cognized a free be- 
ing outside of itself, then something would not 
have resulted, which, according to the laws of rea- 
son, ought to have resulted, and the subject would 
not be rational. Or, if this cognition did result in 
the subject, but was not followed by a correspon- 
dent restriction of its freedom, in order to leave to 
that other outside being also the possibility to act 
free ; then the other outside being could not have 
concluded the subject to be a rational being, since 
that conclusion became necessary only by the sub- 
ject's self-restriction of freedom. 

Hence the relation of free beings to each other is 
necessarily determined in the following manner and 
is posited as thus determined : The mutual cogni- 
tion of individuals is conditioned by this, that each 
treat the other as free, (or, restrict his freedom 
through the conception of the freedom of the oth- 
er.) But this manner of treatment is conditioned 
by the manner of acting of each toward the other ; 
and this by the manner of acting and by the cogni- 
tion of the other, and so on ad iitfinituni. The re- 
lation of free beings toward each other is therefore 
the relation of a reciprocal causality upon each 
other through intelligence and freedom. No free 
being can recognize the other as such, unless both 
mutually thus recognize each other ; and no one can 
treat the other as a free being, unless both mutually 
thus treat each other. 

The conception, here established, is very impor- 
tant for our purpose ; for it is the basis of our whole 



68 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



theory of Rights. We shall try, therefore, to make 
it clearer bv the following syllogism : 

I. 

/ can suppose that a certain rational being will re- 
cognize me as a rational being only in so far as I 
treat it myself as snch. 

The Conditioned of this proposition is, not that 
that being in itself, and apart from me and from 
my consciousness, as, for instance, in its own con- 
science, (which falls within the sphere of Morality,) 
or before others, (which is a matter for the State,) 
should recognize me as such a rational being ; but 
that it should recognize me as such according to 
its own consciousness and mine synthetically uni- 
ted in one, that is, according to a consciousness 
common to us both ; and in such a manner, that 
I should be enabled to compel it to acknowledge, 
as sure as itself wishes to pass for a rational being, 
that it knows me to be one also. 

The Conditioned of this proposition moreover is, 
not that I can prove generally that I have been re- 
cognized by rational beings as their equals, but that 
this particular individual, C, has recognized me as 
such. 

The Condition of this proposition is, not that I 
merely entertain the conception of C as a rational 
being, but that I actually act in the sensuous world. 
For the conception remains in my most inner con- 
sciousness, only mine, not accessible to the outside 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



6g 



individual. It is only through experience that the 
individual, C, obtains something ; and this experi- 
ence I can excite only through acting. What I 
think, the other one can not know. 

The Co7iditioii is, moreover, not that I shall only 
not act in opposition to that conception, but that I 
shall really act in conformity to it, or shall really 
enter into mutual causality with C. For otherwise 
we should remain separate, and should not exist the 
one for the other. 

The grotcnd of the co7tnection is : 

Unless I exercise causality upon him, I can not 
know, or can not prove to him, that he has even a 
representation of myself or of my existence. Even 
assuming that I appear as object in the sensuous 
world and that I am within the sphere of his possi- 
ble experience, the question still remains, whether 
he has ever reflected upon me ; and this question 
he can answer only himself. 

Again : Unless I act upon him according to the 
conception of a rational being, I can not prove to 
him that he must necessarily have taken me for a 
rational being. For every manifestation of power 
can be the result of a power of nature working by 
mechanical laws ; and only the moderation of pow- 
er through conception is the sure and exclusive cri- 
terion of reason and of freedom. 



70 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



II. 

B7it I must assume that all rational beings out- 
side of me will in all possible cases recognize me as a 
rational being. 

The necessity of this universal requirement must 
be shown up as condition of the possibility of self- 
consciousness. But self-consciousness is not with- 
out consciousness of individuality, as has been 
shown. All that needs, therefore, to be proved 
now is, that no consciousness of individuality is 
possible v/ithout this recognition, or that the lat- 
ter necessarily results from the former. We pro- 
ceed to establish this proof 

A. I posit myself in opposition to C as individu- 
al only by ascribing exclusively to myself a sphere 
for my free activity, which sphere I deny to him. 

I posit myself in opposition to C as a rational and 
free being only by ascribing also to him freedom and 
reason, hence only by assuming that he has also 
chosen a sphere of his free activity different from 
mine. 

But I assume all this only on the presupposition 
that he, in choosing Jiis sphere, has taken my free 
choice into consideration, and has voluntarily and 
with fixed purpose left my sphere open to me. 
(Only by positing him as treating me like a ration- 
al being do I posit him at all as a rational being. 
My whole judgment proceeds from me and his treat- 
ment of me, as could not well be otherwise in a sys- 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



71 



tem which has the Ego for its basis. It is only from 
this determined manifestation of his reason that I 
draw a conclusion as to his rationality generally.) 

But the individual, C, can not act upon me in the 
described manner without first, at least problemati- 
cally, recognizing me as such rational being ; and I 
can not posit him as thus acting upon me unless I 
posit him also as recognizing me (at least proble- 
matically) in that manner. 

Every thing problematic becomes categorical 
when the condition is added. The condition was, 
that I should recognize the individual, C, as a ra- 
tional being in a manner valid iox him and im ; that 
is, that I should treat him as such, for only acting is 
such a tmiversally valid recognitiotz. Now, / imist 
necessarily treat him thus, as sure as / posit my- 
self in opposition to him as rational being — of 
course in as far as I proceed at all rationally or logi- 
cally in my cognitions. 

As certain, therefore, as I now recognize, that is, 
treat him as a rational being, he is bound or obliged 
by his first problematical recognition to recognize 
me categorically, and to recognize me thus in a uni- 
versally valid manner, that is, to treat me as a ra- 
tional being. 

There occurs in this instance a uniting of oppo- 
sites into one. Under the present presupposition, 
the point of union lies in me, in my consciousness ; 
and the uniting is conditioned by this, that I am 
capable of consciousness. 

He fulfills the condition under which I am to re- 



72 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



cognize him, and prescribes now on his part the 
condition to me. I, on my part, add the condition 
by actually recognizing him ; and thus I compel him, 
in virtue of the condition established by himself, to 
recognize me categorically, whilst I also oblige my- 
self, by thus recognizing him, to treat him as such. 

COROLLARIUM. 

The conception of individuality is, as we have 
shown, a Reciprocal Conception, that is, a conception 
which can be thought only in relation to another 
thinking, and which in its form is conditioned by 
this other thinking, and moreover b}' the same 
thinking of it. This conception is possible in every 
rational being only in so far as it is posited as com- 
pleted through another individual. Hence the con- 
ception of individuality is never 7nine ; but by my 
own confession and the confession of the other in- 
dividual, it is hothinine and his ; and Jiis and mine ; 
a common conception, wherein two consciousnesses 
are united into one. 

Each one of my conceptions determines its next 
succeeding one in my consciousness. Through the 
given conception of individuality a community is de- 
termined, and the further results thereof depend not 
only upon me, but also upon the individual, who, by its 
means, has entered into community with me. And 
since the conception is necessary, this necessity com- 
pels us BOTH TO AGREE TO AND ABIDE BY ITS RE- 
SULTS : we are both now bound to each other and 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



73 



obliged to each other through our very existence. 
There must be a law common to us both, and 
which we both must recognize in common as ne- 
cessary, which determines us both in common to 
abide by the results of that conception ; and this 
law must lie in the same character, which led us to 
enter that community, namely, the character of Ra- 
tionality. This law, which compels us to agree to 
the same results of a conception, is called Conse- 
quence, and is scientifically established in common 
Logic. 

The whole described union of conceptions was 
possible only in and through acts. Hence, the 
continued consequence also is such only in acts ; 
and can be required and is required only for acts. 
The acts stand here for conceptions ; and of con- 
ceptions in themselves, without acts, we do not 
speak, because we can not speak of them as such. 



B. I must appeal to that recognition in every re- 
lation which I may occupy to the individual, C, and 
must always judge him by that recognition. 

It is presupposed that I am placed in many re- 
lations, connections, and mutual communications 
with that one and the same individual, C. Hence, 
I must be able to relate given effects to him, that 
is, to connect them with other effects, which I have 
already accepted as his. 

But when he is posited, he is posited both as a 
determined, sensuous being, and as a rational being ; 



74 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



both characteristics are synthetically united in him. 
The former, by virtue of the sensuous predicates of 
his causality upon me ; the latter, solely by virtue 
of my having recognized him as such. Only in the 
union of both predicates is he jaosited at all through 
me, and has he become an object of cognition for 
me. Hence, I can relate an act to Jam only in so 
far as it is partly connected with the sensuous pre- 
dicates of his previous acts, and partly connected 
with his recognition through me ; and in so far as it 
is determined through both. 

Assuming him to act in such a manner as to 
make his act determined through the sensuous 
predicates of his previous acts, (which, indeed, the 
mechanism of nature itself has provided for,) but not 
determined through the recognition of him by me 
as a rational being ; that is to say, assuming him to 
treat me as an object, and thus to deprive me by 
his act of the sphere of freedom belonging to me : 
in that case I am nevertheless still forced to ascribe 
the act to to that same sensuous being, C. 
Now the conception of this sensuous being, C, has 
heretofore, through the common recognition — and 
perhaps also through a series of previous acts, which 
were determined by that recognition — been united 
in my consciousness with the conception of ration- 
ality, (he has been accepted by me as not only a 
sensuous but also a rational being,) and what I have 
once united I can not separate again. Those con- 
ceptions were posited in my consciousness as ne- 
cessarily and essentially united ; I had posited sen- 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



75 



suousness and rationality in union as the essence 
of C. But in this new act, X, I am called upon, ne- 
cessarily, to separate these conceptions ; and hence 
I can now ascribe rationality to him only acci- 
dejiially. My own treatment of him, as a rational 
being, becomes now accidental and conditioned, and 
holds good only if he should treat me as one. Hence, 
I can ill this case treat him in strict logic, which is 
here my only law, as a mere sensuous being, until 
sensuoiisncss and rationality shall again be united 
in the conception of his act. 

My assertion in such a case would be : Your act, 
X, contradicts your confessed recognition, that I 
am a rational being ; you have acted inconsequent- 
ly. I, however, acted logically previous to your act, 
X ; and act now logically in treating you as a mere 
sensuous being, because by your act, X, you have 
confessed yourself such. 

By making such an assertion I place myself on a 
higher stand-point over us both, go beyond my indi- 
viduality, appeal to a law which is valid for us both, 
and apply it to the present case. Hence, I posit 
myself as judge, that is, as his superior. This is 
the source of the superiority which every one claims, 
who believes to be in the right over his opponent. 
But, by appealing to this common law, I invite him 
to judge with me, and demand that in the present 
case he shall himself acknowledge my conduct to- 
ward him to be logical, and shall, forced by the laws 
of thinking, approve my conduct. The community 
of consciousness continues always. For I judge 

F 



76 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



him by a conception, which I hold that he must have 
himself. 

This is the source of the Positiveiiess which lies 
in the conception of Rights, and whereby we believe 
we oblige our opponent not to resist our treatment, 
but even to approve it. This obligatoriness arises 
by no means from the Moral Law, but from the law 
of thinking ; and hence there enters here a practi- 
cal validity of the syllogism. 

C. Whatsoever is valid between me and C, is 
valid between me and every individual with whom 
I am placed in mutual causality. 

Every other rational being can be given to me 
only in the same manner and under the same con- 
ditions as C was given ; for only thus is the positing 
of a rational being outside of me possible. 

The new individual, D, is another one than C, in 
so far as its free act, in its sensuous predicates, is not 
relatable to the sensuous predicates of the acts of 
other individuals posited by me. 

The condition of the cognition of the identity of 
the acting individual was the possibility of connect- 
ing the characteristic signs of his present act with 
his previous acts. Where this possibility does not 
exist, I can not refer the act to any of the rational 
beings known to me ; and since I must relate it to 
a rational being, I posit a new one. 

Perhaps it may be well to gather tlie point 
of the proof here undertaken — which has been 
somewhat diffused by its numbers of links — into a 
single view. What we had to prove was this : As 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



77 



sure as I posit myself as an individual, I require 
all rational beings known to me to recognize me 
in all cases of reciprocal causality as a rational 
being. A certain positing of myself is therefore 
assumed to involve a postulate for oir.er individuals, 
a postulate extending to all possible cases of its 
application ; and this postulate, if involved in it, 
we must be able to discover in it by a mere analy- 
sis of that certain act of self-positing. 

I posit myself as individual, in opposition to an- 
other individual, by ascribing to myself a sphere 
for my freedom, from which I exclude the other, 
and by ascribing to /«';« a sphere, from which I 
exclude myself — of course, only in the thinking of 
a fact and by virtue of this fact. Hence, I have 
posited myself as free a side of him without danger 
to the possibility of his freedom. Through this 
positing of my freedom I have determined myself ; 
to be free constitutes my essential character. But 
what does to be free mean.? Evidently to be able 
to carry out the conceptions of acts I may enter- 
tain. But the carrying out always follozvs the con- 
ception, and the perception of the desired product 
of my causality is always — in relation to its first 
conception — a matter of the future. Freedom is 
therefore always posited in the future ; and if it is 
to constitute the character of a being, it is posited 
for all the future of the individual ; is posited in 
the future as far as the individual himself is posi- 
ted in the future. 

Now, my freedom is possible only if the other 



78 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



individual remains within his sphere ; hence, as I 
demand my freedom for all the future, I also de- 
mand his restriction to his sphere, and since he is 
to be free, his restriction through himself for all 
the future ; and all this I demand immediately in 
l^ositing myself as an individual. 

But he can restrict himself only in consequence 
of a conception of me as a rational being. Never- 
theless, I demand this his self-restriction absolute- 
ly ; hence I demand of him Couscqucnce. (logical 
consistency,) that is, that all his future conceptions 
shall be determined by one certain previous con- 
ception, namely, his cognition of me as a rational 
being. 

And since he can recognize me as such only if 
I myself treat him as such, by virtue of such a 
conception of him, I require of myself the same 
Consequence, and thus his acting is conditioned 
through mine. 

III. 

The conclusion has been discovered already. It 
is this : / mnst recognize tJie free being as such in all 
cases, that is, must restrict my freedom through the 
conception of the possibility of his freedom. 

The deduced relation between rational beings 
— namely, that each individual must restrict his 
freedom through the conception of the possibility 
of the freedom of the other — is called the Relation 
of Legality, Legal Relation ; and the formula gi ven 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



79 



to it is called the Ficndamciital Principle of the 
Science of Rights. 

This relation has been deduced from the concep- 
tion of the individual. We have therefore proven 
what was to be proven. Again : the conception of 
the individual has been proven to be the condition 
of self-consciousness ; hence, the conception of 
Law (of Rights) is itself condition of self-con- 
sciousness ; and hence, this conception has been 
properly deduced a priori, that is, from the pure 
form of Reason, from the Ego. 

COROLLARIA. 

I. Our deduction, therefore, asserts that the 
conception of Law lies in the conception of Rea- 
son, and that no finite rational being is possible 
wherein it does not occur. It does not occur in 
consequence of having been taught, nor through 
experience, nor in virtue of arbitrary arrangements 
among men, etc., but in consequence of man being 
a rational being. It is a matter of course that the 
manifestation of this conception in empirical con- 
sciousness is conditioned through a given case of 
application ; and that this conception does not lie 
originally — like some empty form — in our soul, 
waiting for experience to put something into it, as 
certain philosphers seem to hold in regard to a pri- 
ori conceptions. But that the case of application 
must occur, because man can not be man isolated, 
has also been proven. 



8o 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



Likewise have we sliown that a certain concep- 
tion, that is, a certain modification of thinking, a 
certain manner of judging things, must be necessa- 
rily pertaining to the rational being as such. Let 
us call this conception for the present X, if the 
reader so chooses. This X must operate wherever 
men live together, and must manifest itself among 
them and have a designation in their language ; and 
will do this of itself, without the laborious deduction 
of the ijhilosopher. Whether this X is precisely what 
the use of language has named Law, is a question 
which common sense — that is to say, common sense 
when left to itself, and not when confused and led 
astray by the arbitrary explanations and interpreta- 
tions of philosophers — has to decide. For the pre- 
sent we declare, as we have a perfect right to do, 
that the deduced conception, X, the reality whereof 
has been proven in our deduction, is to be called in 
this our investigation the conception of Laz(} or 
Rights, holding ourselves responsible to prove by 
it whatever questions common sense may raise con- 
cerning Lav/. 

II. The deduced conception has nothing to do 
with morality ; nay, has been deduced without it, 
and since only one deduction of a conception is pos- 
sible, this fact is already in itself sufficient to prove 
that the conception of Law is not to be deduced 
from the conception of Morality. Indeed, all at- 
tempts to so deduce it have failed utterly. The 
conception of Duty, which is involved in Morality, 
is in most of its characteristics utterly opposed to 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



8i 



the conception of Law. Morality commands cate 
gorically ; Law merely permits, and does not com- 
mand you to make use of your rights. Nay, Mo- 
rality often prohibits you to exercise what is your 
Right, and what, in the admission of all the world 
will, nevertheless, remain your Right. You have a 
Right to it, undoubtedly, the world will say, but 
you ought not to have used your Right. Now, if 
the conception of Law were derived from Morality, 
Morality would be in contradiction to itself, since in 
such a case it would first grant a Right and then 
prohibit its exercise. 

Whether, however, Morality may not give a new 
sanction to the conception of Law is another ques- 
tion ; but this question belongs to the Science of 
Morality. On the field of Natural Law a good will 
is counted for nothing. It must be possible to car- 
ry out the conception of Law though not one indi- 
vidual had a good will ; and it is the very business 
and object of the Science of Rights to establish 
such a condition. 

And thus we need no artificial measures to sepa- 
rate Natural Law and Morality ; for both Sciences 
are originally, and without any cooperation of ours, 
separated and completely opposed to each other 
through and in Reason. 

III. The conception of Law is the conception of 
a relation between rational beings. Hence it re- 
sults only when such beings are thought as in re- 
lation to each other. It is nonsense to speak of 
rights between man and nature, or between man 



82 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



and the ground, soil, or animals, etc., as such ; non- 
sense to speak of such rights as existing direct be- 
tween Man and Nature. Reason has only poiver 
over Nature, not a riglit in relation to Nature ; for 
the conception of Rights does not arise at all in 
such a relation. It is quite a different thing, when 
the question is asked. Whether we may not have 
conscientious scruples as to enjoying this or that 
portion of Nature For this is not a question 
which we ask because we feel that we may have 
invaded the rights of the things of Nature, but we 
ask it because we are afraid we might hurt our- 
selves by indulging in such enjoyments of things ; 
it is a moral, not a legal question. 

It is only when two persons are related to one 
and the same thing that a question arises as to the 
Right to the thing, or, more properly expressed, 
as to the Right which the one person has against 
the other, to exclude him from the use of such 
thing. 

IV. It is only through acts, through manifesta- 
tions of their freedom in the sensuous world, that 
rational beings are placed in mutual causality with 
each other ; hence the conception of Rights relates 
only to what manifests itself in the sensuous world ; 
and that which has no causality in the sensuous 
world, but remains in the interior of the Soul, is not 
subordinated to the conception of Right, but to Mo- 
rality. It is, therefore, nonsense to speak of a right 
to freedom of thinking, freedom of conscience, etc. 
You have z. power to do these internal acts, and you 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



83 



may have duties concerning them, but you can not 
speak of rights in reference to them. 

V. Only in so far as rational beings are really 
placed in relation to each other and can really act 
in such a manner that the acting of the one can 
have results for the other, is a question of rights 
possible between them. Between persons who 
do not know each other, or whose spheres of action 
are utterly separated, a legal relation is not possible. 
It involves an utter misapprehension of the concep- 
tion of rights, when people speak of the rights of 
the Dead upon the Living. We may have moral 
duties, to remember them, etc., but in no way legal 
obligations toward them. 



^OOK ^ECOND. 



DEDUCTION 



APPLICABILITY 



CONCEPTION OF RIGHTS. 



§ 5- 

THE RATIONAL BEING CAN NOT POSIT ITSELF AS 
AN INDIVIDUAL, HAVING CAUSALITY, UNLESS IT 
ASCRIBES TO ITSELF A MATERIAL BODY AND 
THEREBY DETERMINES THAT BODY. 

PROOF. 

According to our previous result, the rational 
being posits itself as a rational individual, or, as we 
shall say hereafter, as a person, only by ascribing 
cxxhisivcly to itself a sphere for its freedom. It says : 
I am the person which has exclusive freedom within 
this sphere, and I am no other possible person ; and 
no other person is myself that is, no other person 
has freedom within this sphere ascribed to me. 
This constitutes its individual character ; through 
this determination the person is this or that person, 
oearing this or that name, and is no other one. 

All we have to do is to analyze this act ; to see 
what takes place when it does take place. 

A. The Subject ascribes this sphere to itself ; de- 
termines itself through this sphere. Hence it oppos- 
its the sphere to itself. Itself is the logical subject^ 
(in any possible proposition,) and the sphere is the 



88 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



predicate ; but subject and predicate are always 
opposed to each other. 

The first question is : Which is the true subject ? 
Evidently that which is active purely in and upon 
itself; that which determines itself to think an 
object or to will an end ; the Spiritual, the pure 
Egohood. To this is opposed a limited, but exclu- 
sively its own sphere of its possible free acts. By 
ascribing this sphere to itself, it limits itself, and 
changes from the absolute formal to a determined 
material Ego or to a person ; and I hope that these 
two distinct conceptions will not be mixed up with 
each other by the reader. 

The sphere is opposed to the subject signifies : it 
is excluded from the subject, posited outside of it, 
separated from it. Thinking this still more defi- 
nitely, it signifies : the sphere is posited as not ex- 
isting through the in itself returning activity ; and 
the latter is posited as not existing through the 
sphere ; both are mutually independent of and ac- 
cidental for each other. But that, which is thus re- 
lated to the Ego, as independent of it, belongs — ac- 
cording to our previous deductions — to the World. 

, This sphere is therefore posited as a part of the 

' World. 

B. This sphere is posited through an original and 
necessary activity of the Ego, that is, it is contem- 
plated, and thus becomes a Real or an actual some- 
what. 

As certain results of the Science of Knowledge 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



89 



can not be supposed to be known to all readers of 
this work, I here append such as relate to this par- 
agraph : Those persons have not the least concep- 
tion of the Science of Knowledge and of Kant's 
system who believe that in contemplating, there 
is, besides the contemplating subject and the 
contemplation, moreover, a thing, a somewhat, 
upon which the contemplation is directed, as com- 
mon sense generally holds in regard to bodily see- 
ing. On the contrary, through the contemplating 
and only through it does the contemplated arise. 
The Ego returns into itself, and this act furnishes 
contemplation and contemplated object together. 
In contemplation, reason (or the Ego) is by no 
means passive, but absolutely active. In contem- 
plation, reason is the prodtictive power of imagina- 
tion. Through the seeing, or contemplating, some- 
thing is thrown out from the Ego, as it were, some- 
what in the manner that the painter throws out from 
his eye the completed forms upon the canvas, {looks 
them, so to speak, upon the canvas,) before the 
slower hand can draw their outlines. In the same 
manner the sphere is here posited, or contem- 
plated. 

Again : The Ego in contemplating itself as ac- 
tivity contemplates its own activity as a line-drazv- 
ing. This is the original scheme of activity in gen- 
eral, as every one will discover who wishes to ex- 
cite in himself that highest contemplation. This 
original line is pure extension, the common cha- 
racteristic of Time and Space, out of which Time 



90 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



and Space arise only by distinction and further de- 
termination. This hne does not presuppose space, 
but space presupposes it ; and the lines in space, 
that is, the limits of the extended things in space, 
are something utterly different. 

In the same manner the sphere is here produced 
in the form of lines, and thus becomes an Extended 
Somewhat. 

C. This sphere is determined ; hence the produc- 
ing has its limits, and the product is taken hold of 
in the understanding as a completed whole, and 
thus first becomes truly posited, that is, fixed. 

This product determines the person ; the person 
is the same person only in so far as the product is 
the same, and ceases to be the same when the pro- 
duct ceases to be the same. But, according to our 
previous results, the person must posit himself con- 
tinuing, as sure as he posits himself free. Hence 
he also posits that product as continuing the same; 
as permanent, fixed, and unchangeable ; as a whole, 
completed at once. But a fixed and forever deter- 
mined extension is extension in space. Hence that 
sphere is necessarily /fJzV^'^/, as a limited body ex- 
tended in space and filling up its space ; and it 
is necessarily foimd as such body in the analysis, 
the consciousness whereof alone is possible to us ; 
since the synthesis, now described, or the produc- 
tion of that sphere is presupposed only for the pos- 
sibility of the analysis, and thus for the possibility 
of consciousness. 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



91 



D. The deduced material body is posited as the 
sphere of all possible free acts of the person, and as 
nothing else. Therein alone does its essence con- 
sist. 

That a person is free, signifies, according to our 
former results : through his generating a concep- 
tion of an End he at once becomes the cause of 
an object exactly corresponding to that conception ; 
or in other words, only and merely through his will 
does a person become a cause ; for, to trace out a 
conception of an end is, to will. Now, the de- 
scribed body is to contain the free acts of such a 
person ; hence it is in that body that the person 
is cause in the manner stated. Immediately 
through his will, and without any other means, the 
will is realized in the body ; as the person wills, so 
is the will accomplished in the body. 

Again : Since the described body is nothing but 
the sphere of free acts, the conception of the body 
must exhaust the conception of that free sphere, 
and vice versa. The person can not be absolutely 
free cause, that is, can not have a causality result- 
ing immediately from the will — outside of his body.* 
• If a determined will is given, a corresponding de- 
termined change in the body is the necessary re- 
sult. On the other hand, no change can occur in 
the body except through the will of the person ; 
and hence you can with equal certainty conclude 

* How this result is apparently contradicted by the phenomena 
of Mesmerism, and yet only apparently, this is not the place to ex- 
plain. — Tr.\nslator. 



92 



THE SCIENCE OF KICIITS. 



from a given change in the body, as to a determin- 
ed conception of the person, corresj3onding to the 
change. This last result will attain its proper de- 
terminatcncss and full significance only in the 
future. 

E. But how and in what manner can the changes 
in a material body be made to express a conception "i 
Matter, in its essence, is imperishable ; it can not 
be annihilated, nor can new matter be produced. 
The conception of a change in the body can not 
apply to matter in this sense. Again : The posited 
body is to continue uninterruptedly ; hence the same 
parts of the matter are to remain together and to con- 
tinue to constitute the body. It seems, therefore, as 
if the conception of a change could also not be ap- 
plied to the body in this sense. 

The body is matter. Matter is infinitely divisible. 
Now, the material parts of the body would remain, 
and yet would also undergo change, if they changed 
their relation to each other. The relation of the 
manyfold to each other is called the form. Hence 
the parts, in so far as they constitute the form, are 
to remain ; but the form itself is to be changed. (I 
say in so far as they constitute the form ; and hence 
these parts may constantly separate themselves 
from the body — provided they are replaced in the 
same undivided moment by other parts — without 
thereby destroying the required permanency and 
sameness of the body.) Our result is, therefore, 
that the change produced in the body through the 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



conception is in the form of motion of tJie farts of 
the body, and is, therefore, a change of the form. 

F. In the described body the conceptions of the 
person are expressed through a cliangc in the rela- 
tion of the parts to each other. These concep- 
tions, or the will of the person, may be infinitely 
different ; and the body, which is to contain the 
sphere of freedom of such person, must be able 
to express this infinite difference. Hence, each 
part must be able to change its position in relation 
to the other parts, that is, must be able to move 
while all the others are at rest ; to each infinite 
part of the body must be assigned a mobility of 
its oiun. The body must be so constituted, that it 
will always be a matter of freedom to think a part 
larger or smaller, more complicated or more sim- 
ple ; and likewise to think each multiplicity of 
parts as a whole, and then again as a part in re- 
lation to the more extended whole, etc. It is alto- 
gether for thinking to determine every time what is 
to constitute a part. Again : When thinking thus 
determines what is to be a part for the time, a pe- 
culiar motion of such part must be the immediate 
result. 

Something, which is thought as a part in such a 
relation to a whole, is called a member. Each mem- 
ber of the body contains, therefore, members with- 
in itself ; and these again contain members ; and 
so on ad infiniticm. Whatsoever is to be regarded 
for the moment as a member depends altogether 



94 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



upon the causality-conception. The member moves 
when it is regarded as such ; and that, which is 
the whole in relation to it, is then at rest ; and 
again, that which is a part in relation to this mem- 
ber, rests also ; that is, it has no motion of its own, 
only the motion in common with the member. This 
is called Articulation. The deduced body is ne- 
cessarily articulated, and must be posited as such. 

Such a body, to the continuance and identity 
whereof we attach the continuance and identity of 
our personality, and which we posit as a complete 
articulated whole, and in which we posit ourselves 
as having causality immediately through our will, 
is what we call oii.r body. We have thus proved 
what was to be proved. 

§ 6. 

THE PERSON CAN ASCRIBE TO ITSELF NO BODY, 
WITHOUT POSITING SUCH BODY AS UNDER THE 
INFLUENCE OF ANOTHER OUTSIDE PERSON, AND 
WITHOUT, THEREFORE, FURTHER DETERMINING 
SUCH BODY. 

PROOF. 

A. We have shown that the person can not posit 
himself at all with consciousness, unless he posits 
an influence as having occurred upon him. The 
positing of such an influence was the exclusive con- 
dition of all consciousness, and was the first point 
to which the whole consciousness was attached. 
This influence is posited as having occurred upon 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



95 



the determined person, the individual, as sncJi ; for 
we have shown that the rational being can not posit 
itself as a rational being generally, but can posit 
itself only as an individual ; hence an influence 
posited by the person upon himself is necessarily 
an influence upon himself as such individual, be- 
cause he is nothing for himself and can be nothing 
else for himself than an individual. 

We have also shown, that the proposition : an in- 
fluence occurs upon a rational being, signifies the 
same as : its free activity has been canceled in part 
and in a certain respect. Only through this can- 
celing of its activity does an object become for the 
Intelligence, and does the Intelligence conclude 
that there is something which exists not through it. 

An influence has been directed upon the rational 
being, as individual, signifies, therefore : an activity, 
which belongs to it, as an individual, has been can- 
celed. Now the whole sphere of Ins activity, as 
an individual, is his body. Hence the causality of 
the individual in this body, or his power to be cause 
in it, through his mere will, must be canceled ; in 
other words, the influence must have been directed 
upon the body of the person. 

If we, therefore, assume that one of the acts 
which lie within the sphere of the possible acts of 
a person has been canceled, or rendered impossible 
for the moment, we have explained the required in- 
fluence. 

But the person is to refer this influence to him- 
self, that is to say, the person is to posit that mo- 
mentarily canceled activity as one of his possible 



96 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



activities, as contained in the sphere of the utter- 
ances of his freedom. Hence, the person must 
posit that canceled activity in order to be able to 
posit it as canceled ; or, that activity must really 
exist, and must not be canceled. The same deter- 
mined activity of the person must, therefore, in the 
same undivided moment, be canceled, and also be 
not canceled, if a consciousness is to be possible. 
Let us examine how this can be. 

B. All activity of the person is a certain deter- 
mination of the articulated body ; that an activity 
of the person is checked, signifies, therefore, that a 
certain determination of the articulated body is im- 
possible. 

Now the person can not posit at all that his ac- 
tivity is checked, or that in his articulated body a 
certain determination is impossible, without posit- 
ing at the same time such a determination as pos- 
sible ; for only on the condition that a determina- 
tion in the body through mere will is j^ossible, 
does he posit something as his body. Hence, the 
person must posit the very determination, which is 
to be impossible, as possible ; and since the person 
can posit nothing, unless it is, (for the person,) it fol- 
lows that the person must actually produce this de- 
termination. And yet this activity, although it is 
thus actually produced, must always remain check- 
ed and canceled ; for the person only produces it in 
order to be able to posit it as canceled. It thus ap- 
pears that the same determination of the articula- 
tion is both actually produced through the causality 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



97 



of the will and canceled through an external influ- 
ence. Again : The person is to find himself in this 
moment as free in his sphere, is to ascribe the whole 
of his body to himself It is, therefore, necessary 
that even in the sense in which he posits a certain, 
determination of his articulation as canceled, the 
person should retain the power through his mere 
will to remove that canceling influence ; for else the 
person would not ascribe the body at all to him- 
self, in this sense, and would thus not posit an ex- 
ternal influence as having occurred upon it. In 
short, the fact that the canceling remains, must de- 
pend upon the free-will of the person ; and the per- 
son must posit it as possible to I'cmove that can- 
celing. 

How can he posit this possibility .'' Clearly not 
in consequence of a previous experience, for we 
have here the beginning of all experience. Hence, 
in positing, that the production of that determina- 
tion, in the manner in which it actually is pro- 
duced, would certainly remove the canceling, did 
not the person restrain his will to thus remove it. 

In positing this, there is evidently discovered and 
posited a double manner of determining the articu- 
lation, which may be also called a double articula- 
tion, or a double organ; and the relation of this 
duplicity is this : The first mode of determining the 
articulation — wherein the person produces the can- 
celed movement, and which we shall call the higher 
organ — may be modified through the will without 
the other — which we shall call the lozver orgaii — be- 



98 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



ing thereby modified. Higher and lower organs 
are in so far distinguished. But again : If the modi- 
fication of the higher organ is not at the same time 
to modify the lower one, then the person must re- 
strain the will to have the lower organ thus modi- 
fied. Hence, higher and lower organ are also unita- 
ble through the will, and are in so far one and the 
same organ. 

The perception of the required influence upon 
the person requires, therefore, the following : The 
person must give himself up to the influence, must 
not cancel the modification produced thereby in his 
organ. He has the power of thus canceling that 
influence through his mere will, and must restrict 
the freedom of his will if he does not want that in- 
fluence canceled. But furthermore : The person 
must internally reproduce that modification of his 
organ, caused by the external influence upon it. 

We have said a possible manifestation of the free- 
dom of the person is canceled by that influence. 
This does not mean that the activity of the person 
has been made impossible in a certain direction and 
for a certain purpose, but merely that something 
has been produced in the person which the person 
might himself have produced, but which has been 
produced in the person in such a manner that the 
person must ascribe it, not to his own, but to the 
causality of a being outside of himself Indeed, no- 
thing occurs within the perception of a rational be- 
ing, which it does not believe itself capable of pro- 
ducing itself, or the production whereof it may not 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



99 



ascribe to itcslf; for anything else the rational be- 
ing has no sense. What has thus been produced 
within its organ, the rational being reproduces with 
freedom through its higher organ, but in such a 
manner that the reproduction docs not influence 
the lower organ ; for if it did — although it would re- 
sult in precisely the same determination of the ar- 
ticulated body — it would now no longer be a per- 
ceived determination, but a determination produced 
by the person himself It would no longer be the 
product of a foreign and external object, but of the 
own causality of the subject. You can not see, for 
instance, unless you first give yourself up to an in- 
fluence, and then internally reproduce the form of 
the object and actively trace out within you its out- 
lines. You can not hear, unless you internally imi- 
tate the tones through the same organ through 
which, in speaking, the same tones were produced. 
If, however, this internal causality should extend to 
the external organ, you would no longer hear, but 
speak. 

In so far as the relation is as we have described 
it, the articulated body of man is Sense. But it is 
sense only, as every one must see, in relation to an 
influence upon it on the part of a causality, which 
might be its own, but which, in such a case, is not 
its own, but is the causality of an external cause. 

The person under this sort of an influence re- 
mains perfectly and completely free. That which 
the external cause has produced in the person may 
be immediately removed by the person ; and the 



100 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



person posits expressly this power of removing it, 
and hence posits, that the existence of the influ- 
ence depends upon himself Again, if such an in- 
fluence is to occur, the person must with freedom 
imitate it, and must thus cxpi'cssly realize his free- 
dotji in order to be but able to perceive. (We have 
here, by the by, described and extensively deter- 
mined the absolute freedom of reflection^ 

And thus the articulated body of the person has 
indeed been further determined. For it has also 
been posited as Sense; and to enable it to be posit- 
ed as such, higher and lower organs have been as- 
cribed to the body ; of which the lower organ, 
(sense) through which it is related to external ob- 
jects and to rational beings, can be placed under a 
foreign influence, but the higher organ (reflection) 
never. 

C. The described influence upon the subject is 
to be such that only a rational being outside of the 
subject can be posited as its cause ; namely, under 
the assumption that the purpose of that outside ra- 
tional being was thus to influence the subject. But 
it has been shown that no influence can occur upon 
the subject, unless that subject through its own free- 
dom causes the impression made upon it to halt, and 
does then reproduce it internally. The subject it- 
self must act with a fixed end in view ; that is to say, 
it must limit the sum of its freedom, which might 
cancel that impression, to the attainment of the 
proposed end of the cognition, which self-limitation 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. loi 

is indeed the exclusive criterion of Reason. Hence, 
the subject must complete through itself the attain- 
ment of the end of the other outside being ; and 
thus the outside rational being must have calcula- 
ted upon this completion of its purpose through the 
subject, if it really had an end in view. It must, 
therefore, be considered as a rational being, in so 
far as it has limited its own freedom to the manner 
of the given impression, through this presupposition 
of the freedom of the subject. 

But it always remains possible that the manner 
of acting on the part of that outside being was the 
result of chance or of necessity. There is, as yet, 
no ground to assume self-limitation on the part of 
that outside being, unless it can be shown that it 
might have acted differently ; that the fullness of its 
power, if exercised, would have resulted in quite a 
different mode of acting ; and that that fullness of 
power must, therefore, have been restricted, to have 
resulted in the manner it did. 

It must, therefore, be possible for that outside 
being to influence or treat the subject also in an 
opposite manner. 

What is this opposite manner .'' The character 
of the first kind of causality was such that it de- 
pended altogether upon the freedom of my will, 
whether an influence should be exerted upon me or 
not ; for that influence could not occur unless I 
passively submitted to it and then reproduced it as 
having occurred. The character of an opposite 
causality would, therefore, be that it no longer de- 



102 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



pendcd upon my freedom, whether I chose to ob- 
serve the influence or not ; its character implying 
that I must observe it. How is such an influence 
possible ? 

The first kind of influence was dependent upon 
my freedom, because through that mere freedom of 
will I could destroy the produced form of my ar- 
ticulated body if I chose ; under the second kind 
of influence this must, therefore, be impossible. 
The produced form of my body must be firm, in- 
destructible — at least, not destructible through the 
higher organ — my body must be tied to this form, 
and be utterly checked in its movements. From 
such a complete check the reflection upon this 
check would also result necessarily ; not in its 
form, as the result of the check, but in its content, 
as following and directing itself upon the check. 
For a free being finds itself only as free. As sure, 
therefore, as it reflects, it imitates, internally, an in- 
fluence produced upon it, under the presupposition 
that it has the power to break off this influence at 
any moment. It restricts its own freedom. But if 
that influence can no longer be broken off" by the 
mere causality of the will, then such a self-limita- 
tion is also unnecessary. Something is wanting 
which belongs in the reflection of a free being, as 
such, and thus the compulsion is felt. Reflection is 
always accompanied by the feeling of compulsion ; 
for in the articulated body every thing is connected, 
and each part influences all others, in virtue of the 
conception of articulation. 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



103 



This checking of the free movement in my body 
I must necessarily posit as possible ; and thus my 
body is further determined. As its condition I 
must posit outside of me a tough, compact matter, 
capable of resisting; the free movement of my body ; 
and thus through the further determination of my 
body, the sensuous world has also been further de- 
termined.* 

That tough, compact matter can check only a 
part of my free movements, but not all ; for in the 
latter case the freedom of person would be utterly 
annihilated. Hence, I must be able, through the 
free movement of the other part of my body, to re- 
move the check from the limited part, and hence to 
exercise a causality upon the tough matter. The 
body must have physical power to resist the im- 
pression of that matter, if not immediately, through 
the will, at least mediately, through Art, that is, 
through application of the will by means of the free 
parts of the body. But in that case the organ of 
this causality itself must be composed of such a 

* A deduction of such an empirical determination signifies as 
follows : The philosopher shows a priori, that, if one person 
is to influence the other, and each one to know and treat the 
otner as rational being, then such persons must have a common 
sphere of action, a sort of independent body, and outside of this 
body must be, amongst other powers, one power to check its free 
movement. He then looks around in the sensuous world, points to 
tough matter, and says, Here we have found what reason required. 
It was sure to be found, but I could not tell a priori what it was ; 
could merely say it must be somewhere and of some character ; and 
now a posteriori I can tell you, it is tough matter. — Translator's 
Remark. 



104 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



tough substance ; and the superiority of a rational 
being over matter arises only from the freedom to 
work out conceptions. Matter works only by me- 
chanical laws, and has thus only one mode of work- 
ing, whereas the free being has many modes. 

If my body consists of tough, hard matter, and 
has the power to modify all matter of the sensuous 
world, and to form it after my conception, then the 
body of the person outside of me consists of the 
same matter and has the same power. Now, my 
body itself being matter, it is, as such, an object of 
the physical influence of the other person ; a pos- 
sible object, whose free movements he can check 
altogether. If he had considered and treated me 
as such mere matter, in the presupposed case, he 
would have treated me thus. But he has not done 
so ; hence he has not conceived me to be mere mat- 
ter, but to be a rational being, by the conception 
whereof he has restricted his own freedom ; and 
from this his treatment I am now authorized to 
draw the conclusion, that the influence exercised 
upon me was the influence of a rational being. 

We have thus established the criterion of the re- 
ciprocal influence of rational beings upon each other. 
That influence always presupposes, that the object 
of the influence has sensuousness, and is not, like 
mere matter, to be modified by physical power. 

D. In the described influence, the organ of the 
Subject has been actually modified through an ex- 
ternal person. This has been done neither through 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



105 



the immediate bodily touch of that other person nor 
through some firm matter ; for the latter would not 
involve the conception of the influence of a person. 
How then ? 

The organ is, at all events, something material, 
the whole body being material ; and the organ must 
therefore have been modified, brought into and re- 
tained in a certain foiTO, and likewise through some 
external matter. The mere will of the subject would 
cancel this form ; and he must restrain his will, not 
to destroy it. The matter through which this form 
has been produced is, therefore, no tough, firm mat- 
ter, the parts whereof could be separated by the mere 
will, but a finer, more subtle matter. Such a sub- 
tle matter must be necessarily posited as condition 
of the required influence upon the sensuous world. 

The modification of the organ for the influence 
through freedom is not to affect at all the organ for 
the influence through compulsion, but is to leave it 
utterly free. Hence, the finer matter must influ- 
ence only the former and not in any way the latter 
organ ; it must be a matter, the component joarts 
whereof have no connection perceptible to the lovv^- 
er organ, that is, to the organ under compulsion. 

In the described condition I assume the power to 
react upon this subtle matter through the mere will, 
by means of an affection of the higher through the 
lower organ ; for it has been expressly stated, that 
I must hold back such a movement of the lower or- 
gan, in order not to destroy the determination pro- 
duced in the higher organ ; hence, I must also hold 



I06 THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 

back the power, to give another determination to 
that more subtle matter. The subtle matter is there- 
fore for me modifiable through the mere zvill. 

To meet in advance any possible misapprehen- 
sion, I add a few words. A double organ has been 
posited ; a higher and a lower organ. The higher 
organ is that which is modified through the subtle 
matter ; the lower organ is that which can be check- 
ed by the tough and hard matter. 

Two cases are possible : 

Either the person is influenced as a free being. 
In that case the higher organ is modified through 
a certain form of the more subtle matter ; and if 
the person is to perceive this influence, he must re- 
strain the movement of the lower organ in so far as 
it is related to that part of the higher organ, but 
must at the same time — only internally, however — 
imitate the particular movement which he would 
have to make, in order to produce himself that par- 
ticular given modification of the higher organ. For 
instance, if you perceive an object in Space through 
Sight, you internally — but with the quickness of 
lightning, and hence imperceptibly — imitate the 
feeling of the object, that is, imitate the pressure 
which would be needed to produce that object 
through plastic ; and the impression in the eye is 
retained, as the scheme of this imitation. This 
explains why uneducated people, people who have 
not yet attained facility in executing the functions 
of mankind, when they wish to look carefully at an 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



107 



elevated body, or even at a painting, engraving, 
book, etc., always want to touch what they see. 
Again : A person, who hears, can not possibly at 
the same time speak ; for he must, in hearing, imi- 
tate the tones which he hears, through his organ of 
speech, by reproducing them. This explains why 
some people often ask you to repeat what you have 
said. They heard it well enough, but did not be- 
come conscious of it, because they did not rejDro- 
duce your words internally. Frequently such peo- 
ple must repeat your words loudly to themselves 
before they can understand them. In this case, 
therefore, the body serves as organ, as sense, and 
as higher sense. 

Or, the second case, a modification is produced 
in the higher organ through the mere will of the 
person, accompanied by the will that the lower or- 
gan shall be correspondingly moved by this will. 
In that case, if the lower organ is not checked, the 
intended movement results, and through that move- 
ment the intended modification of the subtle or 
tough matter also results. Thus, for instance, you 
form in the eye, as an active organ, the figures you 
intend to sketch or the words you intend to write, 
and throw them outside of you, long before the 
hand, which obeys your eye, can draw or write them. 
In this case the body serves as tool. 

If the intended movement of the lower orgaa 
does not result — the movement of the higher organ, 
always results so long as the person is alive — then 



H 



I08 THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 

the lower organ is checked ; and in that case, the 
body serves as sense, but as lower sense. 

When one rational being affects another rational 
being as mere matter, then the lower sense of that 
being is also affected, it is true, and is so affected 
necessarily and altogether independently of the free- 
dom of that being, (as the lower sense is indeed al- 
ways affected ;) but it is not to be assumed that this 
affection was in the intention of the person who 
produced it. His intention was merely to attain 
his purpose, to express his conception in matter, 
and he never took into consideration whether that 
matter would feel it or not. Hence, the reciprocal 
influence of rational beings upon each other, as 
such, always occurs by means of the higher sense ; 
for only the higher sense is one which can not be 
aftected without having been presupposed. Our cri- 
terion of this reciprocal influence remains, there- 
fore, correct. 

E. As condition of self-consciousness an external 
influence has been posited, and by virtue thereof a 
certain nature of the body has been posited, and as 
a result of this nature of the body a certain condi- 
tion of the sensuous world has been posited. Our 
argument was : If consciousness is to be possible, 
then the sensuous world must be constituted in that 
manner and must have that relation to our body 
which has been specified. 

We have also shown up, as condition of self-con- 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 109 

sciousness, a community of free individuals, and 
from this necessary condition we have deduced the 
further determination of the body, and, by its means, 
of the sensuous world. The argument here was : 
Because there is to be in the sensuous world a com- 
munity of free beings, therefore the world must be 
thus or thus constituted. But such a community 
of free beings is only in so far as it is posited 
through these beings — on no account with freedom 
on their part, but with absolute necessity ; and 
whatsoever is thus posited has reality for us. 

F. I ascribe to myself a higher and lower organ, 
related to each other as stated above ; and in con- 
sequence thereof assume in the sensuous world out- 
side of me a coarser and a finer matter, related to 
my organs as stated above. Such a positing is, as 
we have shown, a necessary condition of self-con- 
sciousness, and hence is involved in the conception 
of a person. If I posit, therefore, a person outside 
of me, I must necessarily assume that that person 
posits the same, or, in other words, I must ascribe 
to that person also, as I did to myself, the posses- 
sion and use of two such distinct organs, and must 
assume for that person also, as I assumed for my- 
self, the real existence of such a determined sensu- 
ous world. 

This transferring my necessary thinking to an- 
other person, is also involved in the conception of a 
person. Hence, I must also assume of the other 
person, that in the same manner he assumes of me 



no 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



what I assume of him, and that he also assumes 
that I assume the same of him. In other words, 
the conceptions of the determined articulation of 
rational beings and of the sensuous world outside 
of them, are necessarily exchangeable conceptions ; 
conceptions concerning which all rational beings 
agree beforehand, without any previous understand- 
ing, and thus agree necessarily, bccati.se the per- 
sonality of each involves the same manner of contem- 
plating. Each one can justly assume of the other 
and claim that that other must have the same con- 
ceptions on these matters, as sure as the other pre- 
tends to be a rational being. 

G. But a new objection arises, which must be an- 
swered before the body of a rational being can be 
completely determined. It has been asserted that 
I can not attain self-consciousness except through 
the influence of a rational being outside of me. 
Now, although it depends solely upon my freedom 
whether I choose to surrender myself to that influ- 
ence or not, and although the manner of my react- 
ing upon that influence is altogether within my free 
will, still, the possibility of my thus giving utter- 
ance to my freedom is conditioned by the occur- 
rence of the influence from without — no such ex- 
ternal influence, no possibility for me to manifest 
my freedom. Hence, so far as actuality is concern- 
ed, I am made a rational being. True, so far as the 
power of freedom is concerned, I am free before ; 
but in actuality I can not become a free or rational 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



being unless that external influence is directed upon 
me. Hence, my rationality depends upon the arbi- 
trariness or the good-will of another — upon chance ; 
and all rationality depends upon chance. 

But this can not be ; for if it were, I could not be 
independent as a person ; I could only be the acci- 
dence of another person, who again would be the 
accidence of a third, and so on ad infinitum. 

This contradiction can not be solved otherwise 
than by the presupposition that the other has al- 
ready been compelled, in that original influence upon 
me, to treat me as a rational being, {compelled, of 
course, as a rational being, that is to say, he has felt 
himself consistently bound,) and that he has been 
compelled to treat me thus by me ; that, therefore, 
in that first original influence upon me, which made 
me dependent upon him, he was also, at the same 
time, dependent upon me ; that, therefore, that very 
first and original relation between us was already a 
relation of reciprocal causality. 

But this seems impossible. For previous to that 
influence I am not at all I ; have not posited my- 
self; since the positing of myself is possible only 
on condition of that external influence upon me. 
How then can I have causality upon the other per- 
son before I have posited myself .'' I am to have 
causality without having it ; to influence the other 
person without being active. How is this thinka- 
ble ? 

I. To influence without influeitcing signifies to 



113 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



have a mere power to influence. This mere power 
is to influence, is to have causaUty. But a power is 
only an ideal conception, and it would be an empty 
thought to ascribe to such a power the exclusive 
predicate of reality, namely, causality, without as- 
suming that power as realized. 

Now, the whole power of the person is assuredly 
realized in the sensuous world, in the conception of 
his body, which body is as sure as the person is, 
and continues as long as the person continues, and 
which body, moreover, is a completed Whole of 
material parts, and has, therefore, a determined ori- 
ginal form. 

It is, therefore, required that my body should have 
causality, should be active, and yet that / should not 
be active in that activity. 

2. But my body is my body only in so far as it is 
placed in motion by my will, and otherwise it is 
only a mass of matter ; my body is active as my 
body only in so far as / am active through it. 
Now, in the present case I am not to be active, 
am not even to be I. Hence, my body can not be 
active. 

It must, therefore, be thus : Through its mere 
existence in space, and through its form, my body 
must exercise an influence of such a nature that 
every rational being will be bound to consider me 
as a being gifted with reason, and hence to treat 
me as such. 

3. The first and most difficult question is, now. 



TITE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 113 

How can any thing exercise an influence through 
its mere existence in space, without any mo- 
tion ? 

The influence is to be exercised upon a rational 
being, as such ; hence, it must occur, not through 
an immediate touching and checking of its lower 
organ, but must be brought to bear upon its higher 
organ, hence by means of the more subtle matter. 
Now, it is true that, in our above description, we 
have assumed this subtle matter to be a means 
whereby rational beings influence each other, in 
modifying it through their higher organ. This is 
not, however, to be the case here. In our case, the 
human body is to produce an influence in its state 
of repose, without any activity ; and accordingly the 
more subtle matter must be posited in our case as 
modifiable by the mere form of the body in its state 
of repose, and as modifying the higher organ of 
another rational being through this its modification. 
In so far, moreover, as the human body is here re- 
garded merely as form, the same must be the case 
in respect to every other form. 

(It has not been proved, that the here deduced 
more f ubtle matter, by means of which the mere 
reposmg form in space is to exercise an influence, 
is specifically different from the previously deduced 
more subtle matter, but simply that the more subtle 
matter must have these two predicates. For if we 
had wished to prove the former, we should have had 
to show that the subtle matter, whereby the repos 



114 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



ing form is to exercise an influence, could not be 
possibly placed in motion by the movement of the 
higher organ, and hence must be specifically dis- 
tinct. Now, although this proof is not exactly ne- 
cessary here, I will append it, as follows : 

The form of the person outside of me must con- 
tinue to be the same, as we have shown. Now, if 
we reciprocally influence each other only by means 
of a subtle matter, which can be placed in motion, 
(Azf,) — that is to say, only by speaking with each 
other — then that matter, A, would continually 
change, and if received the impression of our 
forms, would continually change those forms, and 
hence those persons. But as those persons must 
remain the same, it is requisite that the matter in 
which our forms are impressed must remain im- 
movable amidst all the motion of the other matter. 
A must, therefore, be not modifiable through our 
organ, and in so far distinct from A. Let us call it 
B, or LigJit. (The appearances in light can, there- 
fore, be modified by us only indirectly, namely, in 
so far as we can modify that appearance itself, or 
the form of our body.) 

4. My body must be visible to the person outside 
of me, must appear and have appeared to that per- 
son through the medium of the light, as sure as 
that other person exercises an influence upon me. 
Thus our first question is answered. 

But now comes the second question. For, ac- 
cording to our necessary presupposition, this ap- 
pearance is to be of such a nature that it absolutely 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



can not be understood and comprehended except 
by assuming it to be the appearance (form) of a 
rational being. My form must be of such a cha- 
racter that I can say to each other person : As soon 
as you see this (my) form, you are necessitated te 
consider it as the representative of a rational being 
in the sensuous world, if you are yourself a rational 
being. How is this possible .'' 

First of all, what does this signify, to understand 
or comprehend It signifies to fix, to determine, to 
limit. I have comprehended an appearance, when 
I have received through it a perfect whole of a 
knowledge, which, in all its parts, is grounded in 
itself ; whereof each part is explained and ground- 
ed through all others, and vice versa. (So long as 
I am still explaining, still floating and undetermined 
in my belief, still driven from one part of my know- 
ledge to other parts, I have not yet comprehended. 
I have not comprehended A as an accidental until I 
have ascertained its cause ; and as A is a deter- 
mined accidental, its determined cause.) 

To say, therefore, I can not understand an ap- 
pearance except in a certain manner, signifies : each 
separate part of the appearance impels me onward 
to a certain point, and only when I have arrived at 
this point can I place the several parts in order and 
gather them all into a whole of knowledge. 

To say, therefore, I can not comprehend the ap- 
pearance of a human body except by assuming it 
to be the body of a rational being, signifies : in 
gathering together its several parts, I can not stop 



Il6 THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 

until I have arrived at the point which forces me to 
consider it the body of a thinking being. 

I shall proceed to the strict genetical proof of 
this result ; sketching, however, only its chief fea- 
tures ; for, as a whole in its completeness, it forms a 
science of its own, the science of Anthropology. 

I. It must be necessary to think the human body 
as a Whole, and impossible to think its parts se- 
parately as we can think coarse matter, sand 
earth, etc. What must thus be thought as a Whole, 
in order to be thought at all, is called an organized 
product of nature. The human body must, there- 
fore, be firstly such an organized product of nature. 
The distinction of such an organized product of 
nature from a product of art, which also can only be 
thought as a Whole, lies in this : In both products 
each part exists only for the sake of the others, and 
hence for the sake of the whole ; and our judgment 
in considering either product is forced to proceed 
from one part to the other, till all have been gath- 
ered together. But in the product of nature the 
Whole also exists for the sake of the parts, and 
has, as a Whole, no other purpose than to produce 
these determined parts ; whereas, in the product of 
art, the Whole does not thus refer back to the 
parts, but refers to an external purpose. The pro- 
duct of nature exists for its own sake ; the product 
of art for the sake of a purpose, or as a tool. 
Again : In the product of nature each single part 
produces itself by its inner power ; but in the pro- 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



117 



duct of art, before even it can become such, this 
inner power of self-development is killed off, and 
in the composition of its parts this inner power is 
not at all taken into calculation. It is composed 
simply according to mechanical laws ; and hence 
it refers to an external originator, whereas the pro- 
duct of nature produces and maintains itself. 

II. An appearance has been completely compre- 
hended by the presupposition that it is a product 
of nature, if all that occurs in it refers back to or- 
ganization and can be completely explained by the 
end and aim of this determined organization. For 
instance, the highest and last manifestation of the 
organizing power in plants is the seed. Now, this 
seed is completely explainable from the organiza- 
tion as its end, that is, as the means' of propagating 
the plant ; and through this seed the power of or- 
ganization returns into itself and recommences its 
career. The act of organization thus never closes, 
but always rushes along in an endless circle. 

But that an appearance has not been completely 
comprehended by that presupposition, signifies, that 
the highest and final product of the power of or- 
ganization can not be referred back as means to 
that power, but rather points to quite another pur- 
pose. True, you continue the explanation according 
to the laws of organization for some time, (whereas, 
in the product of art you can not apply this law at 
all,) but after a while you discover that you can no 
longer use it to explain ; that is, its final product 



Il8 THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 

can not be again related to it. Hence, the circle is 
not closed, and the comprehension not completed ; 
that is to say, nothing has been comprehended, the 
appearance has not been understood. (It is true, 
man also completes the circle of organization by 
the propagation of his species. He is a perfect 
plant, but he is also something more.) 

Now, such a final product of the power of organ- 
ization, which can not be referred back again to it, 
is Articulation. Articulation is both visible and a 
product of organization ; but articulation does not 
again produce organization, and rather refers to 
another end ; that is to say, it can only be gather- 
ed together completely in another conception. 
Tbi:; other conception can be the conception of 
f'-ee movement, and in so far man is an animal. 

HI. But this presupposition of free movement 
?lso must be insufficient for the comprehension of 
Ihe human body. Its articulation, therefore, must 
be incomprehensible in any determined conception. 
It must not refer to a definite, determined sphere of 
arbitrary motion, as in the case of the animal, but 
to all infinitely thinkable motions. There must be, 
not a determinedness of articulation, but an infi- 
nite determinability of articulation ; not develop- 
ment, but developability. In short, all animals are 
perfect and complete ; man, however, is merely sug- 
gested. A rational observer of the human body 
can unite its parts in no conception, except in the 
conception of a rational being like himself, or in 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



119 



the conception of freedom as given to him m his 
self-consciousness. He must subsume the concep- 
tion of his own Ego to his contemplation of that 
other human body, because that body expresses no 
conception of its own, and can only be explained 
by that conception of his own Ego. Every animal 
is what it is ; man alone is originally nothing at all. 
What man is to be, he must become ; and as he is 
to be a being for himself, must become through 
himself. Nature completed all her works ; only 
from man did she withdraw her hands, and pre- 
cisely thereby gave him over to himself. Cultiva- 
bility, as such, is the character of mankind. The 
impossibility of subsuming to the human form any 
other conception than that of his own Ego, is it, 
which forces every man inwardly to consider every 
other man as his equal. 

COROLLARIA. 

I. It is a vexatious question, which, so far as I 
know. Philosophy has never yet solved : How do we 
come to transfer to some object of the sensuous 
world the conception of rationality and not to oth- 
ers ; or what is the characteristic distinction of 
both classes } 

Kant says : " Act so that the principle of thy will 
can be the principle of a universal legislation." But 
who shall belong to the empire which is governed 
by this legislation, and who shall enjoy its protec- 
tion } I am required to treat certain beings in 
such a manner that I can desire them to treat me 



120 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



according to the same principle. But I act every 
day upon animals and lifeless objects without ever 
seriously entertaining that rule. I am told : Of 
course, the rule applies only to beings who are ca- 
pable of being conscious of laws, hence of rational 
beings. But who is to tell me what specific ob- 
jects in nature are rational beings ; whether, per- 
haps, only the white European or also the black 
negro, whether only the full-grown man or also the 
child, can claim the protection of that legislation ; 
or whether, perhaps, the faithful house-dog may not 
likewise claim it Until this question has been an- 
swered, Kant's rule has neither applicability nor 
reality, however excellent it may be. 

Nature has decided this question long ago. There 
is probably no man who, at the first glimpse of an- 
other man, will take to flight, as at the view of a wild 
animal, or prepare to kill and eat him like a piece 
of game ; or who would not, on the contrary, en- 
deavor to enter into mutual communication with 
him. This is so, not through habit and education, 
but through nature and reason, and we have just 
shown up the law by virtue of which it is so. 

Let no one believe, however, that man must first 
go through that long and tiresome process of rea- 
soning, which we have just gone through, in order 
to arrive at the comprehension that a certain exter- 
nal body is his equal. That recognition either does 
not take place at all, or it occurs at once without 
consciousness of the ground thereof. It is only 
the philosopher's business to discover these grounds. 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



121 



II. Every animal, a few hours after its birth, 
moves to seek nourishment at the breasts of its 
mother, guided by the animal instinct, or the law 
of certain free motions, which is likewise the ground 
of the so-called art-instinct of animals. Man also 
has instinct, but not animal instinct in the above 
significance ; he has only plant-instinct. He needs 
the free help of men, and without it would die a 
few hours after his birth. As soon as he leaves the 
womb of his mother, nature withdraws her hands 
from him and casts him aside, as it were. Plinius 
and others have been very bitter against man's cre- 
ator on 'that account. This may be rhetorical, but 
it is not philosophical. For the very abandonment 
of man proves that he is not, and is not to be, the 
pupil of nature. If man is an animal, then he is a 
very imperfect animal ; and for that very reason is 
he no animal. It has often been considered, as if 
the free spirit existed in man to take care of the 
animal. Such is not the case. On the contrary, 
the animal exists to bear the free spirit into the 
sensuous world, and to connect him with it. 

This utter heliDlessness throws mankind back 
upon itself, maintains and unites the species. As 
the tree keeps up its species by casting off its 
fruits, so man, by taking care of and educating the 
helpless new-born child, maintains himself as spe- 
cies. Thus reason produces itself, and only thus is 
the progress of reason toward perfection possible. 
In this manner are the links connected with each 



122 



THE SCIENCE OF RIcrrTS. 



other, and each future one contains the spiritual re- 
sults of all previous links. 

III. Man is born naked ; the animals are born 
covered. In creating animals, nature has complet- 
ed her work and impressed upon it the seal of com- 
pletion, by protecting the finer organization, through 
a coarser covering, against the influence of the 
coarser matter. But in man, the very first and 
most important organ, that of touch, v^^hich is 
spread over his whole skin, has been left utterly 
exposed to the influence of the coarser matter, not 
through any neglect on the part of nature, but be- 
cause of her respect for us. That organ was des- 
tined by nature to touch matter immediately, in 
order to make it most proper to our purpose ; but 
nature left us perfectly free to determine in what 
particular part of our body to locate that power of 
moulding matter, and what part of our body we 
might choose to consider as mere matter. We 
have located that power in the tips of our fingers, 
from a reason which will soon appear. It is there 
because we so willed it. We might have given to 
each part of our body the same delicate touch, if 
we had so willed it. This is proven by those men 
who write and sew with their toes, who speak with 
their bellies, etc. 

IV. Each animal has, as we remarked before, in- 
born powers of motion ; for example, the beaver, 
the bee, etc. But man has nothing of the kind, and 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



123 



even the new-born child's position on the back is 
given to it in order to prepare it for the future walk. 
The question has been asked : Was man intended 
walk upright or on four feet ? I believe he was not 
intended to do either. It was left to man as spe- 
cies, to choose its mode of motion. A human body 
can run on four feet ; and men grown up amongst 
animals have so run with incredible swiftness. I 
hold that the species has, by its own choice, freely 
lifted itself up from the earth, and thus acquired 
for itself the power of looking around in every di^ 
rection and of surveying one half of the universe 
in the skies, whilst the animal is, by its position, 
chained to the soil which brings forth its nourish- 
ment. By thus lifting himself up from the ground, 
man has won from nature two tools of freedom ; 
the two arms, which, no longer required to do ani- 
mal functions, now hang down, awaiting merely the 
command of the will, and cultivated solely with a 
view to carry out those commands. Through his 
daring gait, which is an everlasting expression of 
his boldness and expertness, man continually keeps 
his free-will and reason in practice, always remains 
a becoming, and expresses this, his character. This 
gait of his lifts up his life into the region of light ; 
by its means he touches the earth with the least 
possible part of his body. Animals use the earth 
as their bed and table ; man lifts his bed and table 
above the earth, 

V. What characterizes the cultivated man above 

I 



124 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



all is the spiritual eye and the mouth, which betrays 
the most secret feelings of the heart in its move- 
ments. I mention the eye, not because it is moved 
about by the muscles wherein it is fixed, and can 
cast its glances hither and thither ; a mobility, 
which the erect walk of man serves to heighten, 
it is true, but which, in itself, is mechanical. I 
speak of it, because the eye is to the man not 
merely a dead, passive mirror, like the plane of a 
sheet of water, or like an artificially prepared look- 
ing-glass, or like the eye of an animal, but rather 
a mighty organ, which self-actively sketches and re- 
produces the forms in space ; which self-actively 
creates, looks out of itself, the figures, which are 
to be hewn out of the marble or painted upon the 
canvas before chisel or brush has been touched ; 
which self-actively creates a picture for the arbitra- 
rily sketched .spiritual conception. Through this 
infinite living and moving of the parts amongst 
each other, that what they have of earthly sub- 
stance in them is, as it were, stripped off, and the 
eye, clearing itself into light, becomes a visible soul. 
Hence, the more spiritual self-activity there is in a 
man, the more spiritual does his eye become ; and 
the less spiritual activity, the more does the eye re- 
main a dark, fog-covered mirror. 

The mouth, which nature formed for the lowest 
and most selfish occupation, nourishment, becomes, 
through self-culture, the expression of all social 
sentiments, as it is also the organ of communica- 
tion. As the individual or the race is more animal 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



125 



and selfish, does the mouth protrude more ; as the 
race grows nobler, the mouth recedes behind the 
arch of the thinking forehead. 

All this, the whole expressive face, is nothing, as 
we come out of the hands of nature ; is merely a 
soft, impressible substance, wherein you can, at the 
utmost, discover what is to become of it by trans- 
ferring the picture of your own culture upon it ; 
and this very lack of completion makes man capa- 
ble of culture. 

All this — and not in the separate parts, wherein 
the philosopher represents it, but seized in its sur- 
prising connection as a whole, as which it appears 
to the senses — is it, which forces every one, who 
bears a human face, to respect and recognize every 
one who bears a human face, whether it be merely 
suggested in dim outlines or already elevated to a 
certain degree of completion. The human form is 
necessarily sacred to man. 

§ 7. 

PROOF THAT, THROUGH THE FOREGOING SIX PRO- 
POSITIONS, THE APPLICABILITY OF THE CONCEP- 
TION OF RIGHTS HAS BECOME POSSIBLE. 

A Persons, as such, are to be absolutely free, and 
dependent only upon their will. Again : as sure as 
they are persons they are to be reciprocally influ- 
enced by each other, and hence not to be depen- 
dent solely upon their will. How both these re- 
quirements may be possible, it is the task of the 



126 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



Science of Rights to determine ; and its problem 
is, therefore, How may a coinmimity of free beings, 
as such, be possible ? 

We have shown the external conditions of this 
possibility. We have explained how, under this 
presupposition, persons, who mutually influence 
each other, and how the sphere of this their reci- 
procal influence, the sensuous world, must be con- 
stituted. The proof of our results rests altogether 
on the presupposition of such a community, and 
that presupposition is again based on the possibi- 
lity of self-consciousness. Hence, all our previous 
results have been deduced by mediated conclusions 
from the postulate, I am I, and are, therefore, as 
certain as that postulate is. Our systematic pro- 
cedure leads us now to develop the internal condi- 
tions of such a reciprocal influence. 

The last point which we reached, and from which 
we now proceed further, was this : All arbitrary re- 
ciprocal causality of free beings has for its basis or 
ground an original and necessary reciprocal causa- 
lity of those beings, which is, that each free being, 
by its mere presence in the sensuous world, com- 
pels all other free beings to recognize it as a person. 
It furnishes the fixed appearance ; the other free 
being furnishes the fixed conception. Both are 
necessarily united, and there is not the smallest 
play-room for freedom. Through this there arises 
a common recognition, but nothing further. Both 
internally recognize each other, but they remain 
isolated as before. 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



127 



Each has this conception of the other : that the 
other is a free being, and must not be treated as a 
mere thing. Now, if this conception did in both 
determine all their other conceptions, and, since 
their will belongs to their conceptions, did de- 
termine also their will, and through it all their ac- 
tions ; in other words, if they could not think and 
will otherwise than under this conception, then it 
would be impossible for them even to will to influ- 
ence each other arbitrarily, or as things ; they could 
not ascribe to themselves the power of influencing 
each other as things, and hence could neither have 
that power. 

This evidently is not the case. For each has 
also posited the body of the other as matter, as 
modifiable matter, and each has ascribed to himself 
the power to modify matter. Each can, therefore, 
clearly subsume the body of the other, in so far as 
that body is matter, to that general conception of 
modifiable matter ; can think himself modifying the 
body of the other through physical power ; and 
hence — since his will can be limited only through 
his thinking — can also zvill thus to modify the 
other's body. 

But for that very same reason, that is, because 
he is free, can every one restrict the exercise of his 
power, can he give a law to that exercise, and hence 
can he give to it the law, never to treat the other's 
body as a mere thing. The validity of that law 
depends, therefore, upon the fact whether a man is 
consistent or not. But consistency in this case 



128 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



depends upon the freedom of the will ; and there 
is no more reason why a man should be consistent, 
unless he is compelled to be so, than there is why 
he should not be consistent. The law must, there- 
fore, be applied to this freedom ; and thus we have 
here the boundary-line between necessity and free- 
dom for the Science of Rights. 

B. We have said that no absolute ground can 
be shown why the rational being should be consis- 
tent, and hence why it should adopt that law for its 
freedom. Perhaps, however, an hypothetical ground 
might be discovered. 

It certainly can be shown that, if an absolute 
community is to be established between persons, 
as such, each member thereof must assume the 
above law ; for only by constantly treating each 
■other as free beings can they remain free beings or 
persons. Moreover, since it is possible for each 
member to treat the other as not a free being, but 
as a mere thing, it is also conceivable that each 
member may form the resolve, never to treat the 
others as mere things, but always as free beings ; 
and since for such a resolve no other ground is 
discoverable than that such a community of free 
beings ojight to exist, it is also conceivable that 
each member should have formed that resolve from 
this ground and upon this presupposition. 

If it could, therefore, be moreover shown that 
each rational being must necessarily desire such a 
community, then the necessity of the postulated 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



129 



consequence would also ai^pcar, namely, that each 
individual must form that resolve, and must be con- 
sistent. But that desire can not be proved from 
our previous premises. True, it has been shown 
that, if a rational being is to attain self-conscious- 
ness, and is, therefore, to become a rational being, 
another rational being must necessarily have affect- 
ed it as a rational being. In fact, these are ex- 
changeable, identical conceptions ; no such affec- 
tion or influence, no rational being. 

But it does not follow that, after self-conscious- 
ness has been posited, rational beings must always 
rationally influence each other ; nor can this be 
deduced from the former without using the result, 
which is to be proved, as proof. 

The postulate, that a community of free beings 
is to remain permanent, appears, therefore, to be an 
arbitrary postulate ; or a postulate which each per- 
son may adopt for himself, if he so wills. If he 
adopts it, he is, of course, also bound to submit 
himself to the above law, that is, always to treat all 
other persons as free beings. 

We are here, therefore, as before remarked, on 
the boundary-hne between necessity and freedom, 
the line which separates the Science of Morality 
from the Science of Rights. The proposition which 
forms the line is : The rational being is not abso- 
lutely bound by its character of rationality, to 
desire the freedom of all other rational beings. 

The Science of Morality shows that every ra- 
tional being is absolutely bound to desire the free- 



I30 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



dom of all other rational beings. The Science of 
Rights does not show this, but says : Each rational 
being has the freedom to desire it or not to desire 
it ; and then shows the result of either act. 

C. Let us suppose that I have resolved with full 
freedom to enter into a community with free beings, 
say with the free being C. What is the result of 
this resolve .'' Let us analyze it. 

I intend to enter into a community of mutual 
rational treatment with C. But a community in- 
volves many. Hence I add, in thinking, the per- 
son C to my resolve, and assume, in my conception 
of C, that he has the same resolve ; and since I 
framed that resolve with freedom, I also assume C 
to have framed his voluntarily. I therefore posit 
necessarily our community as dependent equally 
upon the free resolve of C ; hence as accidental, as 
the result of a mutual willing. 

I desire nothing further than to be in this com- 
munity of rational intercourse with C ; we both to 
treat each other alike ; he me, I him. Hence, in 
case he should not treat me thus, I have posited 
nothing. For I have posited in that resolve only 
that we are mutually to treat each other as free be- 
ings ; but have posited nothing for the case, that 
he may treat me otherwise. I have neither posited 
that I shall treat him as a rational being, if he does 
not treat me as such, nor that in such case I shall 
treat him not as a rational being. In short, I have 
posited nothing for such a case. As soon as his 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



treatment no longer corresponds to my conception 
of him as a rational being, that conception falls to 
the ground, and the law, which I formed in conse- 
quence of that conception, also falls to the ground. 
I am no longer bound by that law, and again am 
dependent solely upon my free-will. 

D. Our present result is, therefore, as follows : It 
is impossible to show an absolute ground why any 
one should make the fundamental principle of the 
Science of Rights, " Limit thy freedom in such a 
manner that others can also be free," the law of 
his will and of his actions. It can be shown, how- 
ever, that a community of free beings, as such, 
can not exist, unless every member is subjected to 
this law ; and that, therefore, each person who de- 
sires such a community must also desire this law. 
That law has, therefore, only hypothetical validity ; 
namely, if a community of free beings is to be pos- 
sible, then the principle of Rights must be valid. 

But even the condition, the community of free 
beings, is again conditioned by a common desire. 
No one can, by his own mere will, realize such a 
community with another unless the other has the 
same will, and by virtue thereof subjects himself 
to the principle of law conditioned thereby. If the 
other one has not this will, as is most clearly prov- 
ed when he treats the other person contrary to that 
principle of law, then the first person is absolved 
by the law itself from the law. For the law had 
validity only under condition of the lawful be- 



132 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



havior of the other ; and this condition not being 
given, the law, by its own conception, is not appli- 
cable to the case, and the first person — unless there 
is another law ; but this the Science of Rights does 
not presuppose — is now no longer bound by the 
law ; he can act toward the other as he chooses ; 
he has a right against the other. 

The difficulty, which previous treatments of the 
Science of Rights generally have left unsolved, is 
this : How can a law command by not command- 
ing, or how can law have causality by utterly ceas- 
ing to exist ; or, how can it comprise a sphere by 
not comprising it ? The answer is, it must result 
thus necessarily as soon as the law lorescribes to 
itself a definite sphere and carries with it the quan- 
tity of its validity. As soon as it utters the sphere 
whereof it speaks, it determines thereby also the 
sphere whereof it does not speak, and confesses 
expressly that it does not prescribe for that other 
sphere. 

For instance, the law commands that the other 
person shall treat me as a rational being. He does 
not do so ; and the law now absolves mc from all 
obligation to treat him as a rational being. But by 
that very absolving it makes itself valid. For the 
law, in saying that it depends now altogether upon 
my free-will how I desire to treat the other, or that 
I have a compulsory right against him, says, vir- 
tually, that the other person can not prevent my 
tompulsion ; that is, can not prevent it through 
the mere principle of lazv, though he may prevent 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



it through physical strength, or through an appeal 
to morality, (may induce me to forego my compel- 
ling him, or prevent me from compelling him by 
superior strength.) 

CONCLUDING REMARKS. 

The applicability of the Conception of Rights is 
now completely secured, and its limits have been 
definitely fixed. 

A sure criterion has been established, to which 
of the sensuous beings the Conception of Rights 
applies, and to which it does not apply. Each be- 
ing, which has human form, is internally compelled 
to recognize every other being which has the same 
form as a rational being, and thus as a possible sub- 
ject for the Conception of Rights. But whatso- 
ever has not that form is to be excluded from the 
sphere of rights, and can not be said to have 
rights. 

The possibility of a reciprocal causality of free 
and rational beings, which causality the Concep- 
tion of Rights must determine, has also been prov- 
^ ed. It has been shown that such beings can have 
causality upon each other and still remain free. 

The fundamental principle of law, as law gene- 
rally, has been determined. It ha* been shown to 
be, not a mechanical law of nature, but a law for 
freedom ; the ground being this, that it is quite as 
possible for rational beings to treat each other with- 
out mutual respect for each other's freedom, and 

4 



134 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



simply as things of nature, as it is for them to re 
strict their freedom by the conception of Rights. 
It has also been shown that, if this fundamental 
principle of law is to be valid and realized, this can 
only be done if every free being constantly and free- 
ly makes it the law (or rule) of all its actions. 

The quantity of the applicability of this law has 
also been definitely ascertained. It is valid only on 
condition and in case that a community of recipro- 
cal intercourse between free beings, as such, is 
to be established. But since the purpose of this 
community is itself conditioned by the behavior of 
those with whom some one intends to enter into a 
community, its validity for each such some one is 
again conditioned by the fact, whether the others 
subject themselves to that law or not ; and if they 
do not thus subject themselves, then the law ob- 
tains validity through its very invalidity, since it 
authorizes that some one to treat these others, who 
have not subjected themscrves to the Conception of 
Rights, as he may choose to treat them. 



^OOK yHIRD. 



APPLICATION 



OF THE 



CONCEPTION OF RIGHTS. 



§ I- 

SYSTEMATIC DIVISION OF THE SCIENCE OF. NATU 
RAL RIGHTS. 

A. 

If reason is to be realized in the sensuous world, 
it must be possible for many rational beings to live 
together as such ; and this is permanently possible 
only if each free being makes it its laiv to limit its 
oivn freedom by the eonception of the frcedoi}i of all 
others. For each free being having the physical 
power to check or destroy the freedom of other free 
beings, and being dependent in its free actions only 
upon its will ; it is only when all free beings have 
voluntarily made it their law (rule of action) never 
so to check the freedom of all others that a com- 
munity of free beings becomes possible, wherein 
such a check never occurs. 

What we have here stated is nothing but the 
judgment of the reflecting philosopher concerning 
the possibility of a community of free beings, and 
is to signify nothing more. If free beings, as such, 
are to exist together, then it can be thought possi- 
ble only in the above manner ; but zvhether they are 



138 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



SO to exist together, and whether the condition of 
their Hving together, namely, the Laiv, has really 
been acknowledged by each — this we do not take 
into account. 

At present we can, at the utmost, say : it is nature 
that desires free beings to live together in the sen- 
suous world, and hence produces a number of bodies 
capable of reason, culture, and freedom. It is not 
to be understood as if we thus asserted nature 
to possess understanding and will, ordesire ; we 
merely say : if nature is assumed to have a will, 
then her end and purpose in the production of 
many such bodies can have been only that they 
should live together in the indicated manner. Un- 
der that assumption, it is nature who wills that the 
freedom of each free being shall be restricted by 
the freedom of the others. But since in that case 
she likewise must will each rational being to be 
free generally, she must will that they restrict 
their freedom vohintarily, and that this law of 
restriction shall not be one of her own mechani- 
cal laws, but a law of freedom. What other ar- 
rangements nature may have made to realize her 
end in spite of that freedom, we shall see here- 
after. 

The above law is to be a law ; that is, it is to be 
impossible that an exception should occur to it ; the 
law must command universally and categorically 
after it has once been assumed. 

In consequence of this law, each one is to limit 



THE SCIENCE OF RICIITS. 



his freedom ; that is, the sphere of his voluntarily 
resolved acts and utterances in the sensuous world. 
The conception of freedom here is, therefore, qnan- 
titative and material. 

He is to limit his freedom thus by the possibility 
of the freedom of all others. 

Here the same word has another meaning, and 
its significance is altogether qjialitative and formal. 
Each of these others is to have the privilege of 
freedom, of being a person ; but how far the sphere 
of their possible free acts is to extend, the law does 
not determine. In other words, no one has the 
right to do an act which would make impossible the 
freedom and personality of another ; but all other 
free acts each has a right to commit. 

The first question would, therefore, be : What 
constitutes a free person, or what is requisite to 
make a person free .'' And, since the whole of this 
requisite is here considered only as condition of the 
possibility of a living together of free beings, it is 
in so far termed a Right. For the same reason we 
shall here demonstrate the conditions of freedom and 
personality only in so far as a violation thereof is. 
possible through physical power. 

Now this right, or these rights, are involved in 
the mere conception of the person, as such, and in 
so far are called Original (or inalienable) Rights. 
The Science of these Rights arises through the: 
mere analysis of the conception of personality, ia 
so far as that which this conception involves can 
be violated by the free acts of others, but miist 

E 



140 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



not be so violated in virtue of the conception of 
Rights. 

The first division of our Science of Rights will, 
therefore, treat of the Original Rights of Men. 

B. 

Our established result is hypothetical. If free be- 
ings, as such, are to exist together, then each one 
must subject himself to the described law. The 
latter part of the sentence is, therefore, the condi- 
tion of the first. Unless they so subject them- 
selves to the law, they can not live together ; and 
hence the only ground why the philosopher as- 
sumes such a law is, because he presupposes that 
they are to live together. 

Now, we have already shown that, by reason of 
this very conditioncdness of the law, each free be- 
ing can adopt it only as a conditioned law, that is, 
can adopt it only to attain the end which condi- 
tions it. The end of the law is to make a common 
intercourse of free beings possible. But this is pos- 
sible only if the person with whom I thus enter into 
a community has subjected himself to this law, if 
he has resolved to respect my freedom or my orig- 
inal rights. The law is not at all ajDplicable, how- 
ever, to a person who has not subjected himself to 
it, since the end no longer exists for which I adopt- 
ed that law. Hence, although I have generally sub- 
jected myself to that law, I have not done so in re- 
gard to the particular person, who, for his person, 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



141 



has not adopted it. In other words, I have adopt- 
ed tliat law, and have not adopted it ; I have adopt- 
ed it in general, and have not adopted it in this par- 
ticular case. Because I have adopted it in general, 
and have placed myself under the conception of 
Rights, I act rightfully, and have, therefore, a i^z^Z;/; 
and because I do not adopt it in this particular case, 
I have a right to compel that other individual by at- 
tacking his freedom and personality. My right is, 
therefore, a Right of Coinptilsion. 

The law being conditioned, and adoptable only 
in this its conditionedness, each person has the 
right to judge whether the case of its applicability 
exists or not. Each is necessarily his own judge ; 
and where the right of compulsion exists, the one 
w'ho has the right is, at the same time, the judge of 
the other, against whom he has this right ; for the 
right of compulsion is possible only through the 
adoption of the Conception of Rights. Where this 
condition does not exist, no one is, or can be, the 
judge of the other. 

No right of coinpidsion luithojct a right of judg- 
ment, is the result of this investigation. 

It is necessary, as we have shown, that the per- 
son who is to have the right of compulsion must 
have subjected himself to that law ; for otherwise he 
may well have the johysical power of compulsion, 
but can never obtain a right to it, since the right 
only follows from the law. 



142 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



Again : The right of compulsion results from the 
silence or the non-applicability of the law, but is 
by no means positively commanded by that law. 
Hence, there is only a right of compulsion, not a 
duty to compel. 

From this deduction of the right of compulsion, 
it is clear that this right is applicable when one per- 
son violates the original rights of another person. 

The first division of the Science of Rights hav- 
ing, therefore, established the original rights of man, 
the second division, which treats of the Right of 
Compulsion, (Penal Law,) has only to establish the 
various cases to which the right of compulsion ap- 
plies. 

C. 

I. The right of compulsion, as well as each of 
its applications, has a ground ; but all that is 
grounded is necessarily finite, and reaches no fur- 
ther than its ground. If, therefore, the limit of the 
applicability of the ground can be fixed, the limit 
of the grounded also can be fixed. The ground of 
my law of compulsion is, that the other person did 
not adopt the rule of law, did not subject himself 
to the conception of Rights. By appealing to this 
ground, therefore I assume that I should have no 
right of compulsion, if the other did adopt that 
law, and — quantitatively expressed — that my right 
of compulsion extends only so far as the other does 
not submit to that law. The right of compulsion 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



143 



has its limit, and this limit is the voluntary subjec- 
tion of the other to the law ; all compulsion beyond 
this limit is unrightful, (illegal.) As a general prin- 
ciple, this is immediately clear. The only question 
in our case — we teaching a real, and not a merely 
formal Science of Rights — is this, whether and how 
this limit can be discovered and determined in its 
application. 

A right of compulsion is incurred only when an 
original right has been violated ; but then it fol- 
lows necessarily ; and hence the general right can 
be proved in each specific case. It is also clear 
that he, who desires that right to be valid, does not 
desire the violation of the original rights, or, if the 
violation has taken place, desires it to be annulled. 
Hence the quantity of that right seems also prova- 
ble in each specific case ; that is, in each case the 
limit of the legal compulsion (punishment) can be 
accurately defined ; it extends to complete satisfac- 
tion and restitution ; both parties must be placed 
back in the same condition which they occupied be- 
fore such violation took place. 

But — and this is a circumstance which, in recent 
treatises on Law, seems to have been generally over- 
looked — the right of compulsion is grounded not 
only upon the present fact, that a person did not 
respect the law in this present case, but upon the 
fact that he thereby acknowledges not to have made 
that law his general rule of action. One single 
unlawful act — even after a series of lawful acts — 
proves that the rule of law is not his irrevocable 



144 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



rule of action, and that his previous lawful acts 
were induced, not by respect for the law, but by 
other possible motives. It is this inference which 
warrants the conclusion that no free being can in 
safety live together with him, since safety can be 
grounded only upon a law. The person whose 
original rights have been violated, thus becomes 
justified in completely annihilating the freedom of 
the violator, and in canceling the possibility of ever 
again coming into contact with him in the sensuous 
world. The right of compulsion in so far is infi- 
nite, and has no limit at all — a proposition which 
the writers on Law have partly asserted one-sidedly 
and partly denied one-sidedly — unless, indeed, the 
violator subjects himself to the law. As soon as 
he so subjects himself, the right of compulsion 
ceases, since its continuance was grounded only 
upon the continuance of the lawlessness of the 
other; and all further compulsion is now unlawful. 
In this respect the limit of compulsion is conditioned. 

But how shall the condition, the true subjection 
of the other to the law, be given } 

Not through signs of repentance, promises of 
future better behavior, offers of damages, etc. ; for 
there is no ground to believe his sincerity. It is 
quite as possible that he has been forced by his 
present weakness into this repentance, and is only 
awaiting a better opportunity to renew the attack. 
This uncertainty does not warrant the other in lay- 
ing down his arms and thus again exposing all his 
safety. He will, therefore, continue to exercise his 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



compulsion ; but since the condition of the right is 
problematical, his exercise also will be problemati- 
cal. 

It is the same with the violator. If he has offer- 
ed the complete restitution which the law inevitably 
requires, and it being possible that he may now 
have voluntarily subjected himself in all sincerity 
to the law, it is also likely that he will oppose any 
further restriction of his freedom, (any further com- 
pulsion by the other,) but Jiis right to make this 
opposition is also problematical. 

It seems, therefore, that the decisive point can not 
be ascertained, since it rests in the ascertainment 
of inner sincerity, which can not be proved, but is 
a matter of conscience for each. The ground of 
decision, indeed, could be given only, if it were 
possible to ascertain the whole future life of the 
violator. 

If, of the original violator it could be known that, 
after having been liberated from the compulsion, he 
would not, in his whole future life, ever violate the 
law again ; and if, on the other hand, it could be 
known of the attacked party that, after having re- 
ceived restitution, he would, in his whole future life, 
refrain from all further exercise of his right of com- 
pulsion, then it might be believed that the former 
had sincerely subjected himself to the law, and that 
the latter had asserted his right of compulsion only 
with a view to assert his original rights. But such 
a knowledge of the future is impossible ; because, 
to make the future possible, the one must first lib 



146 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



erate the other from his compulsion ; and this we 
have shown he can not do unless he has that know- 
ledge of the future, since no one can abandon his 
acquired superiority merely because the other pro- 
tests that he is sincere. There is a circle here. 
The grounded is not possible withont the groiind ; 
and vice vej'sa. Before we see how the synthetical 
method shall get us out of this circle, let us ex- 
amine it a little closer. 

A right of compulsion, as a general conception, has 
been easily enough deduced from the Conception 
of Rights ; but as soon as that right was to be ap- 
plied, we found ourselves wrapped up in an unsolva- 
ble contradiction ; because the ground of decision 
of such an application could not be given in the sen- 
suous world, resting, as it does, in the conscience 
of each individual. The right of compulsion, as an 
applicable right, is in evident contradiction with it- 
self, since it can never be decided whether, in a 
given case, the compulsion is lawful or not. 

But the final decision of the question whether 
the right of compulsion can be exercised by the 
offended party himself or not, will also decide the 
question whether a real Science of Rights is pos- 
sible in so far as such a science is to designate a 
science of the legal relation between persons out- 
side of an established state organization and with- 
out positive laws. As most of the previous teach- 
ers of the Science of Rights were content to philo- 
sophize formaliter 2lQom\. the Conception of Rights, 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



and were satisfied if their conceptions were think- 
able — Httle caring about their applicability — they 
easily avoided this question. 

We have here answered the first question in the 
negative, and hence also the second question ; and 
in order to become convinced of our science, it is 
necessary to attain a complete insight into the im- 
possibility, which we have here demonstrated, of 
having the right of compulsion exercised by the 
oftcnded party himself. Hence, this result is im- 
portant for our whole Science of Rights. 

The circle was this : The possibility of mutually 
liberating each other on the part of the offended 
and the offender is conditioned by the knowledge 
of their whole future ; but this knowledge, again, is 
impossible, unless they mutually liberate each oth- 
er. The method, which has been prescribed by 
the Science of Knowledge, tells us synthetically to 
unite both opposites, and thus to get rid of the con- 
tradiction. 

A synthesis of this kind would be, in our case : 
i/ie mutual liberation of both parties and the knoiv- 
ledge of the whole future must be one and the same ; 
or, in other words, this mutual liberation must in- 
volve of itself and guarantee the whole future, 
whereof knowledge is desired. 

There is no question that such must be the re- 
sult ; the only problem is, how is it possible .'' 

The whole future experience, and the conviction 
of the perfect safety of both persons, is to be ex- 



148 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



pressed in the one moment of liberation, and to be 
so expressed valid for external conviction, since no 
one can know the inner sentiments of the other. 
Both parties must, therefore, make it physically im- 
possible for each other thereafter to attack each 
other ; and each must become externally convinced 
of this impossibility. Such a security for the fu- 
ture is called a guarantee. 

Hence, the above synthetical result requires that 
both persons must mutually guarantee their safety ; 
otherwise, they can not live together, and one of 
them must be destroyed. 

How is this guarantee possible ? We found that 
neither could put down the arms, because neither 
could trust the other. They must, therefore, place 
their arms, that is, their whole power, in the hands 
of a third party in whom both trust. Both must 
enjoin this third party immediately to repress that 
one of them who may in the future attack the 
other. The third party must have the power to do 
this, and must, therefore, be the more powerftil. 
This third party would thus exercise the right of 
compulsion for both. 

If he is to exercise this right for both, both must 
transfer to him the right of deciding not only their 
present dispute but all future disputes between 
them ; that is, they must confer upon the third 
party the power of judging, or the judicial power. 
They must confer this power upon the third party 
without reserve ; there must be no appeal from it. 
BotJi parties must, therefore, unconditionally transfer 



THE SCIENCE OF KICIITS. 



149 



their physical pozvcr and their poxvcr of jiidguicnt, 
that is to say, all their rights, to that third party. 

2. Thesis. The freedom of the person, according 
to the Conception of Rights, is Hmitcd only by the 
possibiKty that other persons are also to Uve with 
Iiim as free persons, and hence as also having rights. 
Whatsoever does not violate the rights of anqther, 
each person has the right to do, and this, indeed, 
constitutes each person's right. Each one, more- 
over, has the right to judge for himself what is, 
and to defend, by his own powers, what he so 
judges to be, the limit of Iiis free actions. 

Antithesis. According to a correct conclusion 
drawn from the same Conception of Rights, each 
person must utterly and unconditionally transfer all 
his power and judgment to a third party, if a legal 
relation between free persons is to be possible. By 
this transfer each person loses altogether the right 
to judge the limits of his own right and to defend 
those limits. He makes himself completely depen^ 
dent upon the knowledge and good- will of the third 
party, to whom he has made the transfer, and ceases 
to be a free being. 

The antithesis contradicts the thesis. The the- 
sis is the Conception of Rights itself; the anti- 
thesis is a correct result obtained from that concep- 
tion. The Conception of Rights is, therefore, in- 
volved in a self-contradiction. This contradiction 
must be canceled. The root of this contradiction 



rilE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



lies here : Under the Conception of Rights I can 
surrender only that portion of my freedom which is 
requisite for the coexistence of other free beings 
with whom I come in contact in the sensuous world. 
But now I am to transfer all my rights to the arbi- 
trary joower of a third party. This is impossible 
and contradictory, unless in this transfer I never- 
theless remain secured in the possession of my 
proper sphere of freedom. Rationally, I can not 
transfer all my rights, and no one can demand that 
I should transfer them except upon this condition. 

I must be able, therefore, to decide in my own 
person whether I have that security or not. My 
transfer is conditioned by the possibility of my be- 
ing able to decide and of my deciding upon the suf- 
ficiency of this guarantee. When I do not decide 
upon it, my transfer of all my rights to a third par- 
ty is impossible and illegal. When I do transfer 
my rights thus, it must be done with my own per- 
fect free-will. 

After I have once transferred my rights, I have, 
as has been clearly shown, no further right to de- 
cide upon the sphere of my freedom. My express- 
ed decision on the sufficiency of the guarantee must, 
therefore, be possible, and be given before I make 
the transfer. 

In this decision, that the guarantee is sufficient 
for me, I virtually say : " I am sure that, after I 
have thus transferred all my rights and made my- 
self subject to a third party, my lawful freedom will 
not be in the least abrogated ; I am sure that I 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



shall never have to sacrifice any more of it than I 
should have been compelled to do in my own judg- 
ment by the mere Conception of Rights." In mak- 
ing this decision, I must overlook, therefore, the 
whole future experience of my state of subjection 
to a third party, and then judge whether the gua- 
rantee of my perfect security within the limits of 
Law will be sufficient. 

What is it which is to be guaranteed to me } 
Perfect security of all my rights, as well against 
the third party to whom I have transferred my 
rights, as also through it against all individuals 
with whom I may come in contact. I must be 
convinced that all possible future law decisions, 
which may be pronounced in affairs of mine, will 
always be precisely as I should myself be compel- 
led to pi^onounce them under the Conception of 
Rights. Rules of these future law decisions must, 
therefore, be submitted to my examination, accord- 
ing to which rules the Conception of Rights is to 
be applied to all possible future cases which may 
occur. Such rules are called positive lazvs. 

All positive laws are, in a greater or less degree, 
deduced from the Conception of Rights. There is 
and can be no arbitrariness in them. They must 
be such as every rational being would necessarily 
make them. 

In these positive laws the rule of Rights is ap- 
plied to the specific objects which the rule com- 
prises. Positive law floats in the midst between 



132 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



the Conception of Rights and the Decision of Law 
In positive law, the rule of Rights is applied to par- 
ticular objects ; in the decisions of law, the positive 
law is applied to particular persons. The civil judge 
has to decide only what has occurred, and then to 
state the law which applies to the occurrence. If 
the law is clear and complete, the decision or sen- 
tence should already be contained in it. 

The contradiction has been in part canceled. If 
I subject myself to a law which I have examined 
and approved, (such approval being the exclusive 
condition of a lawful possibility of my subjection,) 
then I have not subjected myself to the arbitrary 
will of a man, but to an unchangeable, determined 
will, in fact, to the will of Reason in general, or to 
my own will, as that will must be, if determined by 
the Conception of Rights ; and unless m,y will is 
so determined, I have no rights at all, as has been 
shown. Hence, far from losing my rights by such 
subjection, I rather first obtain them through it, 
since only by this subjection have I fulfilled the 
condition under which alone man obtains rights. 
Although I am subject, I am subject only to my 
own will. I have once really exercised my right of 
judgment, and that once was for my whole life and 
for all possible cases. All that has been taken from 
me is the care to carry out my own law decisions 
by physical force. 



I'HE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



RESULT. 

Man can transfer his i^hysical power and right of 
judgment only to the necessary and unchangeable 
will of the Law, but not to the free and arbitrary 
will of a man. The former alone is required by 
the Conception of Rights, is alone the condition of 
all rights. The latter is not jDreciscly against the 
Conception of Rights — simply because a right is 
not a duty, and because any one may therefore 
abandon a right if he chooses to do so — but nei- 
ther is it a result of that conception. 

3. But the contradiction has been solved only in 
part. The law is to give me the guarantee that, 
after I transfer my rights to it I shall still be pro- 
tected in all my rights for the future. But what is 
the law A mere conception. How, then, can 
this mere conception be reahzed in the sensuous 
world .'' 

Again: I am to become convinced before the 
transfer of my rights of the utter impossibility 
that my rights can ever be violated hereafter. How 
can I become thus convinced or, in other words, 
even after the mere will of the law pronounces that 
impossibility, who will guarantee me that the will 
of the law, and only of the law, will always rule 

I am to be secured against the law itself; hence 
it must be made impossible to turn the power of 
the law against me, except in the cases provided by 
the law. The law is to secure me against all oth- 



154 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



ers ; hence the law must always act where it is 
intended to act. It must never sleep where it is 
called upon to act. 

In short, tJic lazv must be a powc7'. The Concep- 
tion of Law, which we obtained from the last part 
of our investigation, and the conception of a su- 
preme power, which we had obtained previously, 
must be synthetically united. The law itself must 
be the supreme power, and the supreme power must 
be the law. Both must be one and the same ; and 
in subjecting myself to the law, I must convince 
myself that it is so ; that it is completely impossi- 
ble that any power except that of the law can ever 
be turned against me. 

The question is, therefore. How does the law be- 
come a power? The power we seek is not a force 
of nature, is not a mechanical force, as we have 
already shown ; and hence men have the physi- 
cal power of inflicting wrongs upon each other. 
The required power must, therefore, be a power de- 
pendent upon a will. This will, however, must not 
be free, but unalterably and necessarily determined 
through the law. Such a will can not exist, there- 
fore, as the will of an individual. We are in search 
of a will which shall have power only where the law 
wills, ajid which shall have no power whatever where 
the law does not will ; a will, in short, wliich is an 
infallible power, but only when in conformity with 
the will of the law. 

Superior power over a free being can only be real- 
ized by the union of many free beings, since the sen- 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



suous world holds nothing so powerful as a free be- 
ing — for the very reason that it is free and can di- 
rect its forces with matured consideration — and 
nothing more powerful than a single free being, ex- 
cept many. Their strength would, therefore, con- 
sist only in their union. In the present case, their 
power is to depend upon the fact whether or not 
they will the will of the law. Their union, therefore, 
as the basis of their power, must depend upon that 
fact ; the only bond of their union must be that 
fact. The moment their will should differ from the 
will of the law, their union also, and hence their 
whole power, must come to an end. 

Now, this fact, that the desire to commit injustice 
necessarily destroys their union, is the case in every 
community of free beings. A number of free be- 
ings unite themselves, signifies : they desire to live 
together. But this they can not do, unless each 
restricts his freedom by the freedom of all others. 
If a million of men live together, it is very possible 
for each to desire as much freedom as possible. But 
if you unite the will of all of them in one conception, 
as one will, then that one will divides the amount of 
possible freedom in equal parts amongst all ; desires 
all to be free, and hence desires the freedom of each 
to be restricted by the freedom of all others. The 
only possible point of union for their will is, there- 
fore, the Law, and, in our case — where a fixed num- 
ber of men of various inclinations and occupations 
live together — the Law, in its application to them, or 
their Positive Law. As sure as they are united, 

L 



156 



THE SCIEXCE OF RIGHTS. 



they must will the law. If but one of them is 
wrongly treated, this one certainly protests, and 
they are no longer united. 

That, wherein they agree, we have stated to be 
their positive law, which fixes the rights of free- 
dom of each. It is not expressly necessary that 
they should all give utterance to it, or, perhaps, 
vote upon it. Each rational being who has a know- 
ledge of their number, occupation, etc., can tell 
them wherein they all agree. Their positive law 
has been given to them by the Conception of 
Rights and by their physical status, just as two 
factors give the product. The content of the law, 
therefore, does not depend at all upon arbitrariness ; 
indeed, the least influence thereof upon the law 
would involve the seed of dissension and future 
dissolution. 

But the form of the law, its obligatory power, it 
only receives from the consent of the several indi- 
viduals who unite thus into a commonwealth. 

Concerning justice and law, therefore, all are 
agreed ; and all who are agreed necessarily desire 
law and justice. There can not be a community, 
whereof one member has another will than the 
other member. But as soon as two individuals are 
no longer united in their will, at least one of the 
two is also at variance with all the others ; his will 
is an individual, and hence an unjust will. If the 
will of the other, with whom he is in conflict, agrees 
with the will of all the others, then this other is 
necessarily in the right. 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



There is no question as to the fact that, in such 
a commonwealth, the just will, if rallying into ac- 
tion, will be always able to overpower the unjust 
will, since the latter will is only that of an indivi- 
dual, whereas the former is that of all others. 

The only question is, How can it be arranged that 
this will of all the others will be active and effec- 
tive, wherever an individual will is to be re- 
pressed ; how, therefore, the physical powers of the 
individuals may be united with the power of the 
commonwealth into one, just as the wills of these 
individuals were united into one conception ? There 
must be a necessary and strict rule, whereby this 
union of ali individual forces into one will result in- 
fallibly ; for each one who subjects himself to the 
law is to have a convincing guarantee that it will 
be impossible throughout the whole future for any 
other force than the power of the law to be active 
against him ; and that his security does not depend 
upon chance or the good-will of his neighbors, but 
is absolutely secured by the organization of the 
whole. 

The strictest and only sufficient guarantee which 
each individual can justly demand is this, that the 
existence of the commonwealth itself be made to 
depend upon the effectiveness of the law. 

(True, as a general thing this is already so. If 
injustice should become universal, society would 
necessarily dissolve itself, and thus perish. Often, 
it is true, law steps beyond its limits, and often, 



158 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



again, remains inactive ; but these isolated cases do 
not necessarily dissolve the connection in actuality. 
For the individual there is, of course, little guaran- 
tee in the reflection that the whole commonwealth 
can not well perish unless each member thereof 
suffers injustice, and that he or other persons may 
well suffer violence at times without the protection 
of the law.) 

The relation between each member and the com- 
monwealth must, therefore, be thus, that, from each 
however apparently petty an injustice against the 
individual, there also results, necessarily, injustice 
against all. How is this to be attained The law 
is to be, necessarily. Deed. Now, the law can not 
fail to be deed if, on the other hand, the deed is al- 
ways laiv ; that is to say, if each act which is once 
permitted by the law does, by that one permission, 
become lawful,* and may be done by all others ; in 
other words, if each act of each individual results 
in a universally valid law. If this has been recog- 
nized, then each injustice necessarily falls upon all ; 
each offense is a public misfortune ; what was al- 
lowable against me is now also allowable against 
every member of the commonwealth ; and if a sin- 
gle one of them is to be secure, it is the first inter- 
est of all, first to protect me, and to secure me my 
right, and to punish the unlawful deed. It is clear 
that this guarantee is sufficient, and that, if this rule 
is established, the law must always be effectual, 

* Law of Precedents. — Translator. 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



though it can also never transgress its Hmit, because, 
if it did, transgression would become lawful for all. 

It is clear that the individual who enters such an 
agreement receives his freedom, although he re- 
nounces it, and receives it because he renounces it ; 
it is clear, that through it all contradictions are 
solved, and through its realization the supreme 
rule of law can be secured ; it is clear, tha't every 
one who desires the supremacy of the law must 
necessarily desire such a commonwealth ; and that 
through the conception thereof, our investigation 
has therefore been brought to a close. The ana- 
lysis of this conception will lead us from the First 
Part of the Science of Rights, as the Science of 
Natural Rights, to its Second Part, or to the Sci- 
ence of Rights in a Commomvealth. 

§ 2. 

CONCERNING THE ORIGINAL RIGHTS OF MEN. 

Rights can be spoken of only on the condition 
that a person is thought as a person, that is, as an 
individual, or, in other words, as occupying a rela- 
tion to other individuals, between whom and him 
a community, though not actually posited, perhaps, 
is at least fictitiously assumed. For those things 
which, through speculative philosophy, we discov- 
ered to be conditions of personality, become rights 
only if other persons are added in thought, who 
dare not violate those conditions. Free beings can 



l60 THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 

not, however, be thought as coexisting at all, un- 
less their rights reciprocally limit each other, that 
is, unless the sphere of their original rights changes 
into the sphere of rights in a commottwealth. It 
would seem, therefore, impossible to reflect upon 
rights as original rights, that is, without regard to 
their - necessary limitations through the rights of 
others. Nevertheless, such a reflection must occur 
and furnish the ground for an investigation of rights 
in a commonwealth. All limitations must, therefore, 
be abstracted from, and this is, indeed, so easy a 
matter for speculation, that it rather makes this ab- 
straction involuntary, and needs only be reminded 
of having made it. The possibility of the abstrac- 
tion offers no difficulty. 

But it must be well remembered at all times, 
THAT the abstraction has been made, and that the 
conception produced by it, though it have ideal pos- 
sibility, (for thinking,) has no real significance. If 
this is forgotten, a purely formal Science of Rights 
will be the result. 

There is no status of original rights for Man. 
Man attains rights only in a community with oth- 
ers as indeed he only becomes man — whereof we 
have shown the grounds heretofore — through in- 
tercourse with others. Man, indeed, can not be 
thought as one individual. Original Rights are, 
therefore, a pure fiction, but a fiction necessary for 
the purpose of Science. It must also be always 
remembered, that the conditions of personality 
should be thought as rights only in so far dS they 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. l6l 

appear in the sensuous world, and as they can be 
checked or disturbed by other free beings. It is pro- 
per, therefore, to speak, for instance, of a right of 
sensuous self-preservation, that is, of preserving my 
body as such ; but it is improper to speak of a 
right to freely tlii7ik or will. I have a right of 
compulsion against the man who attacks my body, 
but not against the man who, perhaps, disturbs me 
in my peaceful convictions, or who annoys me by 
his immoral behavior. 

The fundamental principle of all rules of law 
we have found to be this : Let each one restrict his 
freedom or the sphere of his free acts through the 
conception of the freedom of the other, (that is, so 
that the other may also exist as generally free.) 

The conception of freedom as applied here to the 
other, namely, in its merely formal significance, fur- 
nishes the conception of the Original Rights, that 
is, those rights which absolutely belong to a person 
as such. Let us analyze that conception. 

It is, in regard to its quality, the conception of a 
power to be absolute first cause. In regard to its 
quantity, it is the conception of an unlimited or infi- 
nite power, since it merely states that the person is 
to be free, but not how far he is to be free. Hence, 
the Conception of Quantity is opposed to the Con- 
ception of Original Rights as here expressed in its 
formal significance. In regard to its relation, this 
conception speaks of the freedom of the person 
only in so far as the sphere of the free actions of 



1 62 THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 

Others is to be limited by it, because those others 
might make the required formal freedom impossi- 
ble. Through its relation, therefore, the quantity 
is determined ; namely, the conception refers only 
to cmisality in the sensuous world, since in it alone 
can freedom be limited by freedom. In regard to 
its modality, finally, this conception has apodictical 
certainty. Each person is to be absolutely free. 

The Original Right of a person is, therefore, his 
absolute right to be only cause (never effect) in the 
sensuous world. 

The conception of a cause and here of an abso- 
lute cause, involves, first, that the quality and quan- 
tity of the act shall be completely determined by 
the cause itself ; and, secondly, that, as soon as the 
quality and quantity of the act is determined, the 
quality and quantity of the effect in the object of 
the act is also immediately given. You can pro- 
ceed from the one to the other, you can determine 
immediately the one through the other ; as soon as 
you know one, you necessarily know both. 

In so far as the person is the absolute and final 
ground of the conception of his causality, or of his 
purpose, the freedom manifested therein does not 
come within the limits of this investigation, since 
it never enters the sensuous world, and can, there- 
fore, not be checked in it. The will of the person 
enters the sensuous world only in so far as it is ex- 
pressed in the determination of the body. On this 
sphere of the sensuous world the body itself of a 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



163 



free being is, therefore, to be regarded as itself the 
final ground of its own determination ; and the free 
being, as appearance is here identical with its body. 
The body is the representative of the Ego in the 
sensuous world, and where the sensuous world alone 
enters into consideration, the body itself is the Ego. 
Hence, we use every day such phrases as, " / was 
not there," " He has seen inc" " He is born, /^^died, 
he was buried," etc. 

The body, therefore, considered as a person, must 
be absolute and final cause of its determining itself 
to have causality. In what limits and under what 
laws the body is placed by its own organization, 
does not concern us here. Whatsoever the body 
is not originally, does not appertain to it, or, that 
the body is not ; and hence that is not taken into 
account here. Only that which is physically pos- 
sible for the body, must also be possible of being 
actualized in the body, whenever the person so 
wills, and only when the person so wills. An ex- 
ternal cause must neither induce the body's motion, 
nor check its motion ; in fact, no external influence 
must immediately affect it. 

Again : From this movement of the body, the 
effect made possible by it must infallibly result in 
the sensuous world. Not exactly the result in- 
tended ; for if the person did not know well the 
nature of the things he operated upon, or did not 
properly calculate his force and their power of re- 



164 THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 

sistancc, then the fault was his own, and he has no 
right to complain of the sensuous world. But the 
sensuous world must not be determined by a for- 
eign free power outside of it, in opposition to that 
person's will ; for if it is so determined, then he 
ceases to be free cause. 

But the intentional determination of the body for 
the purpose of producing a certain effect upon the 
object, follows upon and from a preceding know- 
ledge of the object to be efifected ; and hence the 
free being is, after all, dependent. 

In a general way, we have already acknowledged 
this, and excluded it from our present investiga- 
tion. Causality and definite knowledge mutually 
condition each other, and fill up the same sphere, as 
has been shown and explained before. A person 
can not zvill to have causality previous to and be- 
yond the given, factical existence of the objects ; for 
to have such a will would be self-contradictory ; it 
is only within the sphere of the factical existence 
of the objects that the person is free. Within that 
sphere the person is free to leave things as they are 
or to change them in accordance with his purpose. 
He is free to reciprocally relate the various mani- 
folds given to him, to determine them through each 
other, and to unite them into a whole as may best 
suit his purpose. If he is not free to do either of 
these, he is no longer dependent solely upon his 
will. 

It is, therefore, required that every thing should 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



i6s 



remain precisely as it has once been gathered 
into the conception of the rational being, whe- 
ther it be already modified through it or not. In- 
deed, that which is not so modified in nature, be- 
comes — by the very thinking of it, as not modified, 
and by joining it in thought to the modified — modi- 
fied itself The person has not modified it because 
it suited better to the modified things in its natural 
shape ; and the person would have modified it if it 
had so suited better. In refraining from a specific 
activity, he was, therefore, also active, and modified 
— if not the specific thing, at least — the whole, to 
which this specific thing was to be conformed. 

Now, nature, obeying her mechanical laws, can 
not really change. All change in nature contra- 
dicts the conception of nature. That which ap- 
pears to us self-alteration of nature, occurs in vir- 
tue of those mechanical laws, and could not appear 
to us as a change, but would appear to us as a per- 
manent, if we sufficiently knew those laws. Hence, 
if those laws work any change in the world which we 
have proposed to form to our conception, it is our 
own fault ; for either those laws are too powerful for 
us, and then we should have considered that before- 
hand, or they are not too powerful, and then we 
should have controlled them through art and inven- 
tive ability. It is only through other free beings 
that unforeseen and unpreventable changes can be 
produced in our world — that is, in the system of 
that which we have received into our knowledge 
and related to our purpose — and that our free cau- 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



sality can, therefore, be disturbed. Now, a person 
has the right to demand that, in the whole sphere 
of this, his known world, every thing should re- 
main as he has known it from the first, because in 
exercising his causality upon this his known world, 
he is regulated by that knowledge of it, and will 
be led astray, will find his causality checked, or will 
obtain other results than those he has desired, if 
his knowledge should turn out meanwhile to have 
been incorrect because a change had taken place in 
his world. 

Here lies the ground of all right of property. That 
part of the sensuous world which is known to me, 
and has been subjected by me, though only in 
thought, to my purposes, is originally my proper- 
ty, (originally, I say, not in a coninmnity) And 
being thus my property, no other person can have 
causality upon it without checking the freedom of 
my causality. 

The old dispute, whether the right of property to 
a thing is obtained only through my forming it — 
modifying it in some way — or also through my 
mere will to take possession of it, is thus settled. 
It is settled by the synthetical union of both these 
determinations, as could not be expected otherwise 
m a strictly synthetical system, or by showing that 
the mere subjection of a thing to my will is equally 
a positive modification of that thing, since it pre- 
supposes my free resolve to abstain from a possible 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 1C7 

activity for a certain end or purpose ; and by show- 
ing, moreover, as will appear directly, that the modi- 
fication of a thing gives a right of property to it 
only in so far as something is and remains thereby 
subjected to our end. The final ground of the 
right of property is, therefore, the subjection of 
that property to our purposes or ends. 

A person desires his activity in the sensuous 
world to be cause, signifies, therefore : a person de- 
sires a perception to result from it, which percep- 
tion shall correspond to his conception of the end 
and purpose of his activity. 

It has already been remarked that, if this is to be 
possible at all, the object of his activity must not 
be disturbed by other influences ; and that the per- 
son, in willing his activity to be cause, must also 
necessarily will the latter. 

But it is equally clear, that the person who de- 
sires that future perception to result, must also 
necessarily will the continuance of his own body 
and of its present relation to himself as a willing 
and knowing being ; or, more definitely expressed, 
the person must also will a future state to exist, 
which shall have resulted from the present state, 
in consequence of the rule which he followed when 
he resolved upon his act of causality. 

Through the will, therefore, and only through the 
will, is the future embraced in the present ; though 
the will alone is the conception of the future, as 
such, made possible, and the will not only embraces, 



i68 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



but also determines the future. It is to be stick a 
future, and in order that the future can be such a 
one, I must be such a one ; and if I am to be such 
a one, I must have existence in general. 

The argument is here that, from the willing of a 
determined mode of existence in the future, the 
willing of a future in general and the wish of our 
continued existence is the result. The assertion is, 
here, that we have the will to continue to exist, not 
for the continuance in itself, but for the sake of a 
determined state in the future ; the continued ex- 
istence is not absolute end itself at all, but mere- 
ly the means for some specific end. This experi- 
ence, indeed, fully confirms. All men desire to 
live, the nobler men to do something more, the less 
noble, at least to enjoy something more. 

The person wills what we have just shown as 
sure as he wills at all, no matter what it is he wills. 
This determined willing is, therefore, the condition 
of all willing, and its realization, namely, the pre- 
servation of our body, which, in Natural Law, is as 
much as self-preservation, is a condition of all other 
acting and of all manifestation of freedom. 

If we unite all our results into one, the person, 
in demanding his original rights, demands a contin- 
tied reciprocal causality between his body and the sen- 
suous world, determined and determinable solely 
through his freely formed conception of that world. 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



169 



The conception of an absolute causality in the 
sensuous world, or, since this conception was found 
to be equivalent to that of Original Rights, the con- 
ception of Original Rights itself, is thus completely 
exhausted. 

The Original Rights are, therefore, an absolute 
and closed Whole ; each partial violation whereof 
affects the Whole and influences the Whole. If it 
is desirable to make divisions in the conception of 
Original Rights, that division can be only the one 
which the conception of causahty itself involves, 
and which we have already developed. This would 
give, as the Original Rights of Men : 

1st. The right to the continuance of the absolute 
freedom and inviolability of the body. 

2d. The right to the continuance of our free in- 
fluence upon the whole sensuous world.* 

* Our Declaration of Independence, wherein the original rights 
of men, which have here been philosophically deduced, are ex- 
pressed in their results, or simply asserted, specifies the right to the 
continuance of the absolute freedom of the body as the Right to Life ; 
the right to the inviolability of the body as the Right to Freedom ; 
and the right to the continuance of our free influence upon the 
whole sensuous world, as the Right to the Pursuit of Happiness. 
The latter right is also often called the Right to Property. Our 
Declaration of Independence, therefore, completely exhausts the 
conception of original rights. By proceeding " and in order to 
have these rights," etc., the Declaration of Independence further 
asserts, by inferring the right of compulsion, that original rights can 
only be secured as rights by the establishment of a commonwealth. 
In that one immortal sentence from the Declaration of Indepen- 
dence, therefore, the whole Science of Rights is involved, and can 
be deduced from it in its application to the least of possible law- 
cases. — Translator's Remark. 



i<70 THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 

There is no particular right of self-preservation ; 
for that the use of the body as a tool, or of the 
things as means, should have, in a certain case, the 
immediate purpose of preserving our body, as such, 
is accidental. Even if we have a lesser purpose, 
our freedom must not be disturbed ; for it must not 
be disturbed at all. 

But it is well to be remarked, that our Original 
Rights are valid not only for present purposes, but 
extend as far into the future as we can embrace 
the future in our minds or plans ; and that, hence, 
they immediately and naturally involve the right to 
secure those rigJits for all future. 

The Original Rights return in themselves, justify 
themselves, and constitute themselves as Right ; 
that is to say, they become an absolute Right ; and 
this proves that the circle of our investigation, as 
far as these rights are concerned, is completely 
closed, since a complete synthesis has now been 
established. I have the right to will the exercise 
of my rights throughout all the future, so far as I 
posit myself, simply because I have these rights ; 
and I have these rights because I have the right to 
will them. The right to be free cause, and the con- 
ception of an absolute will are the same. He who 
denies the freedom of the will must also necessari- 
ly deny the reality of the Conception of Rights, as 
Sphioza indeed does, whose right signifies merely 
the power of the determined individual, limited by 
the All. 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 1^1 

§ 3- 

CONCERNING THE KIGIIT OF COMPULSION. 
I. 

Preliminary. — The right of compulsion, accord- 
ing to the above, is to have its ground in a viola- 
tion of the original rights, that is, when one free 
being extends the sphere of its free actions so far 
as to violate thereby the rights of another free be- 
ing. But that first free being, being free, has as- 
suredly also its original rights, which are infinite, 
as we have shown. How then can it, by the free 
exercise of those rights, violate the rights of an- 
other.-' It seems as if the original rights must, 
after all, have a determined quantity, fixed by the 
law, if, by their exercise, the violation of a right is 
to be possible. The answer to the question, In 
what case is a right violated and does the law of 
compulsion therefore apply depends, therefore, 
upon the answer to another question, namely : what 
quantity of freedom does the Conception of Rights 
determine for each free being 

In other words, if any exercise of freedom is to 
be illegal, and may thus authorize compulsion, then 
the legal use of freedom, that is, of the original 
rights, must be limited by definite boundaries ; and 
the illegal use can not be determined unless the 
legal use is known ; both are determinable only 
through opposition. If these limits can be ascer- 



172 THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 

taincd, and if each person keeps within them, then 
a right of compulsion does not arise at all ; an 
equilibrunn of rights is the result, which it must 
now be our task to determine, for only where this 
equilibrium of rights is disturbed, may the law of 
compulsion become applicable. After wc have de- 
termined this equilibrium of rights, we can proceed 
to a consideration of the right of compulsion, but 
not before. 

• II. 

Deduction of an Equilibrium of Rights. 
— All law relations are determined by this prin- 
ciple : each one must restrict his freedom by the 
possibility of the freedom of the other. We have 
shown what the conception of freedom, or of origi- 
nal rights, involves. Such an infinite freedom 
would, however, cancel the freedom of all but a 
single person ; nay, would even cancel the physical 
existence of freedom ; and the conception of rights 
would therefore contradict itself But this contra- 
diction solves itself as soon as it is remembered 
that the law applies not to a single one free being, 
but is valid for all free beings. If A is to limit his 
freedom so that B can also be free, B, on the other 
hand, must also limit his freedom so that A can be 
free, etc., etc. Nay, A can not even self-limit his 
own freedom by the possibility of B's freedom, un- 
less B also limits his own freedom by the possibility 
of A's, the principle of law being not applicable at 
all unless both take place. Unless both self-limit 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



their freedom, neither does. This has indeed been 
shown ah-eady sufficiently. The only question is, 
how does this as yet empty conception become ap- 
plicable ? If one person says to the other, " Leave 
that alone, it limits my freedom !" why should not 
the other reply, " But it limits my freedom to leave 
it alone V 

The question therefore is, how far shall each 
one limit the quantum of his free actions by the 
possibility of the other's freedom ; how far does the 
freedom extend which each may retain for himself, 
and only by respecting which the other can show 
himself also entitled to rights ; and how far does 
the freedom extend which he must resign to the 
others in his conception of their freedom, and only 
by respecting which he can show himself entitled 
to his own freedom 

The law-relation is determined solely by the 
established principle of law. Our question can 
therefore be determined only by that law principle. 
But this we have discovered to be purely formal, 
and not at all determining any quantity. It fixes 
merely the that, not the in how far. The whole 
principle of law is, therefore, either not at all appli- 
cable, and results merely in a play of empty con- 
ceptions, or the in how far must result from the 
that, and by determining the latter the former must 
also be determined. In other words, the mere con- 
ception of the freedom of another being must also 
determine the quantity of limitation which I have 
to put upon my own freedom. 



174 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



Let US see what this synthesis may involve, and 
what it may therefore signify. It involves 

A. The actual self-limitation of a free being is 
conditioned by the cognition of another free being. 
Whosoever has no such cognition can not self-limit 
his freedom ; and the possible free beings whom 
he does not know, do not bind him to limit his 
freedom. 

(In the deduction of original rights a person is 
thought isolated in the sensuous world. Not know- 
ing, therefore, any other person, he may extend his 
freedom as far as he chooses, and take possession 
of the whole world. His right is really — if original 
rights ever could be real rights — infinite, for the 
condition which would limit it does not exist.) 

B. The self-limitation of a free being is not only 
posited by the cognition of another free being, but 
also, at the same moment, completely determined. 
That it is so posited we have already shown. But it 
must also be determined ; that is, the mere cogni- 
tion of the other must determine the limit which 
the person has to put upon his own freedom. 

C. My freedom is limited by the freedom of the 
other only on condition that he limits his freedom 
by the conception of mine. Otherwise he is lawless. 
Hence, if a law-relation is to result from my cog- 
nition of the other, the cognition and the consequent 
limitation of freedom must have been mutual. All 
law-relation between persons is, therefore, condi- 
tioned by their mutual cognition of each other, and 
is, at the same time, completely determined thereby. 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



175 



We now proceed to apply our synthesis to the 
several cases determined by it ; and firstly to the 
right of the continuing freedom of the body. 

I. We have shown that a rational being, when 
perceiving a body articulated for the representation 
of reason in the sensuous world, must posit that 
same as the body of a rational being. By positing 
that body, it determines it also as a certain quantity 
■of matter in space, which fills this space and is im- 
penetrable in it. 

Now, the body of a rational being is necessarily 
free and inviolable in virtue of its original rights. 
Hence, the other person who takes a cognition of 
that body must, by virtue of this his cognition, be 
forced to restrict his freedom to causality in the 
sensuous world, by that body and by the space 
which it occupies. He can not posit that body as a 
thing to be influenced by him arbitrarily and sub- 
jected to his purposes, but solely as something 
whereby the sphere of his causality is limited. 
That causality may extend everywhere except to 
the space occupied by this body. As soon as I 
have seen the body and recognized it as that which 
it is, I have also recognized something which limits 
my causality in the sensuous world. My causality 
is excluded from the space occupied by that body 
at any time. 

But since this self-limitation depends upon the 
fact that the other has also seen and recognized 
me in the same manner, and limited his freedom as 
I limited mine, my limitation and the right of the 



176 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



other to it is, after all, only problematical ; and it is 
impossible to decide whether it has occurred or 
not. 

2. By positing the body of that other being as 
absolutely free in its self-determination to have 
causality, and by positing the being represented 
by it, as a free cause in the sensuous world, I must 
necessarily posit that this being desires to have 
some effect in the sensuous world to correspond to 
its conception, and hence that it has subsumed cer- 
tain objects of the sensuous world to its ends, ac- 
cording to the conception of original rights. The 
other being must assume the same of me. 

These objects, subjected by each to his particu- 
lar purposes, must be mutually inviolable to both 
of us, if we know them. But since this subjection 
remains within the consciousness of each, and does 
not manifest itself in the sensuous world, the ob- 
jects of this right and limitation remain also pro- 
blematical. 

3. The objects of this right are problematical, 
and not only they, but the right itself is problema- 
tical, is uncertain, and depends upon the unknown 
condition, whether both parties have mutually rights 
upon each other. I am bound to respect the ob- 
jects which the other has subordinated to his ends 
only in so far as the other respects those which I 
have subordinated to my ends. But he can not re- 
spect them until he knows them ; nor can I respect 
his until I know them. This mutual ignorance 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



177 



cancels even the possibility to approve each other 
as beings who have rights. And since this igno- 
rance extends even to the fact whether each in- 
tends to respect the freedom and inviolability of 
the other's body, the result is, that no law-relation 
at all is possible between them ; every thing is and 
remains problematical. 

In our deduction of the right of compulsion, we 
discovered already that, as soon as that right is to 
be applied, men can not live together without an 
agreement. We now find that this impossibility 
exists even before the right of compulsion is ap- 
plied, and enters, indeed, as soon as mutual rights 
are tried to be established. 

That problematical state and uncertainty can not 
remain permanent if a living together of individu- 
als under the conception of rights is to be possible ; 
for if it does, no one can subject objects to his ends 
without fearing that the other may already have 
subjected them to his own purposes, and without 
fearing, therefore, to trespass upon the other's 
rights. Nay, neither can be secure of his previous 
possessions, since it is always possible that the 
other may take possession of it under the pre- 
sumption that it has as yet no owner, and since in 
that case it would be impossible for the previous 
owner to prove his title ; which title again might 
also be illegal, however honestly supposed to be 
legal, since the other may previously have subject- 
ed the object of it to his purposes. How is this to 



178 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



be decided ? It is quite possible that neither of 
the parties know which of them has the previous 
title ; or, if they could know it, their ground of 
decision would always remain a matter of internal 
conscience, and could, therefore, not attain external 
right. A law-dispute arises between them, which 
can not be decided, and a dispute of physical pow- 
ers, which can only end with the physical annihila- 
tion of one of them. Only by pure chance, name- 
ly, if it should happen that neither has a desire for 
what the other has, could they possibly live togeth- 
er in peace. But they can not possibly allow all 
their right and security to depend upon pure 
chance. 

Unless this uncertainty is removed, a legal rela- 
tion between both is impossible. 

If it is problematical, moreover, what the objects 
of the rights of both parties and of their mutual ob- 
ligation are, it is also problematical whether a con- 
dition of rights and whether obligation do at all ex- 
ist. He who desires the conception of rights to be 
realized, desires this problematical condition to cease. 
This condition must be removed ; and the Concep- 
tion of Rights itself desiring that removal, there 
must be a right to remove it. The person, who 
does not desire to remove that condition of uncer- 
tainty, testifies by that very fact that he does not 
desire Law to rule. He becomes, therefore, law- 
less, and justifies, on the part of the other, an in- 
finite compulsion. 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



179 



Jkit how shall their ignorance be removed ? It 
has been shown, that the conception of a person 
involves the assumption that he has subjected some- 
thing in the sensuous world to his purposes. It 
would thus seem necessary that each person, when 
obtaining cognizance of the existence of another 
person, must limit his possession of the sensuous 
world to some finite quantiiui ; for otherwise, the 
other person could not exist as a free being ; but 
ivJiat particular finite quantum each person so 
chooses as his own, must depend altogether upon his 
freedom. Again : This choice remains a matter of 
the person's own consciousness, and does not mani- 
fest itself in the sensuous world. Each must, there- 
fore, state to the other what he has thus appropria- 
ted as his own, since such is the only way to re- 
move the uncertainty which threatened to cancel 
the Conception of Rights. Each is legally bound 
to determine himself internally as to what he de- 
sires to appropriate for his exclusive use ; and each 
has the right to compel an undetermined person to 
thus determine himself, since the establishment of 
Right requires that the determination of each in 
this respect should be made known. Each is, there- 
fore, moreover, legally bound to express himself ex- 
ternally concerning this his self-determination, and 
the other has a right to compel him to this expres- 
sion, that is, to compel him to make a declaration 
of his possessions. 

All lawful relation between persons is thus con- 
ditioned by the reciprocal declaration of what each 



l8o THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 

desires exclusively to possess, and becomes possible 
only through such a declaration. 

These declarations of several parties may agree 
or may conflict with each other ; agree, if no one 
declares a wish to possess what the others have 
appropriated, and conflict if both claim the same 
object. In the first case they are already united ; 
but in the latter case their dispute can not be set- 
tled by grounds of law at all. For as to the claim 
of previous possession, this neither of the parties 
can prove externally, and hence neither can fur- 
nish a legal proof. For since the law declares the 
expression of the will to possess something to be 
the ground of all property, and since both parties 
express that will at the same time, both parties have 
an equal right before the law. 

Two solutions of this difficulty are possible. 

Firstly. Both parties may mutually compromise 
as to their respective claims, and may thus enter 
the required condition of harmony. It must be re- 
membered, however, that neither has the right to 
compel the other to compromise ; for the other's re- 
fusal to cede part of his claims does not prove his 
unwillingness to recognize law in general. He 
has chosen a particular possession and thus has 
fulfilled the requirement of the law. He is, more- 
over, willing to subject himself to the rule of the 
law hereafter, provided his claim to his choice 
possession be granted. But he has no notion of 
of ceding that claim merely in obedience to my 



THE SCIENCE OF RIG I ITS. l8l 

will, and because I also desired that same piece of 
possessions. He holds my will to be a particular, 
individual will, and not the common will of the 
law, which we both ought to acknowledge, but 
which does not decide in this case as to whose 
claim is the right one. 

Or, secondly, if they can not agree, a quarrel or 
war will ensue, which can end only with the com- 
plete extermination of one of the parties. Now, 
since such a war — as, indeed, all war — is against 
the law, or is absolutely unlawful, they are bound, in 
order to prevent the war, to ti'ansfer the decision 
of their disjDute to a third party, and hence to 
transfer their whole right of deciding questions at 
law and their physical power to enforce such deci- 
sion to this third party. Or, as we expressed it be- 
fore, they must both join a commonwealth ; and 
each has the right to compel the other to join a 
commonwealth with him, since only thus the main- 
tenance of law and a legal relation between men 
is made possible. 

How the rights of property are settled, if the par- 
ties thus enter a commonwealth, we shall see here- 
after, when we come to speak of the Conception of 
Rights as applied in a commonwealth. At present 
the only question which concerns us is this : Sup- 
posing, therefore, all parties to be agreed from the 
start, or to have agreed by a compromise as to their 
exclusive possessions, and supposing each one to 
have now lawful possession only of what has thus 



l82 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



been ceded to him by the general declaration of 
property, upon what ground is his right of property 
to particular and fixed objects based, which the 
general division has assigned to him ? 

Evidently, altogether upon the fact that their 
wills were agreed and not in conflict, or that the 
one has ceded what the other claimed. Each one, 
by saying, " This only shall be my possession," says, 
at the same time, " Every thing else may be thine," 
and vice versa. Their right of property, that is, the 
right of exclusive possession, is therefore complet- 
ed and conditioned by nmtual I'ecognition, and does 
not exist without it. All property is based upon 
the union of many wills into one will. Through 
this mutual recognition, indeed, does a possession 
change vc\\.o property. 

I am excluded from the possession of a determin- 
ed object, not through the will of the other, but 
only through my own free-will. If I had not ex- 
cluded myself, I should not be excluded. But I 
must exclude myself from something in virtue of 
the Conception of Rights. 

Another result could, indeed, not have been ex- 
pected. If each person is to have original right of 
property to the whole sensuous world, but not to 
retain that right in actuality, and yet is to be and 
remain absolutely free, this is the only possible so- 
lution. 

My right of property to a particular object (not 
the right of property in general) is, therefore, valid 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



183 



only for those who have recognized this right of 
property amongst each other, and no further. It 
always remains possible, that all the rest of man- 
kind will come and dispute my right of property 
to something recognized as mine by the few with 
whom I have entered into a legal relation. There 
is, hence, no sure and absolute title to property ex- 
cept a title recognized by the whole human race. 
To obtain this recognition seems an infinite task, 
and yet it is easy of solution, and has, indeed, been 
solved long ago by men. To wit, each citizen of 
a commonwealth guarantees to each other citizen 
thereof his right of property to his selected pos- 
session. Now, the adjoining commonwealths ac- 
knowledge and guarantee the right of property of 
this commonwealth, and hence of each citizen there- 
of The commonwealths adjoining tJiose again ac- 
knowledge their property, etc., etc. Even the re- 
mote commonwealths, therefore, which have not 
directly recognized my right of property in my 
commonwealth, have done so implicitly, since they 
have recognized the right of property in adjoining 
states, and can therefore not trespass upon the pro- 
perty of those states, which adjoining states again 
have acknowledged the same rights in the states 
next to tJiem, etc., etc. As our earth is an abso- 
lutely closed and connected whole, each piece of 
property is, therefore, mediately recognized by all 
mankind, through the immediate mutual recogni- 
tion of adjoining commonwealths. True, in a state 
of war all law relation ceases, and the property of 



184 THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 

all the states at war becomes insecure ; but a state 
of war is not a lawful condition. 

When this general declaration of property oc- 
curs, if some objects of the sensuous world should 
remain unappropriated, these unappropriated ob- 
jects are property of none, ( res ncutrins.) It needs 
no special declaration to fix these objects, since all 
objects not expressly declared to be appropriated 
are unappropriated. Now, in regard to these un- 
appropriated objects the same difficulty may arise, 
which we met at the first start, when attempting to 
fix the right of property in general. After this 
general declaration, two persons may desire to pos- 
sess themselves also of this unappropriated pro- 
perty, and, as each one has the sarne right to it, a 
state of uncertainty will again result, which can not 
be allowed to remain if the Conception of Rights is 
to rule. That uncertainty must be removed. In 
the first general establishment of a state of law, 
therefore, a rule regarding this future appropriation 
of unappropriated possessions must be fixed. It is 
not only advisable to do so, but such a rule must be 
fixed and agreed upon, or a complete and secure 
state of law is impossible. Each person has, there- 
fore, the right to compel the other to agree to some 
rule, generally valid, for those future appropria- 
tions. 

What sort of a rule may this be The declara- 
tion of joroperty determines the object taken pos- 
session of ; the recognition secures to the proprietor 



THE SCIENCE OF KIGIITS. 



185 



the guarantee and consent necessary to make it his 
property. Now, this recognition may precede the 
declaration ; that is, at the moment of the first 
agreement, a rule of recognition may be fixed for all 
future time ; but the declaration can not precede the 
recognition, if it is to refer to future appropriations. 
To make such a rule possible, therefore, it would be 
necessary to mutually agree, that each will hereafter 
recognize each declared possession of the other in 
the region of the unappropriated objects to be that 
other's property the moment such a declaration is 
made. 

In virtue of such an agreement, the one who 
would first make public his declaration would 
thereby secure a complete right of property and 
title to it, since all others would have agreed in ad- 
vance to respect such a title. Hence, there arises 
here for the first time, and solely in consequence of 
a voluntary but legally necessary agreement, a 
rule of laiv from priority of time ; and the law for- 
mula : Qzd prior tempore, potior jtirc, which had 
hitherto no legal validity for an external court of 
law, has now been grounded. Another law formula, 
Res nullius cedit -prima occupanti, is at the same time 
more particularly determined and limited. There 
are no absolutely res nullius in the eye of external 
law. Things are ownerless only through a mutual 
declaration and exclusion from them, {I'cs neutrius) 

The possibility of an endless law dispute has not 
been removed, and the proper law relation 
has not been completely secured, unless it can be 



i86 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



SO arranged that the declaration follows imme- 
diately the taking possession of an object. For 
unless I do immediately declare my possessions^ 
another person may come to declare his posses- 
sion of the same object, (not having known of mine,) 
and the law dispute will again be interminable. 

Possession and declaration must therefore be 
synthetically united, or the occupied object must, at 
the occupation, be so determined that the other 
can not perceive the object without perceiving that 
it has been taken possession of The object itself 
must express the declaration ; hence, both parties 
must have agreed upon certain signs of occupation ; 
and since it is necessary to have these signs in or- 
der to make possible the rule of law, there is a right 
to compel the other to make and respect these 
signs. These signs are signs only in so far as they 
have been agreed upon. Hence, they may be of 
any possible nature. The signs used in landed 
property are usually fences or ditches. Animals 
are thereby prevented from entering such property, 
and rational beings are thereby reminded that they 
are not to make use of their power to enter it. 

Concerning the abandonment of property, ( dcre- 
lictio dominii,) in regard to which law disputes 
might also be possible, it is at once clear, that the 
first property which was acquired through mutual 
declaration and recognition, can be abandoned only 
by the express declaration of the possessor, that he 
no longer desires to possess it. For the grounded 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



187 



reaches as far as the round. Now, the declaration 
is the sole ground of this kind of property, hence 
the property can not be deemed abandoned until the 
declaration is annulled. When it is annulled, the 
property becomes ownerless, and belongs to the 
class of ownerless objects already alluded to. 

As far as the afterward acquired property 
( dominium acqiiisitnin ) is concerned, the title to 
which is obtained through the sign of occupation, 
it can, of course, be abandoned only by the removal 
of the sign ; and, by the removal of the sign the 
title to this property is abandoned in virtue of the 
same rule ; the grounded extends no further than 
the ground. It might be maintained, that the sign 
having once been fixed upon the property, every 
body now ought to know that it has been taken 
possession of, and that the removal or destruction 
of the sign ought not to invalidate the title. But 
you never can prove that others have seen the 
sign. They may never have seen the property, or 
if they have seen it, may never have noticed the 
sign. Hence the sign is not superfluous, but is the 
necessary and continuing ground of right to the 
property ; and if the owner takes it away or allows 
it to be destroyed, he is to be considered as one 
who has abandoned his property. 

By making this fixed agreement concerning their 
property, the persons who make it reciprocally prove 
to each other that they have subjected themselves 
to the law, and hence, that they are beings who havp 

N 



lS8 THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 

rights. By means of this property covenant, there- 
fore, do the freedom and inviolabihty of their 
bodies, which before remained problematical, also 
receive sanction, and now become a categorical 
right. Of course, to secure it in a particular agree- 
ment is not necessary, since the in how far of that 
freedom is not at all disputable, but is given in the 
mere cognition. The that of those rights of the 
body, however, is decided by the property cove- 
nant. 

Our investigation has thus returned into itself 
What was first problematical, has become in its 
simple self-development categorical ; and our inves- 
tigation is, therefore, completely exhausted. 

The free beings have now been completely deter- 
mined in regard to the limits of their free acts in 
relation to each other. Each has its determined 
stand-point in the sensuous world, and they can not 
get at all into a law dispute, if they keep on that 
stand-point. An equilibrium of rights has been 
established between them. 

The synthetical proposition, that the in itself 
formal principle of law does also determine the 
material extent of the rights of each person, has ap- 
proved itself as true by its universal applicability. 
Through the mere cognition of a free being my law 
relation to it is immediately determined for me, 
that is, is posited as necessarily to be determined. 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



Either I must determine it myself freely, or the 
state determines it for me. 

We have thus answered the most important 
question of the Science of Rights : How can a 
purely formal rule of law be applied to determined 
objects ? 

III. 

The Principle of all Laws of Compulsion or 
OF Penal Law. 

Our whole argumentation in the deduction of an 
equilibrium of rights turns around in a circle ; and 
if we reflect upon this circle, the lawful condition, 
which was to be made possible through the estab- 
lishment of an equilibrium of rights, again becomes 
impossible, and the Conception of Rights appears 
still empty and without an applicability. 

The rational beings, which we posited as recipro- 
cally recognizing each other as such, were all un- 
certain whether the one could depend upon its 
rights being secured against the attacks of the 
other ; and hence whether the other one had any 
rights at all, or ought not rather to be driven away 
by physical force from the sphere of causality of 
the first one. This uncertainty we claimed to have 
removed in causing both to mutually recognize and 
determine the sphere of their rights, since this 
recognition and determining was evidence that both 
had subjected themselves to the Conception of 
Rights. 

But their mutual security is so far from being 



190 THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 

based upon their agreement to live together in a 
lawful condition, that it rather is based altogether 
upon the fact, whether in all their future acts they 
will conform to this agreement. Hence, the agree- 
ment presupposes mutual confidence of the one in 
the other, that he will make that agreement his 
irrevocable rule of action. But the adoption of such 
a rule presupposes in each party the will to estab- 
lish and maintain a lawful condition between them ; 
presupposes, therefore, their subjection to the Con- 
ception of Rights ; and thus that which was to prove 
the honesty and lawfulness of each party, namely, 
his subjection to the law, proves it only if that 
which is to be proved is presupposed, and has no 
validity or significance unless such presupposition 
is made. 

Our whole subsequent investigation depends upon 
the correct and strict comprehension of this point. 
The security of both parties is to depend, not upon 
chance, but upon a necessity, equal to a mechanical 
necessity, and one from which there is no excep- 
tion possible. Now, such a security is possible only 
if the Conception of Rights has been made the irre- 
vocable rule of action of each party ; and unless 
both are convinced that each has thus adopted it, 
the agreement to respect each other's property and 
personal liberty affords no security at all, since it 
rests upon this very subjection to the Conception of 
Rights and has no effect otherwise. There are many 
reasons which might induce either party to enter 
an agreement without having the slightest inten- 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. IQI 

tion to keep up to it. Or they may have made the 
agreement with sincere intention to keep it and to 
live together in a legal state, and yet may have 
since changed their minds. The moment one par- 
ty can suppose this possible of the other, he has no 
security any longer, but must always be prepared 
for disturbance and war, and thus can lead the oth- 
er party, who may still be honest and sincere in his 
submission to the law, to entertain the same dis- 
trust. Each party thus obtains the right to annul 
the agreement and to get rid of the other party, 
since the possibility of both parties living together 
as free beings has been canceled. Their agreement 
is annulled, because that upon which it was based, 
mutual confidence, has been annulled. 

Result : The possibility of a legal relation between 
persons is conditioned by miitnal fidelity and coitfi- 
dence. But mutual fidelity and confidence are not 
dependent upon the Conception of Rights, and can 
not be compelled by law, nor is there a right to 
compel confidence and fidelity, since confidence 
and fidelity can not be externally manifested, and 
hence do not appertain to the sphere of the Con- 
ception of Rights. Nor can I even compel any 
body not to manifest his distrust in me ; for if I had 
that right of compulsion, it would force him to 
abandon all care for his own security, and hence all 
care for his freedom and his rights. Such a right 
on my part would make him subject to my arbi- 
trary law decisions and to my power ; in other 



192 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



words, would enslave him, and no one has the right 
to enslave another. 

Whenever fidelity and confidence between per- 
sons living together have been lost, mutual securi- 
ty and legal relation between them have become 
impossible, as we have seen. The parties can not 
become convinced of the groundlessness of their 
distrust, simply because such a conviction can be 
based only upon a fixed, unchangeable good will — a 
will which each person can scarcely presuppose in 
himself, much less in others. Fidelity and confi- 
dence, therefore, when once lost, can not be re- 
stored ; either the distrust continues and spreads, 
or a war finally breaks out, which is an unlawful 
state, and, moreover, can not restore confidence. 

Now, none of the parties care about the good will 
of the other in itself, in its fonn ; for, as far as the 
good will is concerned, each is accountable only to 
his conscience. It is the results, or the material oi 
the will, which they care for. Each wills and has 
the right to will that the other party's acts shall al- 
ways be such as would result if he had a good v/ill. 
Whether this good will really is the incentive of 
those acts or not, is all the same to him. Each has 
claim only to the Legality of the other, not to his 
Morality. 

Nevertheless, the provision to be made to re- 
press acts which ought not to occur, must not 
operate through means of a mechanical power 
of nature ; firstly, because this can not be done, 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



man being free, and hence able to resist and 
overcome any power of nature ; and secondly, be- 
cause such a procedure would be unlawful ; for 
man would thus be changed into a mere machine 
in his legal state, and would not be supposed to 
have any freedom of will, to secure which, alone, 
the whole legal relation is established. Hence, the 
arrangement to be established must be of such a 
character as to relate to the will itself, as to induce 
and compel the will to determine itself never to 
will any thing inconsistent with lawful freedom. 

It is easy to see, that such must be the solution 
of the problem ; but it is far more difficult to deter- 
mine what this solution may really signify and in- 
volve. 

The free being with absolute freedom proposes 
to itself certain ends. It wills because it wills, and 
the willing of an object is itself the last ground of 
such willing. Thus we have previously determined 
a free being, and any other determination would de- 
stroy the conception of an Ego, or of a free being. 

Now, if it could be so arranged that the zvilling 
of an unlawful end wo2ild necessarily — in virtue of 
an always effective law — result in the very reverse of 
that end, then the unlawful will would al- 
ways ANNIHILATE ITSELF. A pcrson could not 
will that end for the very reason because he did 
will it ; his unlawful will would become the ground 
of its own annihilation, as the will is indeed always 
its own last ground. 



194 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



It was necessary to establish this principle in all 
its synthetic fullness, since upon it all laws of com- 
pulsion (the whole Penal Law) are grounded. We 
shall now proceed to analyze it. 

The free being proposes to itself an end. Let 
this end be called A. Now, it is very possible that 
this A may be related to other ends as a means, and 
that these other ends are again so related to still 
others, etc. But no matter how far this relation 
extends, at the end there must be an absolute end 
which is willed simply because it is willed. All pos- 
sible mediating ends are related to this absolute and 
total end as its parts, and in so far are also to be re- 
garded as absolute end. I will A, signifies, I de- 
mand that something corresponding to the concep- 
tion of A be given in perception as existing. Hence, 
the conception of the real existence of A, or the will 
that A shall exist, is the real motive power of the 
will A. As sure as I desire A and its real exist- 
ence, I must detest its opposite as the greatest evil 
possible to me. 

Hence, if I can foresee that an act which I under- 
take to realize A must necessarily result in the op- 
posite of A, I can not wish to realize A, for the 
very reason that I do desire it and do not desire its 
opposite ; I can not will A because I will it. Our 
problem is therefore solved. The lawless will anni- 
hilates itself and keeps itself in its own limits. 

Hence, if a contrivance could be secured which 
would operate with mechanical necessity so as to 
cause each lawless act to result in the very opposite 



TIIK SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 195 

it was intended to produce, then such a contrivance 
would compel the will to desire only what is law- 
ful ; and would restore the security which must be 
restored, after fidelity and confidence have been 
lost. The good will would be rendered superfluous 
for the external realization of right, since the bad 
will would be forced by its very badness to' effect 
the same end. A contrivance of this kind is called 
a Laiv of Coniptilsion. 

There exists a general right to establish such a 
contrivance, since reciprocal legal freedom and 
security can only exist, as we have discovered, by 
means of it. Hence, the problem to establish it is 
involved in the Conception of Rights. 

The freedom of the lawful will remains unviolated 
by this contrivance, and retains all its dignity. So 
long as a person desires that which is lawful only 
for the sake of lawfulness, he experiences no long- 
ing for the unlawful ; and since the law of compul- 
sion operates only where this longing exists, it 
never effects the just person at all. His own good 
will places him above all external law, and he is 
utterly freed from it. 

But a person may trespass upon another per- 
son's right without being thereunto impelled by a 
bad will. It may be done through carelessness. 
The law of compulsion, however, is operative only 
when a bad will exists ; and hence, through its 



196 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



means the rights of persons are not yet sufficiently 
protected. Let us examine this. 

All carelessness can be reduced to this, that the 
careless person Jias no zvill at all in cases when he 
ought to have a will and when he must be assumed 
to have had one as sure as he claims to be a free 
and rational being. If in a certain case he has 
acted without a clear conception of his acting, if he 
has acted mechanically, obedient to chance impul- 
ses, it is impossible to live together with him in 
security as a rational being. He ceases to be a 
rational being, and becomes a product of nature, 
which ought to be compelled to inactivity. But 
this can not be done, both because he has, after all, 
a free-will, and because his general freedom must 
be respected. 

The following rule applies to such cases : Each 
person must take as much care not to violate the 
rights of others as he takes care that his own are 
not violated. The proof of the validity of this rule 
is as follows : the final end required of me by law 
is, mutual security. This involves the end, that the 
rights of the other shall not be violated by me, in the 
same degree as the end, that mine shall not be vio- 
lated by him. Both these ends, the inviolability of 
mine as well as that of the other's rights, must be 
equally ends of my will, and until they are so, my 
will is not a lawful will. 

The question is : How is it to be so contrived 
that a person will have a will when he ought to 
have it, or, as we have just now determined the 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGIirS. 



197 



proposition, that he will take as much care not to 
violate the right of the other, as he takes care to 
protect his own right against the other ? 

Let us first examine the rule as we determined 
it at the outset, because it is the most difficult, and 
hence makes the investigation most interesting. 
How then is it to be contrived to produce a will 
where it ought to be ? 

That which has no will at all is not a free or a 
rational being. The free persons, whom we have 
posited here, have a will ; the direction of that will 
is also known, for they have announced the objects 
which they have subjected to their ends, (their pro- 
perty.) This will, which is known to exist, must 
be so worked upon by the contrivance postulated, 
as to produce of itself the will which is lacking, and 
which, nevertheless, is necessary for mutual security ; 
that is to say, the gratification of the will, which 
they have, must be conditioned by their having the 
other will, which they ought to have but perhaps 
have not. 

To illustrate : I am known to have the end A. 
Now the law relation I have entered into with other 
free beings, demands that I also must have the end 
B ; but it is not known whether I will always enter- 
tain the end B. The way to force me to entertain 
B at all times, is to make it the condition of A. For 
in that case I am compelled to will B, since A is 
not possible without it. A is the end to assert my 
own right, B the end not to violate those of the 
other. Hence, if a law of compulsion can be con- 



198 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



trived, which with mechanical necessity will make 
the violation of the rights of the other a violation 
of my own rights, then I will certainly take as 
much care to protect his as to protect my own. In 
short, each loss which the other suffers through my 
carelessness, must become my own loss. 

The distinction between the former and the latter 
application of the law of compulsion is clear : In the 
first case, my will went beyond its limits, and at- 
tacked the exclusive rights of the other, with a view 
to use them for my own advantage. The law of 
compulsion addressed itself to this going beyond of 
my will, in order to drive it back within its limits. 

But in the second case, my will did not go far 
enough ; for it did not notice at all the rights of the 
other, as it should have done. Here, therefore, 
the law addressed itself to the care I take of my 
own rights, in order to impel my will to go far 
enough. Regard for my own security has, there- 
fore, under the law of compulsion, the contrary 
effect intended by my own will, namely, to induce 
regard for the other's security. Thus the equili- 
brium of rights is fully secured, and the conception 
of a law of compulsion, which is to secure those 
rights, has been completely exhausted. 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



199 



IV. 

The Establishment of a Law of Compulsion, 

The law of compulsion is to work in such a man- 
ner that every violation of the rights of the other 
is to result for the violator in the same violation of 
his own rights. The question is, How can such an 
order of things be established } 

A compulsory i^ower is evidently required which 
shall irresistibly punish the violator. Who is to 
establish such a power } 

This power is posited as a means to realize recip- 
rocal security, whenever fidelity and confidence 
have been lost ; and is posited in no other respect. 
Hence, it can be desired only by a person who has 
that object in view ; such a person, however, must 
necessarily desire its establishment. The persons 
posited by us as making the agreement, have that 
object in view ; hence they, and they alone, can de- 
sire the means to realize it. Their will is united in 
the object in view, and hence must also be united 
in the only means to realize it ; that is, they must 
will to make an agreement concerning the estab- 
lishment of a law of compulsion and of a compulsory 
power. 

What sort of a power is this to be As a power 
operative under a conception, and under a concep- 
tion of absolute freedom — namely, of the limits 
posited by the contracting parties to their causality 
in the sensuous world — this power can not be a 



20O 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



mechanical power, but must be a free power. Such 
a power, however, is not posited beyond their own 
common power. Their agreement to estabHsh a 
law of compulsion will thus have to contain the 
provision : that both parties agree to treat, zuith uni- 
ted strength, that one of them xvJio shall violate the 
rights of the other, in accordance zuith the provisions 
of the laiv of compulsion. 

But if the law of compulsion becomes applicable, 
one of these parties must be the violator, and it is 
contradictory that this one should lend his own 
strength to repel his own attack. He can, therefore, 
only promise that he will not resist the compulsion 
of the other, but will voluntarily submit to the pun- 
ishment of the other. This, however, is also contra- 
dictory, since his original violation presupposes that 
he intended to deprive the other person of his rights, 
and if he did, he will not now voluntarily give them 
up. 

Nevertheless, it must be so. For how else can 
a superior power of right be realized since we 
must ascribe to both parties equal physical strength. 
Thus it seems that the same party whom I could 
not trust to refrain from violating my rights, and 
who, moreover, has since shown that this my dis- 
trust was justified, must now be trusted by me 
voluntarily to submit to the punishment provided 
by the law of compulsion. But this same difficulty 
remains if that party does so submit. For if the 
aggrieved party himself inflicts the punishment 
provided by the law of compulsion, who is to gua- 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



201 



rantcc to the aggressor that the aggrieved party 
will not purposely step beyond the provisions of the 
law of compulsion, or that he has not made a mis- 
take in applying it ? The aggressor also must, 
therefore, have an impossible confidence in the 
justice and wisdom of the other, after first having 
lost that confidence ; all of which is contradictory. 

An agreement such as we have found necessary - 
is, therefore, contradictory, and can not be realized. 

It could be realized only if the aggrieved party 
had always superior power, extending, however, 
only to the limit provided by the law of compulsion, 
and if he lost all that power as soon as he had 
reached that limit ; in other words, if each party 
had precisely as juuch poiver as right. 

This condition is, as we have seen before, possible 
only in a commonwealth. Hence, an application of 
the law of compulsion is not possible except in a 
commonwealth; outside of a commonwealth com- 
pulsion is only problematically lawful, and for that 
very reason is always unlawful if really applied. 

Hence, Natural Laiv, or a legal relation between 
men, is not possible at all except in a commonwealth 
and under positive laws. 

Either general morality, and universal faith in 
this morality, prevails — and even in that case it 
would be the most marvellous of all chances if men 
could agree upon their claims ; and if morality so 
rules, law does not exist at all ; for that which law 
should enforce occurs without its application, and 



202 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



that which it jDrohibits is never done. For a race 
of perfect moral beings there is no law. That 
mankind can not be this race is clear from the sim- 
ple fact that man must first be educated, or must 
first educate himself, to become a moral being. 

Or there is no such general morality, or, at least, 
no universal confidence in it. In that case, the 
external rule of law certainly becomes applicable 
but it can be applied only in a commonwealth. 
Natural law, therefore, becomes inoperative. 

But what we thus lose on the one hand, we get 
back with profit on the other hand ; for the common- 
wealth now becomes the natural condition of man, 
and its laws will, after all, be only Natural Law 
realized. 



Second Part of the Science of Rights. 



^OOK pNE. 



CONCERNING STATE ORGANIZATION. 



§ I- 

Systematic Division of this Second Part. 

The problem which we were unable to solve, and 
which we hoped to solve through the conception of 
a commonwealth, was this : to realize a power which 
might enforce the Conception of Rights (or that 
which all persons necessarily will) amongst persons 
who live together in a community. 

The object of their common will is common secu- 
rity ; but since only self-love, and not morality, is 
supposed to exist — the wilHng of the security of the 
other emanates from the willing of the security of 
himself in each person. The former is subordinated 
to the latter. No one is supposed to care that the 
rights of the other are secure against his attacks, 
except in so far as his own security is conditioned by 
this security of the others. We may express this 
in the following formula : each one subordinates the 
common end to his private cfid. 

The law of compulsion is intended to produce 
this reciprocity or this necessary connection of both 
ends in the will of each, by combining the welfare 
of each with the security and the welfare of all 
others. 

But the will of a power which is to execute the 



2o6 



THE SCIENCE OF RICI/IS. 



law of compulsion can not be of this character ; for 
the subordination of the private to the common 
will being produced only by this power, which must 
be superior to all other power, that subordination 
could be produced in the supreme power only by 
its own power, which is a contradiction. Hence, 
that subordination and harmony of private and 
public will must not wait to be produced, but must 
exist from the very beginning in the power which 
is to carry out the law of compulsion ; in other 
words, the private will of that power and the com- 
mon will of all persons must be one and the same 
will ; the common will itself, and none other, must 
be the private will of this power, and the power 
must have no other particular will of its own at alL 

II. The problem of the Science of Rights is-,, 
therefore, to discover a will, which can not possibly 
be other than the common will. 

Or, to use our previous formula, which is better 
suited for our investigation, to discover a zvill, where- 
in private and common zvill are synthetically united. 

Let this will, which is to be discovered, be called X. 

A. Each will has itself (in the future) for its own 
object. The ultimate end of each willing person is 
his own preservation. This applies to X also ; and 
hence this is the private will of X. This private 
will is in X to be the same as the common will. 
The common will is the security of the rights of 
all. Hence X, as much as it wills itself, must wil} 
the security of the rights of all. 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



207 



B. The security of the rights of all is willed only 
through the harmonious will of all. Only in tins 
are the wills of all harmonious ; for in all other 
matters their willing is particular and has indivi- 
dual purposes. No individual singly has this for 
his object, but only all in common will it. 

C. X is therefore itself this agreement (harmony) 
of all. As sure as this harmony wills itself, it must 
will the security of all, since it is itself this very 
security of all. 

III. But a harmony like this is a mere concep- 
tion. Such it is not to remain ; but to be realized 
in the sensuous world, that is, to be established in 
a determined utterance and to have effect as a phy- 
sical power. 

All willing beings in the sensuous world are men 
to us. Hence, that conception must be realized by 
men. This requires : 

A. The will of a certain number of men in some 
particular time-moment must become really harmo- 
nious, and must declare itself as thus harmonious. 

It is important here, to show that this required 
harmony does not occur of itself, but is grounded 
in an express act in the scnsuoiis world, perceptible at 
any time and possible only through free self-deter- 
mination. The proof of this act has already been 
given, when it was shown that the applicability of 
the Conception of Rights is not possible, unless each 
person has made an express declaration of the ex- 
tent to which he has subjected objects of the sen- 



208 THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 

suous world to his end, or to which he has taken 
possession of them. 

The further development of this act is undertaken 
in our first book : Concerning State Organiza- 
tion. 

B. This common will must be clothed with a 
power, and with a supreme power, so that it may- 
maintain itself and its decisions by compulsion. 
This power involves both the right to decide law 
disputes and to execute these decisions : Judicial 
and Executive power. 

The manner of its establishment is developed in 
our second book : Concerning the State Consti- 
tution. 

C. This common will must be established as the 
unchangeable and permanent will of all, which each 
agrees to recognize so long as he remains in the 
commonwealth ; a fact which must always be borne 
in mind. The whole future will of each individual 
is concentrated into the one moment when he de- 
clares his willingness to participate in the common- 
wealth ; and this extending the present will so as 
to embrace the whole future, changes the expressed 
common will into law. In so far as the common 
will determines how far the rights of each person 
shall extend, the law is called Civil Law ; and in 
so far as it determines the punishment which shall 
follow a violation of the law, it is called Penal or 
Criminal Law. 

The further development of these conceptions is 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



209 



undertaken in our third book : Concerning Muni- 
cipal Law. 

§ 2. 

CONCERNING STATE ORGANIZATION.' 

Preliminary. — Let us analyze more thoroughly 
than we have done heretofore the conception of 
the fundamental agreement upon which a common- 
wealth is established. 

An agreement presupposes two persons who are 
posited as each desiring the same object to be his 
exclusive property. The object upon which they 
are to agree must, therefore, first, be of a nature 
which will allow it to become exclusive property, 
that is, which will allow the object to remain the 
same as conceived by either person when subjected 
to his end ; and, second, of a nature which will al- 
low it to be subjected to an end only as exclusive 
property. (See the deduction of the right of pro- 
perty in the paragraph on Original Rights.) If the 
former is not the case, then no agreement is possi- 
ble ; if the latter is not the case, no agreement is 
necessary. Hence a certain amount of light or of 
air is not a legitimate object of an agreement. 

Again : Both parties must have the same right to 
the object, otherwise there exists no law dispute be- 
tween them to be settled by an agreement. This 
is, indeed, the case as far as all objects and all free 
beings, who claim those objects, are concerned. 



2IO 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



Previous to the agreement, the only legal ground 
which a person can make valid for the possession 
of a disputed object is his freedom and rationality ; 
but all free beings can make the same ground valid. 
A dispute concerning the possession of their bodies 
is not possible amongst persons, since the natural 
end of each body, to be moved through free-will, is 
physically impossible to all but one. But to the 
rest of the sensuous world, all persons have the 
same claim. 

It is not necessary, however, that both parties 
need claim the same property at the present mo- 
ment ; the fear that such a claim may be raised in 
the futtire is sufficient to make an agreement neces- 
sary. But unless either case occurs, an agreement 
is altogether unnecessary, since then the sphere of 
freedom for both parties is so separated that a col- 
lision of wills is considered impossible. So long, 
for instance, as their possessions are separated by 
a river, which both parties consider impassable, it 
is useless for them to promise each other that they 
will not cross the river and attack each other's pro- 
perty. Nature has made the river the limit of our 
physical power. It is only when the river becomes 
fordable, or when we invent ships, that it becomes 
necessary to fix the river as the limit of our pos- 
sessions by agreement. 

This will of each party, to have exclusive pos- 
session of this or that piece of property, is the pri- 
vate will of each party. Hence, in the agreement 
there are, firstly, two private wills, which may be 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



211 



called material zuills, since they are directed upon 
an object. 

The possibility of an agreement requires, more- 
over, that both parties have the will to come to an 
agreement concerning their disputed claims, or to 
relinquish each a part of his claim until bot^i claims 
can coexist together. If one or both of the parties 
have not this will, an agreement becomes impossi- 
ble, and war is the result. The Conception of 
Rights requires each rational being to have this 
will, and there is a law of compulsion to force each 
person to enter an agreement, (which, it is true, has 
no applicability, since it is impossible to determine 
to what extent a person should relinquish his claim,) 
all of which has already been proved. 

This will of both parties to compromise their law 
dispute peaceably, we shall call, since it refers to the 
form of the agreement, their formal common will. 

Their will to restrict their two private wills so far 
that they may no longer conflict with each other, 
and hence to relinquish each a part of his claims 
for now and ever, we shall call their material com- 
mon zvill. 

By this agreement of both contracting parties, 
the will of each now extends also to the property 
of the other, which, perhaps, it did not previously, 
since the other party may not even have known it ; 
but it does so only negatively. The will of each 
party extends beyond its own private end, but mere- 
ly as a negative will. Each one does not will what 
the other wills ; that is all. Whether a third party 



212 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



wills the possessions of the other, is to each a mat- 
ter of indifference. The material will of both par- 
ties, in so far as it is a common will, is purely nega- 
tive. 

The conception of an agreement requires, more- 
over, that this common will be established as a per- 
manent will, determining all future free acts of both 
parties, as the rule of law which fixes their whole 
future legal relation to each other. As soon as one 
of the parties transcends the limits of this agree- 
ment in the least, the agreement and the whole 
legal relation established by it is annulled. 

It might be supposed that, in case of such a vio- 
lation of the agreement, the aggrieved party had 
only a claim to demand damages, and that a res- 
titution would place all things back in their origi- 
nal position. This is true, if the aggrieved party 
is satisfied with the restitution and is willing to re- 
new the agreement with the other party. But it is 
very important, for the sake of our future results, 
that it should clearly appear, that the offended party 
is not legally bound to be satisfied with damages ; 
the one violation of the agreement strictly annul- 
ling the whole legal relation between them. 

For this reason : Previous to the agreement each 
of the parties had the most perfect title to the pos- 
sessions demanded by the other party and ceded to 
that other party in the agreement. Though the first 
party may not even have had knowledge of the exis- 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



213 



tence of those possessions, he might have obtained 
that knowledge at some future time. His right to 
those possessions he lost only by the agreement, 
by his voluntary cession. The agreement, however, 
exists only in so far as it is always maintained ; its 
violation annuls it. When the ground is annulled, 
the grounded is also annulled ; and since the con- 
tract was the only ground of the cession of those 
possessions to the other, with the contract that 
cession also is abrogated. Both parties are again 
in the same relation to each other which they occu- 
pied before the agreement. 

A. 

No legal relation is possible without a positive 
determination of the limit to which the freedom of 
each individual is to extend ; or, which is the same, 
without defining their property in the widest sense 
of that word, namely, in so far as it signifies not 
only the possession of real estate, but the rights to 
free acts in the sensuous zvorld generally. 

In the organization of a state or commonwealth, 
therefore, if that organization is to establish a 
general legal relation between individuals, each 
individual must agree with all others concerning the 
property, rights, and liberties which he is to have, 
and winch he is to cede to the others.* Each must 

* " The Declaration of Independence was a social compact by which 
the whole people ccrvenanted with EACH citizen of the United States, 
and each citizen with the whole people, that the United Colonies were, 



214 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



make this agreement with all the others in person. 
EacJi, is the one party, and all the others, as indivi- 
duals — for only as individual free beings does he 
agree with them — are the other party. Each one 
has said to all : I wish to possess this, and demand 
that you shall release all your legal claims to it. 
All have responded to each : We do release our 
claims to it, provided you release your claims to our 
possessions. 

All the requirements of an agreement are con- 
tained in this one. Firstly, the private will of each 
individual to possess something as exclusive pro- 
perty, for otherwise he would not have entered the 
agreement. Each citizen of a state has, therefore, 
necessarily a property ; for if the other had not 
guaranteed him his property, he would not have gua- 
ranteed theirs. Secondly, the formal will to make 
the agreement. Thirdly, it is necessary that each 
shall have agreed with the other concerning the 
matter of his possessions ; otherwise the agree- 
ment could not have been effected. Fourthly, 
the will of each is positive only in so far as his 
own possessions are concerned, and negative in 
regard to the possessions of all others. Again, 

and of right ought to be, free and independent States." ( John Quin- 
cy Adams, Jidy Oration, 1831.) But they covenanted more. Each 
citizen also covenanted with the whole people, and the whole peo- 
ple with each citizen, that all men are endowed with the rights of 
life, liberty, and the pursuit of happiness. These rights they gua- 
ranteed to each other in that compact ; and hence the Declaration 
of Independence is the Property Compact of the citizens of the Uni- 
ted Stales. — Translator. 



THE SCIENCE uF RIGHTS. 



215 



the possessions of each are recognized by the 
others only so long as the former recognizes 
their possessions. The least violation cancels the 
whole agreement, and justifies the offended party, 
if he has the power, to take away from the aggres- 
sor all his possessions. Each, therefore, pledges all 
his property as security that he ivill not violate the 
property of all others. 

I call this first part of a state organization the 
Property Compact of the citizens. 

Each individual has at one time actually thus 
declared his possessions, whether by word or by 
deed, in choosing publicly a profession, which all 
the others, at least tacitly, have consented to, and 
thus guaranteed. 

We have assumed that in a commonwealth all 
make the agreement with all. Some one might 
object that this is not necessary, and that, since 
men do business necessarily in a limited sphere, it 
would be sufficient if each individual made such an 
agreement with three or four of his next adjoining 
neighbors. According to our presupposition, how- 
ever, this would not be sufficient. Our presuppo- 
sition must therefore assume that each person can 
come in conflict with each other ; that hence, each 
is not limited to his chosen sphere in space, but 
has the right to traverse the whole sphere of the 
commonwealth.* It will appear, hereafter, that this 

* Translator's Remark. — Fichte does not touch the real 
point of difficulty here. The objection, as raised by himself, in- 



2l6 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



is really the case. At present we only wish to show 
from this requirement that, in a commonwealth, the 
agreement should be one of all with all, and that, 

volves this question : Why may not each two or three persons on 
the earth make such an agreement ? why must the state be a large 
commonwealth ? The solution suggested is the true one, though it 
is not expressed clearly and not at all deduced ; namely, the possi- 
bility is to remain " that each person may come in conflict with each 
other " on the face of the whole globe, or rather, with each individual 
member of the whole htiman race. I say, Fichte has merely suggested 
this solution, and has not at all attempted its deduction. Of course, 
as a principle of law, it must be involved in the conception of rights 
that each person shall restrict his freedotn by the conception of the free- 
dom of all others ; and the deduction may be thus sketched in its 
leading features : 

It has been shown that the consent of all human individuals must 
be obtained in order to render the title to any property (or rights in 
general) perfect. It has also been empirically stated by Fichte that 
this universal consent exists in the treaties of adjoining states, 
recognizing each other's possessions. This is not correct as an 
empirical statement ; if it were, we should have no wars. As a 
matter of fact, not a single state (our Republic excepted, for reasons 
which will clearly appear) recognizes the possessions of the other, 
but only awaits an opportunity to appropriate them ; and the ground 
of this is, that a legal relation is possible only between individuals, 
but not between states, when such states assume to be absolute 
bodies. From this universal uncertainty of property in all countries, 
which uncertainty increases with the number of small absolute 
states, (and hence was never greater than in Germany during the 
feudal times,) arises the unlawfulness of all states which do not 
embrace the possibility of annexing the whole globe, or of uniting 
the whole human race under one form of government. A small 
state of two or three persons, therefore, would be in contradiction 
to the conception of rights. There is not perfect security — and per- 
fect security that conception demands — possible in it. Nor is such 
security possible in any absolutely limited state. A commonwealth 
which is to afford perfect security must embrace the whole globe, 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



217 



although the possessions of all on the surface of the 
earth may be in part, that is, in a certain respect, 
divided amongst the individuals, still in another 
respect, which the agreement must also determine, 
there must be a sphere of action for all ; the mer- 
chant, for instance, retaining the privilege to travel 
and to sell his goods, the cattle-raiser to drive his 
cattle over the high-roads, the fisher to walk upon 
the property of the agriculturist along the rivers, 
etc., etc. 

Now, since the Conception of Rights can not be 
realized except through a universal commonwealth 
of all mankind, the right to realize it must always 
remain a right of each individual ; and it is this 

or at least, in order to be conformable to the conception of rights, 
must contain the possibility of uniting all mankind. We shall show 
in another place, that the only commonwealth which contains this 
possibility is that of the United States, and that hence the United 
States, with its form of government of a Confederate Republic, is 
the only lawful commonwealth on the face of the globe. 

For only a Confederate Republic furnishes really those states 
which Fichte wrongly asserted empirically to exist, namely, states 
which guarantee each other's possessions. None of its states being 
absolute, there is no cause for a war between them ; only riots (our 
late war was merely an organized gigantic riot)* are possible in a 
confederation. No state would be bettered by being enlarged, nor 
even lose by being made smaller. 

* The distinction between war and riot may be held to be either quantitative or 
qualitative. If held to be only quantitative, our late war, of course, was a war, 
and every large riot must then be called a war. But if we wish to make a qualita- 
tive distinction, a war can only be waged between separate absolute states, with 
a view to conquer each otlier's possessions, directly or indirectly ; and a riot or 
insurrection is a revolt against the law within a certain commonwealth. A riot is 
opposition to law ; a war has no reference to law at all, but ignores it 



2l8 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



right to realize a true lawful relation between man- 
kind, which is the legal ground, why each individ- 
ual, besides his particular limited sphere in space 
selected as his exclusive possession, has a right to 
claim all the rest of the world as sphere of causali- 
ty. Only, this latter right is neither exclusive nor 
absolute. It is defined in the separate common- 
wealths, but a universal determination of this right 
is not possible until the object contemplated by it, 
the establishment of a Universal Confederacy, has 
been realized. 



B. 

But the object of state organization is, to protect 
the rights guaranteed to each in the property-com- 
pact against all attacks whatever, and so to protect 
them by compulsion or physical force, if necessary. 

Such a protecting power has not been established 
if the will of each party remains only negative so 
far as regards the property of the other. The pro- 
perty-compact must, therefore, embrace another 
compact, in which each individual shall likewise 
covenant with all the other individuals of the com- 
monwealths that he will protect their specified pro- 
perty (or rights) to the extent of his physical pow- 
er, provided they will protect his property in the 
same manner. 

This agreement we will call the Protection-Com- 
pact. 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 2 1 9 

This second compact is in its matter conditioned 
by the first. Each can only agree to protect what 
he has recognized as the right of the other, whe- 
ther it consist of present possessions or in the per- 
mission to obtain future possessions under a cer- 
tain rule. But he can not promise to assist the 
other if the other should involve himself in quar- 
rels not provided for in the agreement. 

This second compact is distinguished from the 
first in this, that the negative will in respect to the 
other's property now becomes positive. Each pro- 
mises not only to abstain from attacking the pro- 
perty of the other, but, moreover, to assist in de- 
fending it against the attacks of any possible third 
party. 

Like every agreement, the protection-compact is 
conditioned. Each promises to the other protec- 
tion on condition that the other will also protect 
him. The agreement is annulled if any party does 
not fulfill its conditions. 

The protection-compact is distinguished from the 
property-compact remarkably in this, that in the 
former both parties agree merely not to do certain 
things, whereas in the latter both parties agree to 
do certain things. It can, therefore, be known at 
all times whether the property-compact has been 
complied with, since it only requires knowledge 
that certain things have not been done by the oth- 
er party ; but it can not always be known whether 
the protection-compact has been complied with, 

p 



220 THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 

since it requires that the other party shall do cer 
tain things which he can not do at all times, and 
which he really is never obliged to do. 

Let us examine this important point more close- 

The protection-comioact is a conditioned agree- 
ment concerning positive duties, and as such it can, 
in strict law, have no effect whatever, but is null 
and void. 

The formula of such an agreement would be as 
follows : On condition that you protect my rights, 
I will protect your rights. How, then, does some 
party obtain the right to claim the protection of the 
other ? Evidently, by actually protecting the rights 
of the other. 

But if this is so, no party will ever obtain a strict- 
ly legal claim to the protection of the other. 

It is important for our whole future investigation 
that this be clearly comprehended, and this com- 
prehension depends upon a thorough insight into 
the nature of this compact. I am legally bound to 
protect you only on condition tJiat yoti protect me. 

Let it be clearly noted what this last clause sig- 
nifies. It does not mean, merely, " that you have 
the good will to protect me." For good intentions 
can not be proved before a court of external law, 
and, moreover, might change at any moment. In- 
deed, it is the right of each party, never to be com- 
pelled to depend on the good intentions of the other 
party. Nor is that clause equivalent to saying, " On 
condition that you have protected me at some past 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 22 1 

occasion." For the past is past, and is of no mo- 
ment to me at present. Morality, gratitude, and 
other internal or moral qualities may, it is true, 
induce me to recompense past services, but in a 
Science of Right we must not take morality into 
account at all. On the field of law there is no 
means to unite men except through this insight : 
whatever you do to the other party, whether of 
good or of evil, you do not unto him, but unto your- 
self. 

Applying this to the present cases, it would be 
necessary to become convinced, that in protecting 
the other party I simply protect myself, either ac- 
tually in the present or prospectively in the future, 
namely, if protection of my rights in the future is 
the necessary result of my affording protection to 
him now. The former is not possible ; for in pro- 
tecting the other, I do not need and do not receive 
present protection. The second is equally impossi- 
ble ; for I can not have absolute certainty that the 
other will protect me again in the future. 

Our above exposition is the most stringent, but 
the matter may be viewed from various sides. For 
instance, either both parties are attacked at the 
same time, and in that case neither can afford pro- 
tection to the other, or they are attacked at differ- 
ent times. In the latter case, the party called upon 
to protect the other, might say, Our agreement is 
a conditioned one ; only by affording protection to 
me do you get a claim to my protection. Now, 



222 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



since you have not actually fulfilled the condition, 
the conditioned, of course, is null and void. In the 
same manner the other party v^^ill argue, and thus 
the conditioned will never become realized, because 
the condition can never be realized. They may 
come into a relation of moral obligation, if one 
party assists the other, but never into a relation of 
legal obligation. 

Let us compare this in itself null and void com- 
pact with the right based upon the property-com- 
pact. In the latter compact, the condition is only 
negative on either side, namely, that neither party 
shall attack the rights of the other ; and hence it 
can always be proved before external law, that its 
conditions have been complied with, and that a 
legal obligation exists. The condition in the pro- 
perty-compact is not a something, but a nothing ; 
not an affirmation, but a mere negation, continu- 
ously possible at all times ; and hence the condi- 
tioned is also possible at all times. I am always 
obliged to refrain from attacking the rights of the 
other, because thereby, and only thereby, do I legal- 
ly restrain him from attacking my rights. 

But if the protection-compact is null and void, 
then the security of the property-compact is also 
canceled, and the Conception of Rights can not be 
realized. 

The difficulty must be removed, and the solution 



rrfE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



223 



of this problem completes the fundamental compact 
of every state organization. 

The chief difficulty was, that it always remains 
problematical whether the obligation required by 
the protection-compact has been met or not, and 
hence, whether the other party has obligations or 
not. If this uncertainty can be removed, the diffi- 
culty is solved. It is removed, if the mere entrance 
into the agreement, the mere becoming a member 
of a state organization, carries along with it the 
fulfillment of the obligation demanded by the pro- 
tection-compact ;* in other words, if promise and 
fulfillment are synthetically united, if word and deed 
become one and the same. 

What we have just stated concerning the pro- 
tection-compact, applies to all compacts involving 
positive obligations, since it has been deduced from 
the general character of such compacts. In estab- 
lishing, therefore, the form whereby the protection- 
compact may become valid, that is, by making word 
and deed one, we have established the universal 
form of all such compacts. 

C. 

The protection-compact is to contain, at the same 
time, the fulfillment of its obhgations. How is this 
to be realized .'' Evidently in the following manner : 

*The protection-compact, therefore, forms part of the Constitu- 
tion. — Translator's Remark. 



224 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



The compact, which is to estabhsh the state organ- 
ization, must at the same time provide for a protec- 
tive power, to which each member of the organiza- 
tion must furnish his contribution. This contribu- 
tion would at once be the fulfillment of his promise 
to protect the rights of all other members, and 
there could be no further uncertainty as to his 
affording that protection to the others upon which 
his own claim to protection is grounded. 

But how is this protective power to be estab- 
lished, and what is actually established in estab- 
lishing it .'' 

To make clear the important conception we shall 
thus obtain, let us again place ourselves on the 
standpoint from v^rhich we saw the one person en- 
tering into an agreement with all the others. He 
is the one of the contracting parties. A contribu- 
tion is demanded of him as the condition of his en- 
tering the state. By whom is this contribution de- 
manded Who is the second party to this agree- 
ment ? 

This second party demands a protective power — 
for what particular individual ? For absolutely no 
particular individual, and yet for all ; for each one 
who may be attacked in his rights. This each one 
may or may not be every single one of them. The 
conception of the individual to be protected is, 
therefore, an undetermined conception ; and thus 
arises the conception of a Whole, which is not 
merely imaginery, (created by our thinking,) but 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



225 



which is actual ; a Whole not merely of all indivi- 
duals, but of a totality. 

Let us describe this totality more at length. A 
mere abstract conception is created solely through 
the free act of the mind. Such was the concep- 
tion of all persons together, which we established 
above. But the conception which we have now ob- 
tained is not created by an arbitrary act, but by 
something actual ; which, however, is as yet un- 
known, and can be determined only in the future 
through the apprehended attack. No one knows 
upon whom this attack will be made, but it may be 
made upon all. Each can, therefore, believe that 
the whole contrivance has been established solely 
for his particular benefit, and hence will cheerfully 
furnish his contribution. But the attack may also 
be made upon another. The contribution, however, 
has already become part of the Whole and can not 
be withdrawn. This undeterminedness, this uncer- 
tainty as to which individual is to be attacked first, 
this suspension of the power of imagination, there- 
fore, constitutes the real tie of union. It is it, by 
means of which all flow together into one, and are 
now united no longer in an abstract conception, as 
a coinpositum, but in fact, as a totum. Thus nature 
in the state unites again what she separated in the 
production of many individuals. Reason is only 
one, and its representation in the sensuous world is 
also only one ; mankind is a single organized and 
organizing Whole of Reason. Reason was sepa- 
rated into many independent members ; but even 



226 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



the natural institution of the commonwealth can- 
cels this independence provisionally and unites 
separate numbers into a whole, until finally morali- 
ty recreates the whole race into one. 

The conception thus attained can be properly 
illustrated by the conception of an organized pro- 
duct of nature ; for instance, of a tree. If you give 
each separate part of the tree consciousness and a 
will, then each part, as it desires its own preserva- 
tion, must also desire the preservation of the whole 
tree, because its own preservation is possible only 
on that condition. Now, what, then, is the tree ? 
The tree in general is nothing but a conception, 
and a conception can not be violated. But the 
part wills that not a single part of all the parts shall 
be violated, because that violation would inevitably 
be felt by it too. It is different with a mound of 
sand, where each part exists separately, and can, 
therefore, be careless as to what other parts are 
separated, trodden down, or scattered away. 

The thus established totality is, therefore, that 
which is to be protected, and is the required se- 
cond party to the compact. 

The point of union of this totality has been shown. 
But how and through what determined act of the 
will has this whole become a Whole 

We remain on our previous standpoint, from 
which we saw a single person enter the agreement ; 
and our question will soon be answered. 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



227 



That single person expresses his will to protect, 
of course, the Whole. He, therefore, becomes a 
part of the Whole, and joins together with it ; 
whether he become, as can not be foreseen, the pro- 
tector or the protected. In this manner, through 
covenants of single persons with other single per- 
sons, the Whole has arisen ; and when all single 
persons have covenanted with all other single per- 
sons, the Whole is completed. 

We call this compact, which secures and protects 
the two previous compacts, and in union with them 
forms the fundamental compact of state organiza- 
tion, the Union-Compact* 

* Our Consiitution, (or State constitutions.) Those who do not 
like to have the Declaration of Independence considered as the 
fundamental property-compact of our Constitution will, perhaps, 
be better pleased if we call the Bill of Rights (the amendments) of 
our Constitution the property-compact ; the sections, which consti- 
tute the government and provide for its efficacy, the protection- 
compact ; and the preamble the union-eompact. 

Our forefathers originally intended to keep the property-compact 
separate from the Constitution. They held that the Declaration of 
Independence specified the original and inalienable rights of men 
in sufficiently comprehensive terms, and that it would only be pro- 
ductive of harm to specify them in greater detail in the Constitu- 
tion, since such specification must necessarily be imperfect and 
would leave room open to the interpretation, that rights not speci- 
fied could be taken away by act of Congress. The Patrick Henry 
party, however, insisted on having this specification, and hence the 
original amendments to the Constitution, which are nothing more 
than an imperfect specification of the three fundamental original 
rights asserted in the Declaration of Independence. — Transis- 
tor's Remark. 



228 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



D. 

By virtue of this union-compact, each single per- 
son becomes part of an organized whole and melts 
into one with it. Is he swallowed up into it in all 
his being and essence, or does he remain free and 
independent in a certain other respect ? 

Each gives to the protecting body his contribu- 
tion ; he gives his vote to the election of magis- 
trates and to the constitution, and his fixed contri- 
bution of forces, services, natural products, or all 
of these changed into the common representative 
of value — money. But he does not give himself 
and what belongs to him altogether. If he did, 
what would remain his for the whole to protect 
The compact would be a contradiction, established 
on the pretext of protection, and yet with nothing 
to protect.* Its fundamental principle would be : 
all promise to protect, although all promise that 
they will have nothing to protect. Hence, the pro- 
tecting body consists only of parts of that which 
belongs to the single individuals. The whole em- 
braces them all, but each of all only in part. But 
in so far as they are thus embraced in it, they con- 
stitute the state and form the true sovereign. Only 
in giving his contribution does each belong to the 

*0n such a contradiction the "right" of conscription is based. 
The citizens of the United States have formed their constitution 
and government solely to guarantee to each other "life, liberty, and 
the pursuit of happiness." By ordering conscription, government 
takes away your freedom, in order to make you free ; takes away 
your r.fe, in order to secure it. — Translator's Remark. 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



22g 



sovereign. In a free state the payment of taxes is 
an exercise of sovereignty. 

But that which is to be protected embraces all that 
each one possesses.' 

The totahty thus established can not undertake 
to protect any thing which it has not recognized. By 
tmdertaking to protect all the possessions of each citi- 
zen, it recog7iizes Jus title to those possessions ; and 
thus the property-compact — which it at first ap- 
peared was only concluded between all as single in- 
dividuals — is confirmed by the actual totality of the 
commonwealth. 

In so far as the Whole must regard all violation 
of any of the possessions or rights of the single 
citizens as inflicted upon itself, the Whole is pro- 
prietor of all ; but in so far as it wishes to have free 
tise of any thing, only that which each citizen con- 
tributes toward the Whole is property of the state. 

That which the individual does not contribute to 
the Whole is his own, and in respect to it he re- 
mains individual, a free, independent person ; and 
it is this very freedom which the state has secured 
to him, and to secure which he became member of 
a state. Man separates himself from his citizenship 
in order to elevate himself with absolute freedom to 
morality ; but in order to be able to do so, he be- 
comes a citizen. 

In so far as the individual is limited by the law, 
he is a S7ibject, subject to the protective power with- 
in its limited sphere. Again : The agreement was 



230 THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 

entered into with him only on condition of his fur- 
nishing his contribution, and hence the contract is 
canceled when he does not furnish it. Each one, 
therefore, guarantees with all his property that he 
will so contribute, and he loses his right to his 
property if he does not contribute. The Whole 
likewise, since he voluntarily resigns all participa- 
tion in the decision of cases, becomes his judge, 
and he is in so far subject to it with all his proper- 
ty. If there is a penal law providing for such cases, 
as is to be supposed, he may buy off his fault by 
paying a penalty, and may thus save his property 
by losing only part of it. 

Thus our investigation returns into itself, and the 
synthesis is closed. 

The state-compact is, therefore, a compact which 
each single citizen enters into with the actual Whole, 
which Whole results from the agreements of the 
single individuals with each other, and whereby he 
becomes One with this Whole in regard to a cer- 
tain part of his rights, receiving in return the rights 
of sovereignty. 

The two parties of the contract are : the indivi- 
dual and the state as a whole. The compact is 
conditioned by the free, formal will of both parties 
to enter into an agreement. The material will, 
about which the parties must agree, is, on the one 
side, fixed property ; on the other side, relinquish- 
ment of title to all other property, and a fixed con- 
tribution to the protective power. Through this 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 2^1 

compact the citizen of the one party receives a se- 
cured projjcrty ; and the state of the other party re- 
ceives both a quit-claim to all other property in the 
state, which is necessary to perfect the title of all 
the other citizens of the state, and a fixed contribu- 
tion to the protecting power. 

This compact guarantees itself, it contains in it- 
self the sufficient ground that it will be kept, as in- 
deed all organized bodies have in themselves the 
sufficient ground of their existence. Either this 
compact does not at all exist for a person, or, if it 
does, it completely binds him. But the person who 
does not belong to this compact stands, indeed, in 
no legal relation to other persons at all, and is 
rightfully excluded from a reciprocity with other 
beings of his kind in the sensuous world. 

COROLLARIUM. 

So far as I know, the conception of the state as 
a whole has heretofore been established only by an 
ideal gathering together of the individuals, and thus 
the true insight into the nature of this relation has 
been lost. By such a gathering together, all possi- 
ble things may be collected into a whole. The 
uniting tie is always merely our thinking, and all 
the parts remain isolated as before, the moment we 
think differently. 

A true union has not been comprehended until 
the uniting tie has been shown up outside of the 
conception — as we say, from the empirical standpoint 



232 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



— or until that which compels tis in thinking to make 
this union, as we say, from the transcendental stand- 
point, has been shown up. We have shown up this 
uniting tie of the state as a whole in the concep- 
tion of the individual who is to be protected. That 
individual being necessarily undetermined, because 
any one of all individuals may need the protection, 
this very undeterminedness unites all individuals 
into one. 

The most proper illustration of this conception 
is an organized product of nature. Precisely as in 
it, each part can be what it is only in its connection, 
and out of it would not be this ; nay, out of all or- 
ganic connection, would be absolutely nothing, since 
without the reciprocal action of organic forces, hold- 
ing each other reciprocally in equilibrium, there 
would be no permanent form at all, but merely an 
unthinkable eternal war between being and not be- 
ing : so, also, does man receive only in the state 
organization a determined position in the series of 
things, a point of rest in nature ; and each receives 
this determined position toward others and toward 
nature only by living in this determined organiza- 
tion. Through the union of all organic power does 
nature constitute herself; through the union of 
the arbitrariness of all men does mankind consti- 
tute itself. 

It is the character of inorganic matter, which is 
thinkable only in conjunction with and as a part of 
the organized world, that in it no part can be found, 
which has not the ground of its determinedness in 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



itself, which is not completely explainable in itself; 
whereas, in organized products no part can be found 
which has the ground of its determinedness in it- 
self, and which docs not refer to and presuppose a 
being outside of itself. 

The same relation exists between the isolated 
man and the citizen. The former acts purely to 
satisfy his wants, and none of his wants are satis- , 
fied except through his own acts ; whatever he is 
exteriorly he is only through himself The citi- 
zen, on the contrary, has much to do and to leave 
undone, not for his own sake, but for the sake of 
the other ; and, on the other hand, his highest 
wants are satisfied not by his own acts, but by the 
acts of others. In the organic body each part con- 
tinually preserves the whole, and in preserving it 
preserves itself ; so also is the citizen related to the 
state. It is not necessary to have this preserva- 
tion of the whole particularly in view ; each citizen, 
in preserving himself in his position as part of the 
whole, preserves the whole ; and again, the whole, 
by preserving each in his position, preserves itself, 
and returns into itself* 

* The deduction here undertaken lacks comprehensiveness in its 
applicaiion. 

Firstly : An organized product of nature is not a completed whole. 
Not only do its parts point to an outside end, but the whole itself 
expresses this insufficiently, chiefly through the distinction of sex. 
A tree, as a whole, is not a complete organization. There is only 
one whole, one true, organized product of nature ; and that is the 
whole of nature itself. 

Secondly : If within the whole of nature we draw a distinction 
between organized products of nature and inorganic matter, the 
line of that distinction is arbitrary. For if it is once clear that there 



234 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



is only one complete organization, embracing all nature, then every 
part of nature, as part of that organization, must also refer to it, 
and thus the distinction between organic and inorganic matter falls 
away. (That distinction has indeed been swept away long ago by 
Leibnitz, whose monad-theory is this very statement.) Every 
grain of sand is as much an organized product as the tree or the 
animal ; and its reference to the totality of nature is quite as clear, 
if we get to the inside of it. (Each monad, says Leibnitz, from 
this very character of referring to another, must express the whole 
universe.) 

Thirdly : It is, therefore, possible to say both : all parts of mat- 
ter are organic, or all parts of matter are inorganic. They are or- 
ganic, if you consider that each atom must still be part of an orga- 
nization, and as such express it ; it is inorganic, if you consider 
that even the most perfect animal does not describe a complete re- 
turn into itself, and is no more perfect (qualitatively) a product of 
nature than a grain of sand or a piece of rock. Both statements 
are true, or neither is true ; for both are true only in their synthe- 
sis, under the higher conception of the whole of nature as the com- 
plete organization. 

Fourthly : Hence, that which was to be illustrated by the con- 
ception of a product of nature, and which is equally taken from 
empirical observation, must be modified. The state, as an organi> 
zation, is either the totality of mankind, or every two individuals 
may form a state. There is no ground why a state should be lim- 
ited by another number than the totality of rational beings on earth, 
just as we found no ground why the conception of organized pro- 
ducts of nature should be limited by only quantitative lines. I have 
already shown that Fichte never touches this difficulty. But it 
follows from his speculative ascertainments clearly enough. If 
every fraction of individuals can form a state organization, then the 
smallness of the fraction can not be determined, and it is purely a 
matter of chance how states will shape themselves. Every two in- 
dividuals have the right to form a different state. I have shown 
why no limited number of individuals has this right, namely, be- 
cause they are not perfectly secure until they have agreed with all 
members of the human race. The only legitimate form of govern- 
ment is, therefore, one which embraces, or proposes ultimately to 
embrace, all mankind ; and a true state organization must embrace 
all members of the human race. Only then is it a Whole, a To- 
tality. — Translator. 



^ooK JSecond 



CONCERNING THE STATE CONSTITUTION. 



§ I- 

THE ESTABLISHMENT OF A GOVERNMENT. 

Ihrough the state organization the common 
will has manifested itself, and become the law of 
all. But it has not yet been established actually, 
nor has the power to protect all the individuals of 
the state been, as yet, conferred upon it. The com- 
mon will is realized in the state organization as 
mere will ; but not as power to maintain itself, not 
as government. 

This is our present problem. 

The individuals of the commonwealth, as physi- 
cal persons in the sensuous world, necessarily are 
themselves possessed of power. Until some one 
transgresses the law, his will must be assumed to 
be in harmony with the common will, and hence 
his power is part of the common power. Thus 
each one, even if he has the desire to transgress 
the law, must always fear the power of all others, 
and all others must constantly fear his power ; sim- 
ply because neither party can have a knowledge of 
the other's intentions. In short, the power of all 
keeps the power of each single individual in check ; 
and the most complete equilibrium of rights is thus 
established. 



238 THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 

But as soon as the law has been transgressed, 
the matter changes. The transgressor is now ex- 
cluded from the law, and his power from its power. 
His will is no longer in harmony with the common 
will, but is a private will. 

So also is the offended party excluded from the 
execution of the common will ; for the very fact that 
he is the offended party makes his will ; that the 
transgressor shall be punished, a private will and 
not the common will. His private will, we have 
shown, is kept in check only by the power of the 
common will. If this power were intrusted into 
his hands for the purpose of executing what is 
clearly his private will, his private will would no 
longer be kept in check by the common power. 
Hence, only a third party can be judge, of which 
third party it is to be assumed that the whole dis- 
pute concerns him only in so far as the common 
security is endangered thereby, since he can have 
no private advantage in deciding in favor of this or 
the other party ; and of which party it is, therefore,, 
to be assumed that his will is the common will, ut- 
terly uninfluenced by his private will. 

Nevertheless, the possibility remains that the 
third party, from some unexplainable preference in 
favor of one of the parties, or because he may be 
interested after all, or because he is liable to error, 
will pronounce an unjust decision and combine with 
the offender to carry it out. Both parties would 



Tim SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



thus be united in favor of injustice, and the supreme 
power would no longer be on the side of the law. 

How is such a combination in favor of injustice 
to be made impossible ? 

The will of the common end or the rule of the 
law is, as we have shown, conditioned by the will of 
the private end of each ; his desire of public secur- 
ity is conditioned by his desire of his own security. 
Hence, it would be necessary to effect a contrivance 
which would make it impossible for individuals to 
combine together against the security of others 
without infallibly losing their own security. 

It is certainly true, that if such a combination has 
once been formed in a state, it thereby becomes pos- 
sible a second and a third time, and hence that each 
member of the first combination must apprehend 
that the rule of his own conduct will at some future 
time be turned against him. But still it is possible 
that each one will think, It won't hit me ; I shall 
be smart enough to be always on the winning side. 

The possibility of such a thought must be utter- 
ly taken away. Each one must become convinced 
that the subjection and unlawful treatment of one 
member of the state will infallibly result in his own 
subjection and unlawful treatment. 

Such a conviction can be produced only by a law. 
The unjust violence against an individual must, 
therefore, become legalised by its having occurred 
in one case. Because something has been allowed 
to occur once, each citizen must thereafter have 
a perfect right to do the same. In the words of a 



240 THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 

previously-used formula : Each deed must necessa- 
rily become law ; if it does, then every law is sure 
to become a deed. (This proposition is, indeed, a 
matter of course ; for the law is the same for all 
men, and hence what the law allows to one it must 
allow to all.) 

But this proposition can not be realized ; for 
through it right and justice are annulled for all 
time. The Conception of Rights can not involve 
such a self-contradiction ; hence, it can only signify 
that no single case of a violation of law must ever 
be allowed to occur, since its occurrence would an- 
nul law for all time to come. How this is to be ac- 
tualized will ap^Dcar directly, when we shall examine 
more closely the established conception of a poivcr 
of the law. 

We have said that the protective power must be 
one, the self-presei^vation whereof is conditioned by 
its continuous effectiveness, which will, therefore, 
be annihilated for ever if it remains inactive in one 
single case ; the general existejice of which, indeed, 
depends upon its manifesting itself in every single 
case ; and since this order of things is not sure to 
be established of itself, it must be provided for 
through a fundamental law of the constitution. 

It is established when the following provision is 
made : That a law shall have no validity for future 
cases until all previous cases have been decided ac- 
cording to it. In other words, no one must be al- 
lowed the benefits of a law until all previous persons 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



241 



who have claims under the same law have had their 
claims settled ; and no one must be punished under 
a certain law until all previous violations of this law 
have been discovered and punished. And since all 
laws are really only One Law, the provision must 
be : that the one general law can not be applied in 
any particular case until all previous cases have 
been decided according to it. A law, which in this 
manner prescribes a law to itself, such an in itself 
returning law, is called a Constitutional Law, or the 
Constitution. 

If this order of things is made secure by a power 
of compulsion, then the security of all and the un- 
interrupted rule of law seems firmly established. 
But how is it to be thus secured .'' 

If, as is always presupposed here, the whole com- 
monwealth holds the power of compulsion in its 
hands, what other power is there to force the com- 
monwealth to see that the required order of things 
is always upheld Or, supposing that all members 
of the state should for a while observe their funda- 
mental compact and the required constitution, but 
should in a certain case be unwilling or unable to 
redress at the moment the grievances of some party 
or another. In that case, the operations of the law 
would come to a stand-still, and the disorders arising 
therefrom would soon be so great as to compel the 
people to violate their constitutional provision and 
— leaving old offenses unpunished — to try and stop 
disorders by energetically punishing new offenses. 



242 THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 

For such a stand-still of the law would be the pun- 
ishment of their laziness, negligence, or partiality ; 
and why should the people inflict upon themselves 
a violence of this kind ? 

In other words, the people would be their own 
judge of the administration of the law. Now, so 
long as insecurity had not become general, the peo- 
ple would probably allow many violations of the law 
to pass unpunished. Suddenly, when matters would 
grow intolerable, the people, in order to remedy past 
neglect, would pounce with unjust and passionate 
severity upon the criminals, whom previous laxity 
had rendered bolder, and who had been led to ex- 
pect the same laxity in their own cases, but whose 
misfortune had brought them into the clutches of 
the law at the very epoch of the awaking of the peo- 
ple. This state of things would continue until ter- 
ror had become general. Then the fury of the peo- 
ple would die out, the people and the administration 
of the law would fall asleep again, and the old state 
of things would return. 

Such a form of government, the democratic* form 
of government, in the real signification of the word, 
is the unsafest which is possible, since each citizen 
has constantly to fear not only the attacks of other 
citizens, but also the blind rage of a maddened mob, 
which will carry out injustice under the name of 
law. 

* Democracy, as it was understood in Greece, namely, the direct 
rule of the people without a government. — Translator. 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 243 

Our problem, therefore, has not been solved ; and 
the condition of men is as unsafe as ever. The 
true ground of this unsafcty is, that the people can 
not be at the same time both judge and a party in 
the administration of the law. 

This discovers to us the solution of our problem. 
In the administration of the law, judge and party 
must be divided, and the people of the common- 
wealth can not be both together. 

The people can not be a party in this matter. 
For the people must remain the supreme power, 
and hence no judge, if the people were a party, 
could carry out his sentence against them, unless 
they should voluntarily submit, which is not to be 
supposed ; for if they did, they would respect the 
law above every thing, and no law-dispute could 
possibly arise. 

In short, there must be a law,* according to 
which it can be decided whether the power of the 
state has been properly applied or not ; and in this 
law-dispute the same person can not be both judge 
and a party to the case. Now, as the people must 
be one or the other in the law-dispute, and as they 
can not be party, from the reason stated above, the 
people can not retain the supreme power in their 
own hands. 

It is, above all, important to be convinced of the 

* There must be, besides the power of government, which en- 
forces the laws, another power, which makes it impossible for the 
power of government to violate the laws. This other power is, 
our American system of checks and balances. — Translator. 



244 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



Strictness of this argument, since it furnishes the 
a priori deduction, which, to my knowledge, has 
never before been given, of the absolute necessity 
of Representation in a commonwealth. It shows 
that a representative government is not only useful 
and wise, but is absolutely required by the Concep- 
tion of Rights, and that a Democracy, in the above- 
mentioned sense of the word, is not only an impo- 
litic, but an absolutely unlawful form of govern- 
ment. Perhaps the statement, that the people can 
not be both judge and party to a case at the same 
time, will meet less objection than the other state- 
ment, that a check upon the administration of the 
supreme power is absolutely necessary. Neverthe- 
less, it is the certain result of all we have said be- 
fore. Each member of the state must be con- 
vinced of the impossibility that his rights will ever 
be violated. But this impossibility does not exist 
so long as the administrators of the supreme power 
are not held accountable. 

The people of a commonwealth must, therefore, 
relinquish the administration of the supreme pov.'er 
to one or more persons, who remain responsible for 
the proper application of that power. A form of 
government which does not provide for this respon- 
sibility of the administration is a despotism. 

Hence, it is a fundamental law of every rational 
and legal form of government, that the executive 
pozuer, which embraces the executive and judicial, 
should be separated from the power which controls 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



245 



and checks the administration of that executive and 
judicial pozver. 

I shall call the latter power the Ephoraie. It must 
remain with the entire people, whilst the executive 
power must not remain with the entire people. A 
form of government, therefore, must be neither 
despotic nor democratic. 

Much has been said concerning the division of 
powers, that is, of dividing the one common power 
of government into many. It has been said that 
the legislative power must be separated from the 
executive ; but this proposition seems to be some- 
what indefinite. 

For, after the people of a commonwealth have 
once agreed upon living together in a legal relation, 
all specific laws are only applications of the one 
fundamental law, to which they have subjected 
themselves. It is, therefore, all the same if the men 
who are intrusted with the executive power, also 
frame new specific laws ; for in doing so they only 
execute the one fundamental law, which they were 
elected to carry out. If their specific provisions 
are unjust, or unlawful, the Ephorate holds them 
responsible.* 

Utterly useless and only seemingly possible is 
the separation of the judicial from the executive 

* Here Fichte does not perceive that such a separation is one 
of the very best means of checking the abuses on the part of the 
supreme power. The conception of an Ephorate is precisely real- 
ized by this separation of the form of government into several 
branches. — Translator's Remark. 



246 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



power, using the latter word in its more limited 
sense. For if the executive power has no veto 
upon the judicial power, then it is the unlimited 
power of the judiciary itself, separated into two 
persons ;* but of which two persons only one has 
a will, the other being merely a physical power 
directed by another will. But if the executive 
power has a veto, then it is itself the highest judi- 
cial power, and both powers are again one and the 
same. According to our doctrine, only the execu- 
tive power and the Ephorate, or checking power, 
are to be separated. 

The executive power of a commonwealth may be 
intrusted either to one person — as is done in a 
Monarchy — or to an organized body established in 
the constitution, as is done in a Republic. But since 
even in a monarchy one person does not really ex- 
ecute all the power, intrusting it rather to subor- 
dinates, the real distinction between a monarchy 
and a republic is this, that in a monarchy the final 
decision of all questions rests with one permanent 

* It is very true that all separation of power is only a separation 
of one power amongst different persons, but this separation amongst 
different persons is one of the best safeguards against abuses of 
power. There is really but one executive power — and only the 
checking power is opposed to it ; and this one power is divided out 
amongst a number of persons, some of whom exercise the legisla- 
tive, others the judicial, others the strictly executive functions. 
The whole machinery of government is established merely to carry 
out, to execute, the fundamental law ; and none of the wheels of 
this machinery are independent of each other ; yet is each of 
the wheels also independent encRigh to check the other. — Trans- 
lator's Remaric 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 247 

president, (the monarch ;) whereas in a republic it 
rests with the majority of votes — the ballot-box. 
Hence, in a republic, the permanent monarch is a 
mythical and often changeable person, since it is 
composed of all those who decide by their votes 
the question at issue. 

Again : The administrators of the executive 
power may be either elective or not ; and in the 
former case all or only some of them may be elec- 
tive. They are elective in a proper democracy, that 
is to say, in a democracy which recognizes repre- 
sentation. If all the public officials are directly 
elected by the whole people, the democracy is a 
pure democracy ; if only some, it is a mixed demo- 
cracy. The public officials may also fill vacancies 
themselves ; this is the case in a pure aristocracy. 
But if only some of the magistrates are thus re- 
placed by the public officers, and if the others are 
again directly elected by the people, then the form 
of government is that of a democratic aristocracy. 
A permanent president (monarch) may also be 
elected to exercise the executive power during his 
lifetime. 

In all these cases, either all citizens of the com- 
monwealth, or only some of them, are eligible to 
office. Eligibility may, therefore, be limited or 
unlimited. It can be effectively limited only through 
birth ; for if every citizen is eligible to any office 
in the state, and the limitation is merely that he 
shall not fill, for instance, the higher offices until 



248 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



he has filled lower ones, then his eligibility is not 
absolutely but only relatively limited. If eligibility 
is absolutely limited, and hence grounded upon 
birth, the form of government is that of an Jicrcdi- 
tary aristocracy ; and this leads us to the second 
supposition, that the administrators of the execu- 
tive powers are not elective. 

They are not elective in a form of government 
which recognizes born representatives, persons who 
are representatives either immediately through their 
birth, as hereditary princes in every hereditary mon- 
archy, or who, at least, are, through their birth, the 
only eligible representatives, as the nobility in all 
monarchies, and the patricians in hereditary-aristo- 
cratic republics. 

All these forms of government become legal 
through the law ; that is, through the original will 
of the people, expressed in the adoption of their 
constitution. They are all lawful, provided that a 
checking power is established effective enough to 
prevent any abuse of power.* 

* This provided annuls all the foregoing, which, indeed, as based 
upon facts taken from experience, is a purely subjective judgment. It 
is. for instance, a priori clear that no checking power can be efficient 
if a monarch remains perrnaneiit executive ; or if there is not a 
power to punish his unlawful actions, by depriving him of his exe- 
cutive office. It is equally clear that an hereditary aristocracy does 
not permit of an efficient checking system, and that hence it is an 
unlawful form of government ; for there is no power sufficient to 
prevent their abuse of power ; or, if there is, then the aristocracy 
is not hereditary and exclusive possessor of certain rights. 

It is certainly not the province of the Science of Rights to deter- 
mine which is the better form of government, but it is equally truly 
its province to determine the conditions of a lawful government. 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



249 



The question, Which is the better form of govern- 
ment for any particular state ? is not a question for 

We have already shown that one of these conditions is universal 
applicability to the whole human race, and hence the form of a, 
Confederate Republic. Another condition is, as FicnTE has clear- 
ly shown, an cflcctive checking power. How this is to be estab- 
lished is certainly a problem for the art of politics ; and it is also 
clear that this art can constantly be improved upon. No one will 
deny that, however excellent, our system of checks and balances, 
both in our general form of governments and in our state govern- 
ments, can be vastly improved. Our state governments particularly 
seem much in need of such improvements. 

All we desire to assert in this note is, that the conditions of the 
effectiveness of such a system of checks can be much closer deter- 
mined than FiCHTE has done here. The reason why he found this 
subject so difficult to manage was probably because he could not 
see that the Ephorate, of the necessity of which institution he was 
absolutely convinced, would be realized in those very separations of 
powers and systems of checks which he attacked ; and this he could 
not see because he did not see this, their true character. A priori 
he was convinced that a checking power must be established ; but 
how to establish it was a question to which history alone could sug- 
gest answers, and neither the history of the ancient republics nor 
the recent experiments of France furnished the proper answer. 
American history was little known at Fichte's time. Thus it puz- 
zled him continually ; and hence, also, no chapter of his Science 
of Rights was looked upon with more wonder by the public than 
this one upon the Ephorate. Unable to suggest a solution, Fichte, 
some ten years later, withdrew his proposed establishment of such 
an Ephorate, but took, at the same time, occasion to reassert his 
firm conviction in the correctness of the idea. He added that, after 
all, such an Ephorate did already exist in every civilized common- 
wealth, ill the force of public opinion, which kept a continual check 
upon the executive power. We append that retraction at the end 
of this book, so that the reader may fully see how a philosopher 
may be absolutely certain of the correctness of a principle, and yet 
find it impossible to give it reality in the world as it is. — Trans- 
lator's Remark. 



250 THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 

the Science of Rights to solve, but for the art of 
politics ; and the solution of that problem depends 
upon the investigation, under which form of gov- 
ernment the checking power can be made to work 
in the most effective manner. 

The persons who have been intrusted by the 
people with the administration of the executive 
power, must have accepted it, and made themselves 
responsible for its administration. 

Of course, this acceptance can only be volunta- 
rily ; and both parties must come to an understand- 
ing about it. For although the Conception of 
Rights requires that a public power, and expressly 
appointed administrators thereof, shall be estab- 
lished, it does not say to what particular persons 
that power is to be intrusted. 

It is clear enough that, since the Conception of 
Rights requires such an establishment of a govern- 
ment, each person can be compelled to vote for or 
against the establishment of it ; and likewise, that, 
if he happen to be elected as one of that govern- 
ment, he must declare whether he will accept the 
office or not. 

It is also clear that the vote on the constitution, 
as the instrument which establishes the form of 
government, must be a tmanimoiis vote. For al- 
though there exists a right of compulsion, to com- 
pel every person to become member of a common- 
wealth, there is no such right to compel him to be- 
come member oi any particular commowwedllh.. If 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



251 



the vote is not unanimous, the majority will proba- 
bly remain in the country, and constitute them- 
selves a commonwealth under that constitution ; 
whilst those in the minority, as they can not be 
tolerated in the commonwealth unless they become 
members of it, have no other choice than either to 
make the vote unanimous by accepting the consti- 
tution, or to make the vote unanimous by leaving 
the commonwealth. 

Those who have once accepted an office under 
the constitution, can not again resign it without the 
consent of the people, since such resignation would 
perhaps interrupt the rule of the law, or make it 
impossible for a while, if no one could be found to 
take their place. On the other hand, the people can 
not take the office away from them ; for their office 
is now their vocation, their possession in the state, 
and they have no other property. The other citi- 
zens received their property, and these got their 
offices as their property ; hence their legal relation 
with the other citizens would be annulled, if the 
offices were taken away from them one-sidedly. Of 
course, if both parties agree, no objection can be 
raised. 

Again : Since those who are to administer the 
public power made themselves responsible for the 
maintenance of justice and security, they must 
necessarily insist on being provided with the means, 
and the free use of them, requisite for that purpose. 
They must have the privilege of determining what 
each citizen shall furnish as his share of those 

K 



252 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



means, and of using them according to their best 
knowledge and conviction. (How far this power 
is, nevertheless, to be limited, we shall soon see.) 
They must, therefore, be intrusted with unlimited 
•control of the public power. 

This public government must, in each specific 
case, protect the rights of citizens and punish vio- 
lations of these rights. It is held responsible for 
this, and hence must have the power and the right 
to watch the conduct of the citizens ; in other words 
it must have a police pozver* and a police legisla- 
■iio7i. 

It needs scarcely be added, that this public 
administration is also a judge from whom there 
is no appeal, since all citizens have agreed in their 
original compact to submit their law disputes to 
the common power, which has now, through the 
constitution, been established as an administrative 
power. 

* Our Grand Juries are such an institution. — Translator's 
Remark. 



/ 



§ 2- 

THE ESTABLISHMENT OF A CHECK UPON THE GOV- 
ERNMENT. 

We now proceed to the second problem in the 
establishment of a constitution : How can this su- 
preme power of the commonwealth, which has been 
constituted its government, be prevented from ever 
executing what is not lawful ; and likewise from 
ever neglecting to execute what the law requires ? 

We have already suggested in general how this is 
to be accomolished. Their private end, the end of 
their own security and welfare, must be the same 
as the common end, and must be attainable only 
through the common end. It must be made im- 
possible that they should have any other object 
than to promote the general object. 

The law is merely formal ; hence there must be 
no material interests possible for their law deci- 
sions. The only interest possible for them must 
be to watch, that their decisions are conformable to 
the law. 

They must, first of all, be placed in a position of 
complete independence from all private persons, so 



254 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



far as their private needs are concerned. They must 
have a sure and sufificient income, so that no private 
person can offer them any benefits, and that all in- 
ducements which may possibly be offered to them 
can have no value in their eyes. 

They must also have as few friendships, personal 
connections, attachments, etc., as possible, in order 
to be indisposed to show partiality. 

It was stated before as a principle, necessary to 
compel equal legislation for each person, that the 
law must judge cases in time-succession, and that 
no future case must be decided until all past cases 
have been decided. This principle falls away as 
soon as a regular judicial power has been estab- 
lished through the constitution, which is held re- 
sponsible for the pure administration of the law ; 
for it may be more expedient to first decide cases 
which require little time ; and the great object is, 
after all, to lose as little time as possible ; but nev- 
ertheless, it is absolutely necessary that the judicial 
power should always be able to show that it has 
taken cognizance of all cases brought before it, and 
likewise that a certain time should be fixed within 
which cases — according to their nature — must be 
finally decided upon. If such a time is not fixed, 
it is impossible to ascertain whether each citizen 
has obtained his rights, and impossible to prove a 
neglect on the part of the judicial power, shice it 
can always refer the complainants to the future. 

But the following is a sure criterion whether the 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



law is administered as it should be : The admin- 
istration of the law must never contradict itself. 
Each public act of the public government must be- 
come established rule for all the future. This will 
bind government to the law. The government offi- 
cials now can not proceed unjustly, since that would 
involve continued injustice for all the future, which 
again would lead to their om\ unsafety. Or if they 
should ignore again the unjust rule once adopted, 
they would thereby confess their unjust procedure 
in the previous case. 

To make such a criterion possible, all acts of the 
administration, with their connected circumstances 
and grounds of decision, must receive the greatest 
publicity, at least after their final settlement. It 
might often be necessary, for the sake of jDublic 
security, to keep these proceedings secret whilst 
still pending ; but after the final decision, secrecy 
is no longer necessary. 

If the state officials administer their power in ac- 
cordance with these principles, right, justice, and 
security are fully guaranteed to each citizen of the 
commonwealth. But how — since confidence and 
fidelity are qualities never to be presupposed in 
legal relations — can the officials be compelled to 
proceed according to these principles This is the 
final problem for a rational state constitution. 

The executive power has final jurisdiction in all 
cases ; there is no appeal from it. Such appeal 
is neither permissible — since it is a condition of a 



256 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



legal status that no appeal shall be made from the 
executive power — nor is it possible, since the exe- 
cutive power wields supreme power. The presump- 
tive law, which has been constituted the infallible 
law of the commonwealth, speaks through the per- 
son of the judges, elected as infallible, from whom 
there is no appeal. The decisions of that power 
must, therefore, be carried out in the sensuous 
world. 

A clear proof that the constitutional law has been 
violated by the executive power, can be furnished 
only when it is shown, either that the law has not 
been executed within the time fixed in the consti- 
tution, or when it is shown that the state officials 
contradict themselves, or commit evident injustice 
in order to avoid the appearance of self-contradic- 
tion. 

It has further been shown, that only the people 
can judge the administrators of the public power. 
But the difficulty is this : where and what is the 
people Is it any thing more than a mere con- 
ception, and if any thing more, how is it to be re- 
alized .'' 

Before the tribunal of the public power or state 
government, all the members of the state are only 
private persons and not a people ; each person is al- 
ways subject to the government. Each will is con- 
sidered by the government as only a private will, 
and the government considers itself the sole ex- 
pression of the common will. The people, as a 
community, have no separate will ; and hence a 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 257 

people as a body to sit in judgment upon the gov- 
ernment, can not at all be realized until the people 
have withdrawn their declaration that the will of the 
government is their own will. 

But how can this be done ? No private person 
has the right to get up and say : " Let the people 
of our state come together in a convention to sit in 
judgment upon the government !" For if the will 
of such a person does not agree with the will of the 
government which continues to represent the com- 
mon will, then the will of that person is a private will 
rising in opposition to the government, and hence 
a rebellious will, punishable as such ; and his will 
certainly will never agree with that of the govern- 
ment. For either that government is conscious of 
its just administration, and in that case such a pro- 
position for a convention would be utterly opjoosed 
to the common desire that no unnecessary disturb- 
ance of private business and of the administration 
of the law shall be tolerated, or it is conscious 
of its injustice ; in which case it is not- to be pre- 
sumed that it will give up the power which it 
still holds in its hands, and will itself call to- 
gether its judge. Hence, the government offi- 
cials always remain their own judges, because the 
realizing of a judicial power to judge them depends 
upon themselves ; and thus the form of government 
remains, after all, a despotism. 

In short, since the people, as one body, can call it- 
self together in convention only through itself, and 
since the people can not be one body until they have 



258 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



been thus called together, its calling together is im- 
possible.* 

How can this contradiction be solved ? It is 
solved ; When the constitution is made to provide in 
advance that the people shall, in a certain case, be 
called together in convention. 

Such a constitutional law might provide, for in- 
stance, that the people should assemble together in 
convention at certain times, in order to consider the 
administration of the government officials. This 
arrangement is possible in small states, where the 
people do not live far apart, and can be called to- 
gether without much loss of time, and where the 
administration of a government, moreover, can be 
easily surveyed. Yet even in such states this 
great law-ceremony would lose its dignity by too 
frequent a recurrence ; and what is worse, a fore- 
knowledge of its occurrence would enable parties, 
to a great extent, to control such conventions, and 
thus make them rather the representatives of their 
own than of the common will. In larger states, 
however, such an arrangement would be altogether 
impossible. It may, therefore, be stated as a pnn- 
ciple of such a provision : That the people shall never 
be called togetJier zvithoict absolute necessity ; but as 
soon as it is necessary, they shall be called together at 
vnce, and shall have the power to judge. 

* As would be the case in a state under a constitution providing 
no mode for calling together a constitutional convention, and as was 
the case in the State of Missouri in 1861. — Translator. 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



259 



There is no necessity for such an assembly, nor 
will the people desire it, unless law and justice have 
utterly ceased to be effective ; but when this neces- 
sity arises, the convention must be called. 

In a properly organized state, law and justice in 
general are dependent upon the maintenance of 
the rights of each single individual ; and hence 
the whole law is overthrown if a single case of 
injustice occurs. 

But who shall ascertain whether this case has oc- 
curred .'' The people can not, for they are not as- 
sembled ; nor can the government, for that would 
be making it judge its own case. Nor can the par- 
ty which complains of injustice, for it also is inter- 
ested in the case. Hence, there must be a special 
pozvcr established by the constitution to take cogniz- 
ance of sucJi cases. 

This power must be intrusted with continual su- 
pervision over the conduct of the government, and 
hence we may call it the Ephorate. 

The executive power is responsible only to the 
people assembled in convention ; hence the Epho- 
rate can not sit in judgment upon the government ; 
it must, however, be intrusted with the power to 
constantly watch the conduct of the government, 
and hence, also, to obtain information concerning it. 
The Ephorate must not have the power to stop the 
decisions of the executive officials, since from them 
there is no appeal ; nor must it have the right to 
decide law disputes, since the government is the 



26o 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



only magistrate in the state. The Ephorate has^ 
therefore, no ex ecictive power at all* 

But the Ephorate has an absolute prohibitory ^^o-vi- 
er — power to prohibit, not the execution of this or 
that particular decision of the government, for then 
it would be a judge, and the executive power would 
not be supreme, but to utterly suspend the admin- 
istration of the law and the government in all its 
branches. I will call this suspension of all law 
power the state interdict, (in analogy with the 
church interdict. The church has long since in- 
vented this infallible means to enforce the obedience 
of those who need her.) 

It is, therefore, fundamental principle of a ration- 
al and proper government, that the absolute positive 
power should be complemented by an absolute nega- 
tive power. 

But since the Ephorate is to have no power at all 
in its hands, and since the executive government is 
the supreme power, it might be asked how the 
Ephorate can enforce its declared suspension of 
the government. But this enforcement will come 
of itself For by the publicly announced suspen- 
sion of all law, all the subsequent acts of govern- 
ment become illegal and null and void. Every 
body will, therefore, refuse to submit to the deci- 
sions of government if the decision is against him ; 

*In this the power of the Ephorate, deduced from pure reason, is 
utterly distinct from the Ephoresoi the Spartans, from the state in- 
quisition of Venice, etc. The tribunes of the people in the Roman 
republic had somewhat of the character required here. 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



and no one can rely on its decision if it is in his 
favor. 

By the announced suspension of the government, 
the state officials are declared to be mere private 
persons, and all their orders to use executive pow- 
er are declared null and void. From the moment 
of this announced suspension, every act of the gov- 
ernment, whereby it exercises executive power, is 
resistance to the common will of the people, as ex- 
pressed through the Ephorate, and hence is a re- 
bellion, and is to be punished as such. But since 
by such a resistance a government would in advance 
subject itself to the highest punishment, whereas 
by quietly awaiting a trial before the people, it 
might, perhaps, successfully refute the charges of 
the Ephorate, a resistance of this kind is scarcely 
to be apprehended. 

The announcement of the suspension of the gov- 
ernment is at the same time a call for a convention 
of the people. The greatest misfortune which 
could possibly happen to them, has forced the peo- 
ple to come together in convention. The Ephorate 
is, of course, the accusing party, and has to prefer 
its charges. 

It is, of course, not necessary, and would be in 
most cases impossible, to call all the people togeth- 
er ; it is sufficient if all of them take part in the 
convention. How this is to be accomplished, or 
how the result of the will of the people is to be 
clearly ascertained, is a question for the art of po- 
litics to solve. Still it will be necessary, from a 



262 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



reason we shall shortly develop, that at various places 
large gatherings of the people come together. 

The resolves of this convention of the people be- 
come constitutional law.* 

It will be, therefore, necessary, first of all, that 
the convention declare the suspension of the gov- 
ernment, and hence its own existence, to be in ac- 
cordance with the constitution, and that the deci- 
sion of the convention, no matter which way it 
may turn, be declared to be supreme law of the 
land. 

Again : So far as the decision itself is concerned, 
it will necessarily be just, that is, in accordance with 
the original common will of the people. For if the 
convention should absolve the government from the 
charge preferred by the Ephorate, that the govern- 
ment has allowed a crime to remain unpunished, 
(the fact, as such, must not admit of a doubt ; this 
the Ephorate will have to take care of;) then the 
convention would thereby resolve that the unpun- 
ished crime should be considered a lawful act, 
which every citizen of the state might commit. Or 
if the government is charged with contradicting it- 
self, or with an evident injustice, and the conven- 
tion should absolve the government, then the con- 
vention would thereby make that contradictory or 
unjust principle a fundamental law of the state, ap- 

*The state of things in Missouri, from 1861 to 1864, affords an 
exact analogy to the condition of things here described ; and our 
practical American solution of the difficulty was precisely in accord- 
ance with the principles here established. — Translator's Remark. 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 263 

plicablc to each citizen. The convention will cer- 
tainly be very careful to avoid a wrong decision. 

The losing party, whether it be the government 
or the Ephorate, must be declared guilty of high 
treason. The Ephorate, because it has suspended 
the administration of the law without just cause ; 
the government, because it has abused the power 
intrusted to it to suppress the law. 

Few persons will hold it too hard that the govern- 
ment,if declared guilty, should be pronounced guilty 
of high treason ; but some may consider this too 
severe a punishment for the Ephorate. It may be 
said that its members were positively convinced 
that the commonwealth was in danger, that they 
have acted conscientiously and have only erred. 
But the same may be said of the government, and 
the only answer to this is : Error in such matters 
is quite as dangerous as a bad intention ; and the 
law should be quite as careful to prevent the former 
as to suppress the latter. The wisest of the people 
should be elected to the offices of the government, 
and none but old and experienced men should be 
elected as Ephores. 

Moreover, it is quite probable that, previous to 
suspending the government, the Ephorate will con- 
sult with the government officials and induce them, 
if possible, voluntarily to remedy its fault or neg- 
lect. By doing this the Ephorate will, at the same 
time, obtain a thorough knowledge of the merits of 
the case. 

The action of the convention has retroactive 



264 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



power. The judgment pronounced under the rules, 
which the convention has disapproved, are annulled, 
and the parties who have suffered under these judg- 
ments are reinstated in their previous position with- 
out detriment, however, to their opponents, since 
these have acted only in accordance with the law, 
although the law has now shown itself to be an in- 
valid law. The damages devolve upon the judges 
who have pronounced the unjust judgments. 

The ground of this retroactive force is this : the 
party who lost under the unjust judgment was pro- 
hibited from appealingfrom it.since thepresumption 
was, that the will of the judge who pronounced it 
was in accordance with the common will of the 
people. At present the contrary appears, and 
when the ground falls away, so also does the 
grounded. That judgment, therefore, is annulled. 

The positive and negative powers — the govern- 
ment and the ephorate — must be heard before the 
convention of the people. They can not be parties 
in their own cause, and hence do not belong to the 
people. The truth is, all government officials, 
though before their election they belong to the 
people, cease to belong to it the moment they be- 
come officials. If they are born such officials, as 
is the case with hereditary princes, they have 
never belonged to the people. Born aristocrats 
and noblemen belong to the people, but not after 
they are elected into the government. Before elec- 
tion, they are not government officials, although they 
are exclusively eligible. The constitution must 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



265 



make provision that their votes, in view of their 
probable partiahty for the executive power, shall not 
have an injurious influence upon the actions of the 
common will. How to make such provision is a 
problem for the art of politics. 

As soon as the candidates for offices are elected, 
they cease to belong to the people, even though 
they have not yet accepted the election. Making 
themselves, as they do, responsible for the public 
safety and the administration of justice with their 
own person and freedom, it is necessary that they 
should have a veto in the legislation ; that is to say, 
they must have the privilege of stating : We will 
not govern under such laws. But the people then 
must also have the privilege of replying : If you 
will not govern under laws which appear good to 
us, we will elect others. 

As soon as the government has been established, 
the people, as a unity, cease to exist ; the people are 
no longer a people, a Whole, but an aggregate of 
individuals subject to the government, which is now 
not a part of the people. 

It appears, that the safety of the whole common- 
wealth depends upon the absolute freedom and per- 
sonal security of the Ephores. It is they who are 
to keep the supreme power of the government in 
proper check. It must be impossible, therefore, 
that they can ever become dependent upon the 
government so far as their personal welfare is con- 
cerned. They must, therefore, be particularly well 



266 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



paid. Moreover, they are exposed to the persecu- 
tions and threats of the government, and have no 
other defense than the people. 

Their persons, must, therefore, be made secure by 
the law ; that is, they must be declared inviolable. 
The least violence or threat of violence against 
them is JiigJi treason, that is, is an immediate at- 
tack upon the commonwealth. The mere threat 
of violence against them on the part of the gov- 
ernment is, indeed, in itself a declaration that all 
law is suspended ; for by such a threat the execu- 
tive power clearly separates its will from the com- 
mon will. 

Again, the power of the people must surpass by far 
the poiver of the government. For if the power of 
the government were but in any ways equal to that 
of the people, the government might resolve to re- 
sist the people, and a war would be possible be- 
tween the people and the government; but such a 
war must be rendered impossible by the constitu- 
tion. If the executive power of the government 
were superior to that of the people, or could be- 
come superior in a war, the government might at 
any time undertake to subjugate the people and to 
reduce them to perfect slavery. 

It is, therefore, a condition of the lawfulness of 
every civil government, that under no circumstan- 
ces must the power of the government be able to- 
oppose the least resistance to the power of the peo- 
ple as a whole. Every end must be sacrificed to 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



267 



this highest of all ends, which is equivalent to that 
of maintaining the rule of law itself 

For this reason it is also one of the chief aims of 
a rational constitution to provide that when the peo- 
ple are called together in convention by the Epho- 
rate, larger masses of people shall congregate in 
different places, ready to quench any possible re- 
sistance on the part of the government. 

The following important question might still be 
asked : How shall the people decide ? By a major- 
ity of votes or by unanimity ? 

We have shown that, in the original compact of 
the people amongst themselves, unanimity is neces- 
sary. Each individual must declare that he is de- 
sirous of entering with all the others into a com- 
monwealth for the maintenance of the law. 

In electing magistrates, the matter already as- 
sumes a different shape. True, the minority is not 
compelled to submit to the majority ; but being the 
weaker party, the minority may be compelled to 
leave the country within the limits of which the 
majority conclude to realize their constitution. If 
the minority does not choose to do so — as is most 
likely — it will have to indorse the action of the 
majority. 

We said : being the weaker party, the minority 
may be compelled to leave. The reason is, evident- 
ly, because they are not strong enough to resist. 
The proof seems to consider, therefore, already^ 
that the majority is a very decided one, strong 

S 



:268 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



■enough to make all resistance hopeless and a war — 
always an unlawful condition — utterly impossible. 
Until the minority is so strong, it must simply sub- 
mit to the majority.* 

In considering the justice or injustice of the 
charges preferred by the Ephorate against the gov- 
ernment, little or no difference of opinion can pos- 
sibly arise. The facts of the case must be appar- 
ent to all. The only question remains, therefore : 
is the charged conduct of the government just or 
not, and shall it be law for us in all future time 
•or not ? Only two answers are possible. Yes or no. 

If the citizens have but ordinary power of judg- 
ment, the question is very easy to decide ; and, in- 
deed, it is so intimately connected with the welfare 
of each citizen, that the answer to it must be, from 
the nature of the case, almost unanimous, and that 
■an opinion adverse to that of the overwhelming ma- 

* This is a very ticklish question. It is clear, that the original 
-constitution of a state must be adopted by an absolute majority, or 
unanimity ; and such was the case with the United States Constitu- 
tion. That original constitution, in order to settle all disputes as 
to the kind of majorities needed, before such disputes can arise, 
must specify them ; as our general constitution, indeed, does. For 
all the cases provided for by the constitution, a dispute is, therefore, 
Imvfiilly impossible. If, however, an unforeseen question should 
come up, of vast importance for the whole people, for which the 
•constitution contained no provision, it is difficult to see how any 
■other than an absolute majority could decide it. It will not do ta 
say that the minority must submit. The minority have their rights 
under the original agreement, to take away the least of which in- 
volves an utter overthrow of all law ; no matter how large the ma- 
jority by which it is done. — Translator's Remark. 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



26g 



jority may be safely put down as that of cither in- 
competent or partial persons. The more rational 
citizens, if the first is the case, will try to convince 
them ; and if they can not be convinced, they will 
make themselves very suspect of being partial. But 
if the minority can not at all agree with the vote of 
the majority, then they are certainly not obliged to 
make their safety dependent upon a law which they 
do not recognize as just ; but neither will they desire 
to live among men who have adopted such a law, 
and hence the only course open to them is to emi- 
grate from the state. As this is not always plea- 
sant, it is to be expected that no one will insist on 
it ; unless, indeed, he is convinced that the passage 
of the law will destroy all safety. He will, on the 
contrary, rather indorse the vote of the majority, 
and thus make it unanimous. 

It will be seen, that my theory of Rights always 
assumes the legal validity, not of a majority vote, 
but of a unanimous vote ; although it is admitted 
that those who refuse to submit to a very decided 
majority, (which may be fixed at seven eighths, per- 
haps, or still higher,) do thereby cease to be citizens 
of the state, and thus make unanimity possible. 

Under the described constitution. Law must ne- 
cessarily and infallibly rule at all times ; unless, in- 
deed, the Ephorate should unite with the executive 
power to suppress the people.* This final and 

* The excellent arrangement of our checking power makes such 
a union next to impossible. Even in our mere general form of gov- 



C70 THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 

greatest obstacle to a just government must also be 
removed. 

The Ephorate must not be dependent upon the 
executive power, nor be in a position to receive fa- 
vors from the government. It must have no friend- 
ly or social relations with the government. The 
people will look to this, and the Ephorate will take 
care not to lose the confidence of the people by 
such conduct. 

Moreover it is advisable, nay, almost necessary, 
to make the tenure of government offices for life- 
time, because the officials lose their other posi- 
tions in life ; but it is equally advisable to make 
the tenure of the Ephores only for a specific time, 
since they need not give up their ordinary voca- 
tions. When retiring from office, the Ephores must 
give an account of what has occurred during their 
term of office ; and if any injustice has occurred, 
which still continues, the new Ephores must sus- 
pend the government and call together the people 
to sit in judgment upon the retiring Ephores as 
well as upon the government. It is clear, that the 
guilty Ephores must be punished as guilty of high 
treason. To have honorably administered the du- 
ties of the Ephorate ought to entitle to life -long dis- 
tmction. 

The Ephorate must be elected by the people, not 

ernment, a combination of President, Congress, and the Supreme 
Court is out of the question. How, then, could the governments of 
all the states combine to suppress the whole people r — Transla* 
Ior's Remark. 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 2^1 

hy the government ; nor can the Ephores fill vacan- 
cies amongst themselves, the new ones being the 
judges of the old. The mode of their election 
should be specified in the constitution. No one 
should be allowed to apply for the Ephorate. The 
people themselves should select them ; and in this 
manner the people will learn to pay more attention 
to their wise and great men. 

If all these provisions are observed, it is not well 
possible that the Ephorate will ever combine with 
the government against the liberties of the people. 
Unless every one of the first men of the country 
who may be successively elected into the Ephorate 
has been bribed when entering upon the duties of 
that office ; and moreover, unless each of them is 
so sure of a corruptible successor that he can af- 
ford to stake his whole security upon it, such a col- 
lusion is not well possible. A state of things like 
this is, however, impossible ; or, if it is possible, a 
people corrupt enough to make it possible may 
be said to deserve no better fate. Nevertheless, 
3.S a strict science should take cognizance even of 
the greatest improbabilities, the following must be 
added : 

Each private person who calls together the peo- 
ple at large against the will of the government, 
which government represents the will of the peo- 
ple until the people are assembled in convention — 
it will always be against that will, since the govern- 
ment can never be induced to call the people to- 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



gather — is a rebel, since his will is in opposition ta 
the presumptive common will. 

But the people, as a wJiole, never can be a rebel ; 
and the expression rebellioti, applied to the people 
at large, is the greatest absurdity ever uttered. For 
the people are, in fact and in law, the highest power 
and the source of all power ; responsible only to 
God. By the convening of the people, the govern- 
ment loses its power, both in fact and in law. 

Two cases are possible. Firstly, the people may 
rise up unanimously of their own accord and sit in 
judgment upon both Ephorate and government ; for 
instance, when acts of injustice are too horribly ap- 
parent. In this case, the uprising is lawful both in 
form and in substance ; for until insecurity and mal- 
administration of the law oppress every citizen, each 
one takes care only of himself, and tries to get along 
as best he may. No people have ever uprise nor 
ever will uprise as one man, until injustice has be- 
come too intolerable. 

Or, secondly : one or more private persons may 
call upon the whole people to come together in 
convention. In this case, these persons are cer- 
tainly presumptive rebels, and until the people has 
so assembled, they will undoubtedly be so treated, 
in accordance with the presumptive common will, by 
the government, if that government can get hold of 
them. But an unjust power is always weak, because 
it is illogical ; and because it has common opinion — 
often even the opinions of those whom it uses as 
tools — against itself. The more unjust it is. the 



THE SCIENCE OF RIG/ITS. 



more impotent and weak ; and the more probabili- 
ty, therefore, that those persons who have called 
the people together will escape the clutches of gov- 
ernment. 

The people may obey this call or may disregard 
it. If they assemble in convention, the executive 
power vanishes into nothingness, and the people sit 
in judgment upon it and upon those who have call- 
ed the people together. If the people indorse the 
charges of the latter, they thereby declare their will 
to have been the true common will ; and its sub- 
stance being acknowledged as the true law, its want 
of legal form is now supplied by the indorsement 
of the people. If, on the contrary, the people pro- 
nounce their charges unfounded, then these per- 
sons become rebels, and are condemned as such by 
the people. 

If the people disregard their call, this disregard- 
ing proves either that oppression and public inse- 
curity have not yet become general enough, or that 
they do not exist ; or secondly, that the people have 
not yet awakened to a desire to maintain their free- 
dom and to a knowledge of their rights ; that they 
are not yet fit to decide upon the great law dispute 
brought before them, and hence that they ought 
not to have been called together. The persons 
who issued the call are, therefore, punished — with 
perfect external justice, as rebels ; although, ac- 
cording to internal justice, or in their conscience, 
they may be martyrs of true justice. They are 
perhaps, innocent in intention ; but in deed they 



274 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS, 



are punished as guilty. They ought to have had 
a better knowledge of the people. For if a people 
unfit to maintain its freedom had come together, it 
would have resulted in a general annihilation of all 
law. 

All these provisions concerning the election of 
•executive officers, and concerning the establish- 
ment of a checking power, are provisions concern- 
ing the administration of the law ; and all these 
provisions together are called the Constitution. 

A lawful and rational constitution is unchangea- 
ble, valid for all time ; and is necessarily established 
;as such in its preamble. 

For each single individual in the commonwealth 
must agree to it ; and hence it is guaranteed through 
the original common will. Each individual has be- 
come a member of the state only under the guaran- 
tee of this particidar co7istitntion. He can not be 
•compelled to approve another one. If, therefore, 
:such another one contradictory of the original con- 
stitution should, nevertheless, be carried through, 
he would be compelled to leave the state if he 
could not approve of it. But since he can not be 
required to do this under the original agreement, it 
follows that it is absolutely unlawful to change the 
constitution, even if only one person is opposed to 
it. To effect a change of this kind in the consti- 
tution, therefore, absolute unanimity is required. 

The distinction between the absolute unanimity 
•requisite for this change of the constitution and the 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 275 

above relative unanimity is this, that the latter per- 
mits the exclusion of several persons from the state, 
while the former does not. In the former, the right 
to remain a citizen of the state is absolute ; in the 
latter, it is conditioned by his joining the majority. 

We have said : A constitution which is a lawful 
one, that is, which provides for a responsible execu- 
tive power, and for a checking j^ower, is unchangea- 
ble ; that is to say, within its general scope. Infi- 
nite modifications are, of course, possible ; and in 
so far even the best constitution is subject to amend- 
ment. 

If the constitution, however, is not a lawful one 
then it may be changed into a lawful one ; and no 
one has the right to say : I do not wish to give up 
the previous constitution. For the toleration of the 
previous illegal constitution was excusable only on 
the ground of previous ignorance or insensibility to 
the Conception of Rights ; but as soon as that con- 
ception is clearly apprehended, and the people have 
become capable of realizing it, each one is bound to 
accept it ; for rigJit shall rule. 

It is different with the amendments to the civil 
legislation. These will make themselves. At first, 
the state consists of a certain fixed number of men, 
carrying on these or those professions, etc. ; and the 
civil law is made accordingly. But as the people in- 
crease and new branches of business are created — 
of course, none must be created without the con- 
sent of the state — the laws also must change and 
be made to conform to the changed people. 



276 THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 

The whole described mechanism is requisite for 
the realization of a lawful relation between men ; 
but it is not at all necessary that all these springs 
and wheels are always externally and visibly work- 
ing. On the contrary, the better a state is organ- 
ized the less it will be perceived, because its inter- 
nal weight and quiet power cancel in advance all 
necessity for its exercise. The state prevents it- 
self from being necessary. 

The first object of the state is to decide the dis- 
putes of its citizens concerning their property. The 
more simple, clear, and comprehensive the law is, 
and the more infallible its execution, the less will 
be the number of these disputes, oecause every one 
may know with tolerable certainty what belongs to 
him or not, and will not be likely, therefore, to make 
the — presumptively abortive — attempt to secure the 
property of another. If the few disputes which 
may at first arise through error, are decided cor- 
rectly in the conviction of both parties, there will 
be no crime. For where else is the source of crime 
concealed but in greediness and passions excited 
thereby, or in poverty and want, which are impos- 
sible if the law carefully watches over the property 
of each And how can crimes arise if ttieir sources 
are stopped .'' A good civil law and a strict execu- 
tion thereof utterly cancel the application of the 
criminal law. Moreover, who will dare to commit 
a crime if he knows surely that he will be detected 
and punished A half a century of such a state 
of things, and the conceptions of crimes will have 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. ^77 



vanished from the consciousness of the happy pco^ 
pie who are governed according to such laws. 

If the executive power has less to do, the possi- 
bility of its being unjust is lessened in an equal de- 
gree. The rare manifestation of the power of gov- 
ernment will become an act which will excite the 
veneration of the people and of themselves ; all 
eyes will be turned upon the government, and the 
necessary reverence of the people will make the 
government reverence itself, if it should not do so 
otherwise. 

The power of the Ephorate also will find no oc- 
casion for its application, because the executive 
power will always be just, and neither interdict 
nor conventions of the people will ever be re- 
quired. 

If, therefore, any one should possibly allow him- 
self to be frightened by theseconceptions, and should 
imagine heaven knows what horrors when he reads 
of conventions of the people to sit in judgment 
upon governments, he has two good reasons to 
quiet himself. Firstly, it is only the lawless mob 
which commits outrages, and not a legally assem- 
bled pcople,consulting in an established form of pro- 
ceeding. (The form is, by the by, one of the great- 
est benefits for mankind. By forcing man to pay 
attention to certain things, his attention generally 
is concentrated. That man has not the interest of 
mankind at heart who wishes to take away from 
them all forms.) 

Secondly : All these contrivances are invented, 



278 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



not in order to be used, but in order to make the 
occurrence of cases, which might require their use, 
impossible. Precisely, in the states wherein they 
are established, they are superfluous ; and where 
they arc not established, they are sadly needed. 

CONCLUDING REMARKS. 

The science which considers a particular empiri- 
cally determined state, and proceeds to develop how 
the Science of Rights may be properly realized in 
such a state, is called the Science of Politics. All 
the problems of such a science have no connection 
with our science, which is purely a priori, and must 
be carefully separated from it. 

To this class of problems belong all questions 
which may be raised concerning the particular de- 
termination of the one and only lawful constitution. 
For our established conception of a constitution 
solves only the problem of pure reason : How can 
the Conception of Rights be realized in the sensu- 
ous world If that constitution is, therefore, to be 
further determined, this can be done only by empi- 
rical facts. We now proceed, in conclusion, to 
specify the possible questions which may arise in 
this connection, and shall show that their solution 
depends upon the accidental position of the states 
to which the constitution is to be applied. 

Our first a priori established rule in considering 
the constitution was this : That the power of a com- 
monwealth must be transferred, and can not remain 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



279 



in the hands of the people. The question here 
arises : Shall it be transferred to one or to many ; 
or shall the state, in regard to the persons who con- 
stitute its government, be a monocracy or an aris- 
tocracy ? For a pure democracy is not a legal form 
of government. 

The reply is : Both forms of government are law- 
ful ; it is a question of expediency which to choose. 
The ground from which to decide this question I will 
state in a few words : Of many, who modify each 
other's opinions more wisdom is to be expected ; but 
on the other hand, they are slower, more inclined to 
throw responsibility the one upon the other. Nor 
will the power of the Ephorate be likely to have 
the proper influence upon them, since they will feel 
themselves more secure in the great number of the 
guilty. A perpetual president may, perhaps, be 
more liable to err ; but power in his hands is more 
effective, and he is more responsible to the Epho- 
rate. Hence, in states which need chiefly a strong 
government, partly because the people have not 
yet been used to strict obedience to the law, or 
partly by reason of their loose relations to other 
nations, a monocracy probably has the preference ; 
but in states which have already been for some 
time under such an orderly government and in 
which the law works by its mere internal power, 
the republican form of government has the prefer- 
ence. It is clear, that all subordinate officials must 
be appointed by the highest regent, whether one or 
many, and must be subject only to his or their com- 



28o '^^^ SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 

mands. For only the highest government (the re- 
gent) is responsible to the nation, and responsible 
only for the administration of law and justice. But 
to be so responsible, the regent must have complete 
control over the selection of those persons through 
whom justice is administered. 

Another question is, whether it is better that the 
people should directly elect their highest represen- 
tatives, (as is the case in a proper and lawful de- 
mocracy,) or through mediate representatives ; or 
whether, perhaps, it is better to introduce heredi- 
tary descent of office 

In regard to the Ephorate, this question has al- 
ready been decided. They must be directly elect- 
ed by the people. In regard to the executive pow- 
er of the government, the decision can only be sup- 
plied by empirical facts, particularly by the degree 
of culture which a people possesses, and which is 
attainable only through a previous wise and just 
legislation. A people which is to elect its own 
rulers must be very far advanced in culture, for the 
election must be tinaninwiis in order to be valid. 
But since this unanimity need only be relative, the 
fear always remains that a part of the minority will 
have to submit to rulers whom they do not like, or 
be compelled to emigrate. The constitution ought, 
however, to remove all occasions for disputes and 
party divisions among its citizens. Now, until the 
people have attained this high degree of culture, it 
is better that they should, in their constitution, 
delegate their right of election (of franchise) — 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



281 



which, of course, they can thus delegate away only 
hy absohcte unanimity — and thus introduce a fixed 
succession of rulers. In a republic, the rulers may 
be allowed to fill vacancies in their own body ; for 
if the Ephorate is strong enough, they will take 
good care to make the best selections. In a mo- 
nocracy, only the people, it would seem, could elect 
their ruler ; but since the people are not allowed to 
elect, they can only constitute their ruler heredi- 
tary. This hereditary descent has, moreover, other 
advantages, which render advisable its introduction; 
for instance, the monarch is utterly cut off from the 
people ; is born and dies without any private rela- 
tion to the people. 

Questions might arise concerning the conditions 
of the contract between the people and their rulers, 
their personal rights, privileges, incomes, and the 
sources of these incomes. But all these questions 
must be decided empirically The sources of in- 
come, or principle of finances, we shall speal: of 
hereafter. Each one must contribute according to 
the ratio in which he needs protection, and the pro- 
tective power must correspond to the protection 
needed. This furnishes us at once with a stand- 
ard of taxation. The rate of taxation is changea- 
ble as the requirement of protection is changeable. 
The ruler or rulers can, of course, be held accounta- 
ble for the administration of the finances, through 
the Ephorate ; for it is one of the rights of the citi- 
zens not to pay taxes for any but public purposes. 

A question might be raised concerning the na- 



282 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



ture of the judiciary. It has been proved, that the 
executive power must also be the highest judicial 
power, from which there is no appeal. It is also 
clear that subordinate courts and judges will be ap- 
pointed, from whom appeal can be taken. So far as 
the form of the judicial investigation or the trial is 
concerned, it is clear that judicial proofs are fur- 
nished like any other proofs, and hence the proced- 
ure of courts is based chiefly upon logic and sound 
common sense. The sufficiency or insufficiency of 
the proof is decided by the judge. One important 
point is, however, to be remembered concerning the 
proof by oath. There are two ways of considering 
the oath. It may be viewed simply as a solemn 
assurance, the external formalities accompany- 
ing it having no other end in view than to re- 
move recklessness and to induce witnesses to 
consider the importance of such an assurance ; in 
which case the presupposition is, that he who is 
capable of publicly asserting a falsehood will also 
swear a false oath. Or an oath is regarded as 
something more than such a solemn assurance, in 
which case the presupposition is, that a person who 
will not hesitate to publicly assert a falsehood will 
hesitate to swear a false oath. Under the first sup- 
position, it may be asked : Why should the state 
or the opposite party in a trial be compelled to ac- 
cept such a statement on oath as absolute fact, and 
why should the judge be compelled to base his de- 
cision upon it, when the whole government is based, 
not upon trust, but upon distrust ? 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



283 



Under the second presupposition, there arises 
this same question, and, moreover, the following^ 
higher question : What is there supposed to be in 
an oath calculated to restrain a man, who will pub- 
licly assert a falsehood, from making a false asser- 
tion under oath ? Since he does not fear the guilt 
of falsehood, it follows that he believes the calling 
upon God as a witness in the oath to be some sort 
of a supernatural, incomprehensible, and magica! 
means of incurring God's anger by swearing false- 
ly. This is, without doubt, in the true nature of a 
superstition, and is utterly at variance with moral 
religion. The state, therefore, in prescribing oaths, 
calculates upon the continuance of immorality, and 
must do all in its power to promote immorality, 
since it has staked its own existence upon a view 
of the oath, which is immoral. But this is absurd. 
Hence, the oath can only be viewed as a solemn 
assurance, and should not be administered except in 
private cases, where one party is willing to accept 
the sworn statement of the other as decisive. Vo- 
lenti non fit injuria. On a public occasion the oath 
should never be administered ; nor will there be any 
need of oaths, if the state is properly organized. 

Finally, a question might be raised concerning 
the manner of convening the people for the elec- 
tion of the Ephorate, or concerning the voting in 
convention, when the people are called together by 
the Ephorate to sit in judgment upon the executive 
power. As for the election of the Ephores — whose 
number is a problem of expediency and to be de- 



284 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



■ cided by the number of the population and the cul- 
ture of the people — a higher degree of culture re- 
•quiring fewer Ephores — it will be immediately 
-apparent that it should be conducted by the old 

Ephores, but in a manner which will prevent them 
from controlling the election, since the new Epho- 
res are to be their judges. When passing judg- 
ment upon the executive power, the voting will 
have to be under the superintendence of men espe- 

■ cially appointed for the purpose, the Ephores being 
themselves an interested party in the case.* 

* We append Fichte's later declaration on the subject of the 
Ephorate, which is taken from his Science of Rights of the year 
1812 : " Many years ago I made a proposition to establish a very 
complicated checking power — the Ephorate. The principles of 
law whicli led me to do so are perfectly correct. It is a very true 
principle, that the government officials shoulJ be made responsible 
to each citizen, and it would be well if such a responsibility could 
be realized in the sensuous world. It is also clear, that no man 
ought to be a member of the government whose understanding of 
the law is considered insufficient by the Ephorate or by the people 
themselves. But so far as the practicability of such a checkinjj 
power is concerned, I must now, after mature consideration, decide 
against it. For, who shall again check the Ephorate, that it may 
not commence a revolution for some reason or another, although 
the government has not violated the law ? Again : Will not the 
government, having all power in its hands, try to suppress the 
Ephorate at the very start? The Roman patricians will bear wit- 
ness ; for they killed the tribunes of the people. The Ephores once 
killed, government would find arguments and false charges enough 
to justify its conduct. Moreover, it has certainly been proved, that 
the decision of the people is always formaliter law, because there 
is no higher judge. But how mata-ia liter ? Is not more confi- 
dence to be placed in a number of the wisest of the people than 
in a majority which has been gathered together, God only knows 
how ? 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



285 



" This consideration did not escape me at the time. I admitted all 
this, but added, that a people whose Ephores, being selected from 
the very best of the people, could be corrupt enough for such con- 
duct, did not deserve a better government, and were not fit for a 
better one. This is, after all, the truth of the case. The realiza- 
tion of a checking power as a part of the constitution is not practi- 
cable, because mankind at large is too bad as yet ; but until men 
grow better, they will have to get along with a government which 
needs no really established Ephorate. 

"One circumstance, however, seems to have escaped all, who have 
expressed surprise at this idea of an Ephorate ; namely, that this 
idea is, in point of fact, realized wherever a civilized people is to be 
found. As soon as thinking is developed among the people, a 
power which observes and checks the action of the government is 
also developed. This power has two purposes to fulfil : To warn 
the government ; and secondly, if that is of no avail, to call the peo- 
ple together. The first purpose it generally accomplishes, unless 
free speech is forbidden, (which is a dangerous undertaking on the 
part of the government,) and government usually listens to those 
warnings and obeys them. For no government dares to remain 
behind the people. But if government does not listen to them, the 
people are called together. As a sure proof that this is practicable, 
I need only say that it has been done in this age and under our very 
eyes, and that it has resulted in the overthrow of the government. 
[Alluding to the French Revolution. — Translator.] It has also, 
however, as far as can be judged at present, resulted disastrously 
for the people; not by accident, but in obedience to a necessary 
law. For so long as there are more good than bad people, it may 
be safely assumed that the propositions of the bad, and not those of 
the good and wise, will be adopted. Hence, the expedient of call- 
ing the people together through the Ephorate, or of revolutions, 
\vill be only a substitution of one evil for another and greater one, 
until a complete change has been effected in the human race. A 
greater evil : for the principles of government, which are always con- 
formable to the character of the age, will not change, and the regent 
of a people which has revolutionized will try all the more to root his 
power firmer, in order to prevent the recurrence of a revolution. 
The only thing from which we can e.xpect improvement is the pro- 
gress of culiure and morality, and a consequent steadily increasing 
influence of the Ephorate in this progress." 



^OOK yHIRD 



CONCERNING MUNICIPAL LAW 



CIVIL LAW. 

The first compact of persons entering with each-- 
other into a legal relation, and which we have calledi 
the property-compact, is the true original basis of 
that relation, and hence is equally the basis of what 
is usually called civil law. To exhaust our present 
investigation, therefore, all we need to do is to ana- 
lyze that compact thoroughly. 

The conception of original rights we have shown; 
to be that of a continuous reciprocal causality be- 
tween the person and the sensuous world, which 
causality is dependent solely upon the will of the 
person. In the property-compact each person has 
assigned to him a determined sphere of the sensu- 
ous world, as the exclusive sphere of his reciprocal 
causality ; but with these two conditions, to wit,, 
that he will not disturb the freedom of all others 
in their sphere, and that he will protect them by^ 
his contribution against the attacks of any third 
party. 

Firstly: A sphere is assigned to him for his free- 
dom ; nothing more. This sphere contains certain 
objects, determined by the freedom assigned to him. 
His right of property to these objects extends, there- 



290 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS, 



fore, as far as the freedom assigned to him extends, 
■atid no further. He receives them only for a spe- 
cial use, and he has only the right to exclude every 
one else from this special use and from what might 
be injurious to this special use. The object of the 
property-compact is a determined activity. (This 
appears, indeed, already, from what we have said 
previously. For the fundamental ground of all 
property is, that I have subjected something to 
my end. But what end This question each one 
"has to answer when entering the property-compact, 
which compact must be throughout determined and 
■determining. It is only this declared and recog- 
nized end and purpose in the objects which that 
compact guarantees ; and the property of the object 
•extends no further than to the attainment of this 
•end.) 

But these ends may be very different in the use 
•of one and the same object, and hence also in the 
use of different objects. The question is, whether 
all possible ends of a citizen may not be subordina- 
ted to a single one 

The person, in acting, always presupposes his 
own future existence ; the object of his present act- 
ing always lies in the future ; and he is a cause in 
the sensuous world only in so far as he proceeds 
from the present to the future moment. Freedom 
and continued existence are essentially united, and 
he who guarantees the one necessarily guarantees 
the other. Present activity includes the future. 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



291 



Nature has destined man, who alone concerns us 
here, for freedom, that is, activity. Nature attains 
all her ends, and hence must also have made ar- 
rangements to attain this one. What arrange- 
ments could she contrive to incite man to activity } 

If we presuppose that each man has wishes in 
the future, then nature could attain that end by 
making the possibility of a future for him depen- 
dent upon Jiis present activity. The wish for a future, 
on the other hand, would involve the necessity of 
present activity. The future would be conditioned 
by present activity ; in the present activity the 
future would necessarily be contained. 

But since it is possible that there may be men who 
have no wishes in the future, and since, moreover, 
the desire for a future is grounded only in present 
activity, which present activity is itself again ground- 
ed in the desire of a future ; and since the con- 
trivance of nature would, therefore, be a faulty 
circle, it is necessary that she should unite both in 
a third present moment, and this is Pain. The 
present pain, threatening continued existence, in- 
volves both present activity and the wish for and 
the possibility of a continued existence. This pain 
is hunger dLXidi thirst ; and we thus discover that the 
" need of nourishment is alone the original incentive, 
as its satisfaction is the final end of the state, and 
of all man's life and doing ; of course, only so long 
as man remains under the guidance of nature, and 
does not arise through freedom to a higher exist- 
ence. This need of nourishment is, therefore, the 



292 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



highest synthesis, which unites all contradictions. 
The highest and universal end of all free activity 
is, therefore, that men may live. This end each 
one has, and the guarantee of freedom involves 
this guarantee. Unless he attains it, freedom and 
the continued existence of his person will be im- 
possible. 

We thus obtain a more special determination of 
the exclusive sphere of freedom, guaranteed to 
each in the property-compact. To be able to live 
is the absolute, inalienable property of all men. A 
certain sphere of objects is guaranteed to a person 
exclusively for a certain use ; but the ultimate end 
of that use is, that he shall be able to live. The 
spirit of the property-compact is the guarantee of 
this end, or of life. It is the fundamental principle 
of every rational form of government, that each 
person shall be able to live from the results of his 
labor. 

Each individual has made this agreement with 
all others, and all have made it with each. Hence, 
all have promised to all that their labor shall be 
the means to attain this end, and in the state orga- 
nization provision must be made to realize this pur- 
pose. 

Again : all right of property is based upon the 
agreement of all with all : that each will acknow- 
ledge the possessions of the other, provided the 
other will acknowledge his. But as soon as any 
one can no longer live from the results of his labor< 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 293 



that which belongs to hun is no longer his ; the 
agreement with him is, therefore, completely an- 
nulled, and he is no longer legally bound to respect 
the property of any one else. Since this insecurity 
of property is to be avoided, all must in law and 
by agreement give him of their possessions suffi- 
cient to live from. From the moment that any one 
suffers distress, that part of the property of each 
citizen, which is necessary to remove that distress, 
no longer belongs to them, but in law and justice 
belongs to the suffering individual. The original 
compact should make provision for such a repar- 
tition of property among the sufferers, and this 
contribution to the distressed is as much condition 
of all civil rights as the contribution for common 
protection. Each one retains possession of his 
property only in so far, and on the condition that 
all other citizens can sustain their lives from their 
property ; and if they can no longer sustain their 
lives therefrom, his becomes their property : of 
course, in such proportions as the state government 
may determine. The government is responsible 
for this as well as for all other branches of state 
administration ; the poor citizen has an absolute 
claim to support. 

The principle established was this : Each one 
must be able to live from the results of his labor. 
Labor is, therefore, the condition of being able to 
live, and when this condition has not been fulfilled 
the right also does not exist. Since all are respon- 



294 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



sible for the support of all who can not live from 
their labor, they necessarily also have the right to 
watch that each labors sufficiently ; and this right 
of supervision they transfer to the government. 
No one has a legal claim to the support of the 
state until he has shown that he has clone within his 
sphere all that was possible for him to do in order 
to make his living ; and that, nevertheless, he was 
unable to do it. But since, even in the latter case, 
the state could not permit him to die, and would 
be, moreover, liable to the reproach that it had not 
compelled him to work, the state necessarily must 
be intrusted with the right of supervising the man- 
ner in which each citizen administers his proper- 
ty. Precisely as there must be no poor man in 
a rational state, so also must there be no idler. A 
legal exception to the latter result will appear here- 
after. 

The property-compact comprises, therefore, the 
following acts : 

1. All state to all what they intend to live from. 
This holds good without exceptions. He who can 
not state this can not be a citizen of the common- 
wealth, since he can not be forced to respect the 
rights of property of the others. 

2. All permit to each this occupation, exclusively, 
in a certain respect. Each one must expressly 
state his occupation ; and hence no one becomes a 
citizen in general, but becomes, at the same time, 
entitled to a certain occupation. There must be 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



295 



no undeterminedness whatever in a state organiza- 
tion. Each, of course, has possession of objects 
only so far as the ends of his occupation require it. 

3. The end of all this labor is, to be able to live. 
All guarantee to each that his labor will achieve 
this end, and guarantee this end with all their 
means. These means belong to the rights of each, 
which the state must protect. The agreement in 
this respect is as follows : Each promises to do all 
that is in his power to do, in order to make his liv- 
ing from what has been ceded to him as his property 
and rights ; and in consideration of this promise, 
all others, or the state, promise to cede more to 
him, if he should not be able to make his living 
therefrom, guaranteeing this promise by obliging 
themselves to furnish contributions. Hence, pre- 
cisely as the original compact provides for the erec- 
tion of a protective power of government, so must 
it also provide for a supporting power. In other 
words, the state government must not only protect 
the citizens, but must also support the poor. 

The arrangement contrived by nature to compel 
us to free activity is as follows : 

Our body is an organized product of nature, and 
the progress of organization goes on in the body 
uninterruptedly. Nature proceeds herein in two 
modes : Either the body takes in organic matter, 
and nature first organizes that matter in the body ; 
or the body receives matter already organized, and 
nature merely further organizes it in the body. 



296 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



Moreover, nature may either bring herself the 
matter to be organized witliin the sphere of caus- 
ality of the body, or may arrange the body so as to 
betake itself by free activity to the materials need- 
ed by it. Tlie latter condition occurs in beings 
that are articulated for free movement ; and, since 
nature would seem to rise to greater perfection in 
these latter bodies, it seems not unlikely that both 
conditions should go together ; that is, that articu- 
lated bodies should be able to supply their organiza- 
tion only from organized matter. Without investi- 
gating here why and by virtue of what laws this is 
so, we content ourselves with stating the simple 
fact that it is so. The plants are formed from in- 
organic matter ; at least, matter which appears in- 
organic to us ; whilst animals feed from the organ- 
ized products. What seems to be an exception to 
this rule is none. When animals swallow earth, 
stones, or sand, etc., it is not to derive nourish- 
ment therefrom, for these materials are not digest- 
ed, but to expel injurious ingredients from the 
body. 

It may also be possible, that articulated creatures 
again, on their part, supply their organization from 
other articulated creatures, or eat meat. It seems, 
indeed, as if these meat-eating creatures occupied, 
likewise, a higher stand-point of organization.* 

* Quite the contrary doctrine to that of the vegetarians, yet un« 
doubtedly more plausible. Such improper generalizations are, how- 
ever, all faulty. Since all matter is organic, all creatures are meat* 
eating ; and whether we eat only small animals, in vegetable food, or 
big ones, in animal food, is all the same. — Translator's Remark. 



THE SCIENCE OF RICIJTS. 



297 



Man is evidently made to supply his nourishment 
from both spheres of organized nature. 

It is a condition of the continued existence of the 
state, that a sufficient amount of food should be on 
hand ; for otherwise men would be forced to emi- 
grate. 

All organization proceeds according to laws of na- 
ture, which man can learn and direct or apply, but 
which he has not the power to change. Man may 
place nature in the known conditions of the appli- 
cation of her laws, sure that she will not fail then 
to apply them ; and by doing so, man exercises the 
power of promoting and increasing organization. 
It seems likely that nature will need such assist- 
ance from man in places where men congregate 
through freedom, which freedom nature could not 
have taken into consideration in arranging herself. 
If this is a fact, then the promotion of organization 
is the fundamental basis of the s'.atc, since it is 
the exclusive condition on which men can live to- 
gether. 

Man will find it requisite, first of all, to promote; 
the organization of plants, in order to feed himself 
and the animals. Plants are fixed to the ground 
so long as their organization lasts. It seems, there- 
fore, probable that many men will devote them- 
selves exclusively to the cultivation of plants ; and 
such a right must be admitted, since the existence 
of the state depends upon its exercise. 

All organization progresses according to certain 
laws, and must not be interrupted in this its pro- 



298 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



gress. In each cultivated part of the plant king- 
dom, therefore, every thing must remain precisely 
as the cultivator has designed it to be ; and hence 
the ground, which he needs for this cultivation, 
must be exclusively granted to him for that spe- 
cific purpose. 

PROPERTY IN LAND. 

Land is the common support of mankind in the 
sensuous world, the condition of man's existence in 
space, and hence of man's whole sensuous exist- 
ence. The earth in particular, considered as a 
mass, is not at all a possible object of property ; for 
it can not, as substance, be submitted to any pos- 
sible exclusive end of a person ; and it is not law- 
ful for any one, according to our above results, to 
exclude all others from the use of a thing without 
assigning himself a use for it. Even if some one 
should say : the earth is useful to build houses upon, 
he already ceases to speak of it as a substance, 
modifies it, and uses it as an accidence. Hence, 
the right of the agriculturist to a fixed piece of 
ground is solely the right, exclusively to raise pro- 
ducts upon it and to exclude all others from doing 
the same, or from using it for any purpose which 
would conflict with that use. 

The agriculturist, therefore, has not the right to 
prevent another use of his property, provided it 
does not conflict with his own. He has not the 
right, for instance, to prevent others from using his 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 299 

lands after harvest for pasturage, unless he has ob- 
tained also the right of cattle-raising ; nor to pre- 
vent the state from mining on his lands, unless, 
indeed, his lands should thereby receive damages,, 
in which case the state must reimburse him. 

The lands of the commonwealth are chosen by 
the individuals, and guaranteed by the state to each. 
Their limits are designated by fences or other marks, 
so that they may always be known. To wantonly 
remove such marks is a crime, because it leads to- 
endless law disputes. 

Each agriculturist, who is nothing but agricul- 
turist, must be able to live from the cultivation of 
his lands. If he can not do so, an additional piece 
of land must be given to him, since he is only agri- 
culturist. Whether he has worked sufficiently in 
the cultivation of his lands, the state decides. 

As citizen of the state, the agriculturist must 
contribute toward the needs of the state. So far 
as we can see now, he will have to make these con- 
tributions from the products of his field. Until he 
makes this contribution, he has no property, be- 
cause he has not fulfilled the agreement which 
makes it his property. Whatsoever remains after 
this contribution is his own ; the state has, so far 
as appears now, no claim on it, and must protect 
him in the possession of it against all attacks. 
Only the products of his lands are, therefore, the ab- 
solute property of the agriculturist. They belong 
to him, substance and all ; whereas, of the lands, 

he owns only an accidence. 

^ 0 



30O 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



Whatsoever grows wild on cultivated lands must 
be assumed to have been subjected by the proprie- 
tor to his ends ; hence it rightfully belongs to him. 
Moreover, if a stranger should interfere with such 
wild products, he would interfere with the proprie- 
tor's right to dispose of his lands as may seem best 
to him. 

Uncultivated lands are property of the whole 
commonwealth, for they were assigned to no one 
when the lands were distributed. Of course, the 
state distinguishes between the substance, the 
ground itself, and its accidences, that which grows 
upon it. These accidences will most properly be 
taken by the state for public purposes, (forests.) 
But if they shall be so taken by the state, then the 
state must expressly declare them to be state pro- 
perty ; and what is not so declared thereby becomes 
the property of the first one who chooses to appro- 
priate it, (wild fruits, berries, etc.) 

Whenever a citizen wishes to cultivate any of 
these uncultivated lands, they must be divided. 
Whoever obtains such lands as his property must 
cultivate them. The state will thus be indemnified 
for the loss of the accidences on these lands by 
receiving contributions (taxes) from their new cul- 
tivators. 

MINERAL LANDS. 

Minerals are the transition of nature from inoi- 
ganic matter to organic products. The laws by 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 301 



which nature produces them are either not at all 
discoverable, or, at least, are not yet discovered. 
Metals can, therefore, not be arbitrarily reproduced 
by art and cultivation like fruits. They are found 
as nature made them. 

It seems as if each one ought to have the right 
to say : I intend to hunt for minerals ; just as each 
has the right to say : I intend to cultivate fruits ; 
and hence as if the interior of the earth could be 
divided among the miners precisely as the upper 
crust is divided among the farmers. The metals 
found would thus belong to the miner, as the fruits 
•cultivated belong to the farmer. Nevertheless, there 
is a difference ; partly because mining is risky, and 
can not be surely known to support the miners, and 
partly because the land once investigated by the 
miner can not be reinvestigated. Mining must, 
therefore, be assigned to a permanent corporation, 
which can afford to wait for success ; and no cor- 
poration is better adapted to do this than the state, 
which, moreover, has still another reason for ob- 
taining possession of the metals, as we shall soon 
:show. Hence, the interior of the earth remains 
the common property of the commonwealth, and 
the miners become the regularly employed laborers 
of the state, receiving their wages whether they 
ifind any metals or not. 

The same principle applies to all similar products 
of nature ; precious stones, quarries, sand, etc. The 
state has the right to make these objects its own de- 
■clared property, and to prohibit all others from ap- 



302 THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 

propriating or using them. If it does so, it must, 
of course, guarantee to furnish these products in 
sufficient quantities to all who may desire to use 
them. If the state does not choose so to do, it 
may extend the privilege of working them for cer- 
tain districts to such individuals as may apply for 
the privilege ; or may tacitly agree to let any one 
take possession of them who chooses to do so. The 
principle which rules is always that unless the state 
expressly declares these objects to be its property, 
they may be taken possession of by the first comer. 

PROPERTY IN ANIMALS. 

There are also animals upon the earth who may 
be useful to men in their accidences, or whose sub- 
stances may be useful to men ; their meat to eat, 
their skin for various purposes, etc. If any citizen 
intends to subject only the accidences of such ani- 
mal to his ends, he must first make the animal sub- 
servient to him. Moreover, since the animals are 
fed and kept alive only by organized matter, and 
since it is not to be expected that nature will take 
care of them after they have once been made art- 
products, he must replace nature in becoming their 
nourisher. This, again, is conditioned by the ex- 
clusive possession of the animal ; only / must feed 
and attend the animal always, and only I, therefore, 
must be allowed to enjoy the advantages it may 
confer. 

There is no reason why each one should not have 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 303 

the same right to take possession of an animal 
Hence, exclusive property in animals can be ob- 
tained only through the original property-compact 
in a state. 

There is, however, this difference between pro- 
perty in land and property in animals, that the land 
can always be designated by the place in space 
which it occupies, whereas the animal has free 
motion and can not be so specified. How then is 
it to be made known what particular animal belongs 
to a certain person and to no one else 

If it should, firstly, be the case that only certain 
kinds of animals are ever made exclusive property 
of persons, it would be, above all, necessary to spe- 
<;ify to what kinds of animals the right of property 
can extend. This would enable every one to know 
at once whether an animal, coming within his reach, 
is the property of any body or not. For instance, 
if I have a right to hunt, I may shoot the deer, be- 
cause it is a deer ; but I may not shoot the horse, 
although I do not know who owns it. Why not .'' 
Simply because I know that horses have been de- 
clared property by the state, and that, hence, some 
one is surely the owner of the horse, although I 
•do not know who. If some one should tame a 
deer, it doubtless becomes his property. But if 
the deer runs away and I shoot it, am I, therefore, 
xesponsible for it as for the horse t Clearly not, 
since the state has not declared that the right of 
iproperty extends to deers. The right of the origi- 
Jial owner of an animal remains, although the ani- 



304 THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



mal may run away from him, because in the origi- 
nal compact it has been agreed upon in what kinds 
of animals the right of property may rest. Such 
animals are called tame animals. The ground why 
precisely these kinds of animals have been declared 
property in a state and none others, lies in their 
fitness for serving the needs of men in their acci- 
dences, in the possibility of taming them, and in the 
necessity of taking care of them. 

But let no one believe that this taming and feed- 
ing of the animals is the true legal ground of the 
right of property in them. That legal ground is to 
be found only in the property-compact. Hence, if 
any one should introduce a new kind of tamed ani- 
mals, for instance, buffaloes or kangaroos, the state 
would first have to declare them animals to which 
the right of property should extend, since otherwise 
they would be properly treated like wild animals. 
If they were kept locked up in such a one's house 
or yard, they would, of course, thereby become part 
of his house property. It is also clear, from the 
foregoing, that the state has a perfect right to pro- 
hibit the keeping of certain animals, for instance, of 
lions, bears, monkeys, and unnecessary dogs. 

But the next question is : To whom does this or 
that animal which in its kind has been declared 
property, belong These animals may either re- 
main under the immediate supervision of their pro- 
prietor, so that he can at any moment prove them 
to be his — unless, indeed, they be unlawfully in his- 
possession — or they may be feeding in a common. 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



3C5 



pasture with the animals of other proprietors. How,, 
in the latter case, can ownership be proved ? Hap- 
pily, animal instinct has supplied the neglect of the 
lawgiver. Tame animals accustom themselves to 
their stables, and the judge decides according to 
the instinct of the animal as to who is its owner. 
Yet, would it not be proper to have all tame ani- 
mals marked in some way, the marks to be as in- 
violable as those which designate the several pieces 
of landed property, and thus to place them under 
the direct protection of the law (In the armies 
the horses are, indeed, so marked.) Each bill of 
sale of an animal ought to be accompanied by a 
specification of the mark upon the animal, so as to 
guarantee perfect safety to the purchaser. 

In reference to some animals, the right of pro- 
perty is determined by the space they occupy, to 
wit, when they are of a kind which can be con- 
fined to a certain locality, and must be so confined 
to serve their end. In such cases the owner is pro- 
prietor of the animals, because he is proprietor of 
the locality wherein they exist, (fish-lakes, bird- 
houses, etc.) When the fish is out of the lake, or 
the bird out of the cage, they have no owner. 

The right of property is always granted with re- 
erence to the end to be accomplished by it ; so, 
likewise, the right of property in animals. Now, 
most animals are useful, not only in their acciden- 
ces, (as milk, eggs, and their labor,) but also in 
their substance ; we eat their meat, make use of 
their skins, etc. e*c. 



3o6 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



It ma}', perhaps, be deemed expedient to limit 
this right of property in the substance of the ani- 
mals, and to specify this limit in the original pro- 
perty-compact. Such a limitation would not invali- 
date the right of property in the animals, so far as 
it has reference to their accidences, but it would re- 
strict the right to do with the substance of the ani- 
mals as might please the owner. The state, for in- 
stance, might provide that a certain number of cat- 
tle shall always be kept in the state, and that, there- 
fore, only a limited number may be slaughtered. If 
such a law is passed in a state, another law must be 
passed, of course, providing that, at all times, a cer- 
tain amount of food for cattle shall be raised and 
set aside, since otherwise the former legislation 
would cancel itself 

Animals propagate themselves, and their young 
ones are their accidences. The ownership of the 
old animals involves the ownership of their whole 
future breed, precisely as the ownership of a grain 
of wheat involves that of all the future wheat which 
may grow out of it. It may be lawful, however, to 
limit the number of cattle which shall be kept in a 
commonwealth. 

The animals have free movement and feed from 
the products of the field. Hence, when an animal 
trespasses upon the fields of a farmer, there arises 
this dispute between the agriculturist and the cat- 
tle-raiser : 

The former says : " I have the right to cultivate 
land in this state, and the products of the field are 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



mine." The latter replies : " I have the right to 
raise cattle in the same state, and the state knows 
well enough that animals are determined by their 
nature to hunt food." 

This dispute the state has to settle by establish- 
ing laws, based on the original property-compact, 
whereby either the one party alone is compelled to 
keep his cattle in a closed pasture, or, which is 
more fair, the other party is also compelled to fence 
in his fields. Whosoever neglects to do his duty in 
this respect, must not only repay damages, but also 
makes himself liable to an additional fine. If ac- 
cidents happen in spite of all precautions, they 
are to be considered as misfortunes for which nei- 
ther party is liable, and which the state has to re- 
pair. 

Wild animals are animals the accidences whereof 
can not be subjected to the use of men. Their sub- 
stance, however, may be useful, and since they can 
not be tamed, it becomes useful only through the 
death of such animals. In so far they belong to 
the whole state, or are undivided property. They 
become the property of individuals only by being 
caught or killed. 

There is, however, one great distinction between 
these animals. Some of them are inclosed in an 
element which is not subject to men, at least in so 
far as these animals live in and of it, namely, the 
fishes in rivers and seas. Hence, they do no harm 
to men. It is the same with some other animals, 
which, though they live in and of the same element 



3o8 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



as men, the earth, yet do so Httle damage to it, that 
they are not materially injurious ; namely, the birds. 
The harm which they do to the crops, etc., is amply 
repaid by their kiUing off injurious insects. 

It is quite dififerent with another class of wild ani- 
mals, which are injurious to men and destroy man's 
labors. All kinds of game belong to this class. 
Now, since the state guarantees to each person his 
property, it must protect that of the agriculturist 
against the devastation of these animals. Every- 
where wilderness must give way to culture, and the 
irregular modes of living, which can not be surely 
known to sufifice for man's subsistence, must give 
way to regular pursuits. 

Hence, the state must make fishing a lawful pur- 
suit, which is best accomplished — with a view to- 
make it an 07-derly business — by assigning specific 
districts of rivers and lakes to fishermen, who thus- 
become the proprietors of these districts in the 
manner of agriculturists, of course only in regard 
to the use of these districts. They would not have 
the right, for instance, to prevent navigation within 
their districts, since that would not interfere with 
their pursuits in the same localities. 

But all wild animals of the second class must be 
regarded by the state as absolutely injurious ; not 
as a source of emolument, but as a class of enemies. 
The first object of hunting is not, therefore, to possess 
the game, but to protect the farmer ; and the state 
must undertake this protection precisely as it un- 
dertakes to protect property against thieves and in- 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 309 

cendiaries, namely, by ai^pointing men especially 
intrusted with this duty. Of course, the agricul- 
turist retains the right to shoot any piece of game 
or wild animal which may stray within his fence, 
and docs not need to wait for the official game- 
keeper's arrival, precisely as each citizen retains ' 
the right to quench the flames, if his house should 
be put on fire, without waiting for the arrival of the 
official firemen. 

Now, since the chase affords considerable profits, 
it is not to be assumed that the people ought to j^ay 
taxes for sustaining it ; rather, it ought to pay it- 
self. For this reason it will be most advantageous 
to grant to a certain class of persons, game-keepers, 
the right of chase in specified districts — as in the case 
of the fishermen — which right thus becomes their 
property. Let it be well understood, that the right 
of property is not vested in the animals, as such, 
but only in the killing of this class of animals within 
the specified district. Nevertheless, since it is the 
chief object of the chase to protect the agricultu- 
rist, the game-keeper can receive this right only on 
the express condition that the game is truly kept 
harmless by him, and that he holds himself respon- 
sible for all the damages farmers may receive by 
reason of such game. 

No one but the gamekeeper can possibly have 
the intention to take care of or protect the game, 
and this end is granted to him only in so far as the 
game is not injurious to the purposes of culture ; or 
in so far as the game remains in the forest. Who- 



3 10 THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 

ever kills them there, trespasses upon the property 
of the gamekeeper ; whereas, he who kills them upon 
his fields is perfectly justified. For the life of the 
game is not guaranteed by the state ; indeed, the 
game has no end for the state ; on the contrary, their 
death is the end which the state has in view. The 
killed game belongs to the gamekeeper of the dis- 
trict ; the damage they have inflicted whilst at large 
must be paid by him, whether the animals be worth 
much or nothing at all. 

The first end of the chase is to protect culture ; 
all other ends are accidental. Hence, it is proper- 
ly made the duty of the gamekeeper to exterminate, 
likewise, wild animals, from which he himself de- 
rives no benefit, and which may not be immediate- 
ly injurious to himself; as, for instance, eagles, 
hawks, sparrows, nay, even caterpillars and other 
injurious insects. Other animals, which are imme- 
diately injurious to himself, because they destroy 
his game, such as foxes, wolves, etc., he will exter- 
minate of his own accord. 

If the chase were a burden without profit, gov- 
ernment would have to undertake it. But since it 
is combined with considerable advantages, which 
generally increase in value the less attention the 
gamekeeper pays to his proper business — and 
herein lies the root of the chief difficulty — and 
since, therefore, complaints will often be preferred 
against the gamekeepers, it is expedient to keep 
them under the close supervision of the govern- 
ment. The right of keeping game, being combin- 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 3 I I 

ed with emoluments, can not remain, therefore, in 
the hands of the government. Government would 
always be an interested party as the possessor of 
the game, and the agriculturist would have no im- 
partial judge. 

PROPERTY IN PRODUCTS OF INDUSTRY AND ART. 

All rights of property, heretofore considered, are 
vested in products of nature, as such, whether na- 
ture has heen assisted in producing them, as is the 
case in agriculture and cattle-raising, or whether 
her products are merely hunted up, as is the case 
in mining, hunting, fishing, and cutting down of 
timber. We will call all the citizens, who have 
rights of this kind. Producers. 

Now, it is very probable that these raw products 
of nature need a particular preparation through art 
to render them useful for the purposes of men, and 
in our present wholly empirical investigation we 
will assume, without further a priori deduction, that 
such is the case. It is, therefore, to be expected 
that another class of citizens will devote them- 
selves wholly to this art-preparation of the raw 
material. I shall call this class of citizens Artists, 
in the widest significance of the word. 

The distinction is sharply defined, and the desig- 
nation in itself perfectly correct. For the former 
class of citizens leave nature to herself, do not pre- 
scribe to nature, but merely place her under the 
conditions of the application of her power. Those 



312 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



of that class who merely hunt up products do not 
even so much. As soon as nature has achieved 
her work, the labor of the producers is finished ; 
the product is ripe, or the raw product has been 
found. 

But the second class of persons who now enter 
on the scene, do not calculate at all upon the assist- 
ance of nature, since the organizing power of the 
product has already been deadened by its ripeness, 
or else must be deadened by them to become use- 
ful for their purposes. 

They compose these parts according to their own 
conception altogether ; the moving power lies in 
them, not in nature. Every thing composed in this 
manner is called a product of art. Each thread of 
the spinner is a work of art. It is true, the word 
Artist has been applied to particular classes of 
these laborers ; but this use of language need not 
interfere with ours, which is based on a correct 
a priori division, and which we do not desire at all 
to make universal. 

A number of persons must have the exclusive 
right to thus artistically prepare certain objects in 
a certain manner. If they have no exclusive right, 
they have no property ; for in that case they have 
recognized the labor-vocations of all others, whereas 
their own has not been recognized by these others 
in return. Their property-compact, in that case, is 
one-sided, merely obligatory, not granting rights, 
and hence is null and void. 

A class of citizens exclusively entitled to prepare 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 313 

■certain objects in a certain manner is called a pro- 
fession. To leave all professions open at all times 
to all citizens, renders a property-compact impossi- 
ble. 

The artist must be able to live from his work. 
Two classes of artists are to be distinguished ; 
such as merely furnish their labor and do not 
■own the materials of it, and such as own the 
material. To enable them to make their living, 
the state must guarantee to the former class labor, 
and to the second class sale of their wares. 

The substance of the agreement which all others 
make with the artists is as follows : You promise 
us to furnish this sort of work in sufficient quanti- 
ty and of excellent quality ; we, on the other hand, 
agree to purchase it only from you. If the profes- 
sions do not furnish excellent work, they lose the 
exclusive right granted to them in the compact. 
Hence, the examination of candidates for a profes- 
sion is a matter of common interest. The govern- 
ment, or each profession in the name of the gov- 
ernment, must calculate how many persons can live 
from each profession, and how many are necessary 
in each to satisfy the needs of the public. 

If all can not make their living, government has 
made a miscalculation, and must bear the conse- 
quences. Those who can not sustain themselves 
from the profession must be assigned to other 
branches of business. 

But the artist can not live from his works. He 
must have the products of the other class. It is, 



3t4 THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 

therefore, necessary that there should be in the 
state at all times products enough to supply both 
the needs of the producers themselves and of the 
artists. These products the producers supply to 
the artists, and receive in return the works of the 
artists ; and vice versa. Thus an exchange takes 
place, which government should regulate in the fol- 
lowing manner : Each piece of work must be ex- 
changed for as many products as the artist needed 
during the time of making that work ; and vice 
versa. Each product of the producers must be ex- 
changed for works of the artist in the same ratio. 
In short, there must be a complete equilibrium be- 
tween raw products and manufactured wares. 

There must not be any more artists in a coun- 
try than can be supplied by its products. An un- 
fruitful soil does not admit of luxury. The people 
must retrench their needs. Of course, this princi- 
ple is limited by the results of external commerce, 
which we do not consider here, since we speak of 
each state as a whole in itself But since such ex- 
ternal commerce renders states dependent, each 
state should try to arrange itself so as to be able to 
do without it. 

Every person must have his requirements sup- 
plied as soon as possible. To facilitate this ex- 
change, therefore, it is well that a class of men 
should devote themselves entirely to it — merchants. 
The right to be a merchant is conferred exclusively 
upon a certain number of citizens, which number 
the government must determine by calculation, as 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 3 1 5 



their property in the state. Of course, they also 
must be able to live from its results. 

All contracts of exchange, whether concluded be- 
tween the producers and artists directly or by means 
of the merchants, are guaranteed by the govern- 
ment, and government must look to see that they 
are fulfilled, since without them a legal relation be- 
tween persons is impossible. But since the state can 
not guarantee that whereof it has no cognizance, it 
must establish by law what contracts are to be valid 
and what contracts not. A contract concluded m 
violation of the laws of the state has no validity ; 
if concluded without legal form, it has no legal 
validity, and becomes a matter of private honor 
and morality. The validity of all contracts is de- 
rived, immediately or mediately by means of posi- 
tive law, from the supreme principle of law, accord- 
ing to the rule : that, without which a legal relation 
between persons would be impossible, is absolutely 
valid in law. 

In this exchange of products for manufactured 
wares and labor, the advantage is, of course, de- 
cidedly in favor of the producer. He can get 
along, at least to a great extent, without the works 
of the artist ; but the artist can not live without 
the products of the producer. But it has been 
agreed in the property-compact that the artist 
shall be able to live from the results of his labor, 
that is, that he shall always be able to obtain the 
proper amounts of products for his works, accord- 
ing to the standard already established. The pro- 

z 



316 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



ducer is, therefore, bound by the property-compact 
to sell. But these products are, as we have seen, 
his absolute property, and hence he ought to be at 
liberty to sell them at as high a price as possible. 
It now appears that this liberty can not be extended 
to him. It will, therefore, be necessary to fix a 
highest price for all articles of food and for the most 
necessary articles for manufacture. If the produ- 
cer is not willing to sell at this price, and if the 
state has not the power to force him to sell, the 
state may, at least, induce him to sell. This it can 
best accomplish by storing away all the articles 
which it receives from the producers as their con- 
tribution toward the support of the government, 
and selling them at the highest price at which the 
producer declines to sell. The artist is never in a 
position to oppress the producer to any extent ; for 
he is always in need of articles of food (I speak 
here, of course, of a state organization such as has 
been described, and not of the existing state, in 
which the farmer has to pay his taxes in money, 
and may, therefore, be compelled to sell by those 
who hold the money.) 

A distinction must be established, however, be- 
tween those manufactured wares which are indis- 
pensable to the producer and those which are not 
so. The former class comprises all tools of agri- 
culture, clothes, houses, etc. Of these articles, 
likewise, the highest price must be established, so 
that if the artists should refuse to work or sell their 
N wares at that price, the state may do it. Hence, 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 317 

government will also have to store away such tools, 
clothes, etc. ; and will also have to engage masons 
and carpenters, who may build houses on its ac- 
count if necessary. The needs of luxury are not 
guaranteed by the state, and hence need not be 
kept on hand. The state ought to take care, like- 
wise, that those articles which are dispensable — 
particularly those which can only be imported from 
other countries, and the import whereof may, there- 
fore, become interrupted — shall not become indis- 
pensable. This can best be attained by levying 
high taxes on such articles. The object of these 
taxes must not be to make the income from the tax 
large, but to stoja it altogether ; and the tax should 
be increased until the importation stops. This, how- 
ever, must be done at the very commencement, and 
not after the state has encouraged the enjoyment 
of such articles by its neglect, and has thus tacitly 
guaranteed their enjoyment. 

MONEY. 

It seems that we have involved ourselves in a 
contradiction. 

Thesis. — The state guarantees to each citizen, 
who contributes toward the protection of the state 
and to the support of the poor, the absolute and 
unlimited property of the remainder of his posses- 
sion. Each mu$t have the right to waste, destroy, 
or throw away what belongs to him, provided he 
thereby inflicts no injury upon other citizens. 



3l8 THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 

Antithesis. — The state continually takes pos- 
session of all the remainder — of the products of 
the producers, and of the wares and labor of the 
artist — in order thereby to make possible the neces- 
sary exchange, without which each can not be sure 
that he can sustain himself from the results of his 
labor. 

To solve this contradiction we must discover its 
ground. 

The state takes possession of the remainder, not 
in respect to its form, as remainder and as property, 
but in respect to its substance, as something which 
is necessary to sustain life. 

In order to solve the contradiction thoroughly, 
form and substance must, therefore, be separated. 
The state must have the power of taking the sub- 
stance without touching the form. 

Without exhibiting here unnecessary profundity, 
I shall solve the problem at once. We must dis- 
cover a mere form of property, a mere sign of it, 
which is a sign of whatever is useful in the state, 
without having in itself the least use ; for if it were 
useful in itself, the state would possess the right to 
claim it, like the other products, for public pur- 
poses. Such a mere form of property is called mo- 
ney. The use of money must be introduced in a 
state necessarily ; and this solves our problem. The 
producer has not the right to keep his products ; 
he must sell them. Nevertheless, they are his ab- 
solute property, guaranteed to him by the state. 
True, he is not to give them away for nothing, but 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



in exchange for wares. But he needs no wares at 
present, at least not those which are offered to him. 
Hence, he receives money. The same applies to 
the artist. 

The state is obliged to furnish to the producer 
wares for his products, and to the artist products 
for his wares. They have received money for their 
respective property, not wishing to exchange for 
wares or products at present. Hence, as soon as 
they desire to make this exchange, they must be 
able to effect it by means of that money, which they 
hold as the sign of the value of those articles. In 
other words : by the issuing of money the state 
guarantees that it will furnish to the holder of 
money at any time, for his money, those articles 
whereof the state has guaranteed the enjoyment to 
every one ; for each piece of money in the hands 
of a private person is a sign of an indebtedness on 
the part of the state. 

The amount of money current in a state repre- 
sents all that is purchasable on the surface of the 
state. If the quantity of purchasable articles in- 
creases while the quantity of money remains the 
same, the value of the money increases in the same 
ratio ; if the quantity of money increases while the 
quantity of purchasable articles remains the same, 
the value of money decreases in the same ratio. 
Hence, if a state is considered as isolated, it is 
all the same whether there is much or little money 
in it ; the increase or decrease is merely seem- 
ing, since in either case the existing quantity of 



320 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



money always represents the total of all purchasa- 
ble articles in the state, and since, therefore, any 
part of it can always purchase a corresponding part 
of that total. 

The conception of money involves, as we have 
seen, that its material must have no utility for men ; 
its value must depend altogether upon agreement 
and common opinion. Each must merely know that 
every other one will recognize it as the equivalent 
of a particular part of all purchasable articles in a 
state. Gold is, therefore, excellent money ; for its 
true value, its utility, is as nothing in comparison 
with its imaginary value as a sign. Silver is not so 
good for money, for it is intrinsically very useful in 
itself These two substances have become money 
for all the world, both by reason of their rarity, and 
because states can not arbitrarily increase them. 

Paper or leather money is the best money for an 
isolated state, if counterfeiting can be prevented, 
because its intrinsic value is as nothing compared 
with its artificial value as money. The objection, 
that a state may easily over-issue it, is of no force, 
since it is all the same whether the amount of the 
circulation is large or small ; its value rising and 
falling, as we have shown, in proportion to its 
amount. 

But since all civilized states of the present age 
carry on foreign commerce, and since foreigners are 
not generally inclined to receive a currency which 
can be contracted or expanded ad libitum, these 
paper issues must be at a considerable discount 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



321 



against gold and silver. The discount will be the 
greater the more such a state imports from abroad, 
and the less it has to export in return. 

Coining money is the privilege of the state alone ; 
for the state alone can guarantee its value to all citi- 
zens. Hence, mines are a necessary property of 
government. 

Citizens pay their taxes with their products or 
manufactures ; if they choose, however, they may 
also pay in money, since that is the state's author- 
ized representative of all things. But the citizens 
must have the privilege of paying in those articles ; 
and the amount of taxes must also be calculated by 
products and manufactures, for the reason that the 
value of money is constantly fluctuating. 

Whatsoever remains to the citizens after they 
have paid their taxes, is their property ; but since 
the state has the power to compel the exchange of 
such articles for others, each citizen receives money 
for that remainder. This money is absolutely pure 
property, over which the state has 110 longer any con- 
trol. 

Each piece of money which I possess is, at the 
same time, a sign that I have fulfilled all my civil 
obligations. The state has no supervision over it. 
Taxation on money is absurd. 

Whatsoever citizens have bought with money for 
their private use — not for trade, which is under the 
supervision of the state — all furniture, clothing, jew- 
elry, etc., etc., is, for the same reason, absolute pro- 
perty. 



322 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



THE HOUSE. 

The state is obliged to protect all absolute pro- 
perty, as specified above, and to guarantee to each 
citizen its secure possession. But all these things, 
and particularly money, can not in any way be desig- 
nated as belonging to such and no other persons. 
In the case of land, corner-stones or wooden posts 
designate property, which can, therefore, be de- 
scribed on the record-books of the governments as 
belonging to such or such an individual ; but all 
dollar-pieces look alike, and must look alike, since 
they are intended to change owners ; how then can 
property in them be specified } 

Again, the state can not take notice at all of how 
much money each citizen possesses ; and even if it 
were possible for the state to do so, the citizen need 
not suffer it. But how can the state protect that 
whereof it does not know, and which, in its nature, 
is wholly undeterminable } If the state is bound 
to afford this protection to the undetermined, that 
undeterminable property must be inseparably con- 
nected with something else which is determined 
and which is expressly posited as the symbol of all 
absolute property, thereby being removed altogether 
from the supervision of the state. This determined 
something must be visible, known and determinable 
through the person of the owner. 

This determined something, with which the un- 
determinable property is to be connected, may be 
of two natures, as will appear immediately. The 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 323 

State has guaranteed to each citizen who has paid 
his contributions the full use of all his manufactured, 
built, or bought possessions. By this guaranteed 
use the state has characterized or determined pro- 
perty. It is, therefore, to be presupposed, until the 
contrary is proved, that that which a person imme- 
diately uses is his ; for in a well-administered state 
it is not to be assumed that a person should be 
making use of any thing against the will of the 
law. Immediate use, however, connects articles 
with the body. Hence, whatsoever a person car- 
ries in his hands or on or upon his body, belongs 
to such a person. Money, which I carry in my 
hands or in my clothes, is mine, as the clothes are 
mine to which the money is attached. (The Lazza- 
roni always carry all their absolute property on 
their body.) 

Not only that which I use immediately, however, 
but also that which I intend for future use, is my 
absolute property. Now it is not to be assumed, 
nor can it be required, that I shall always carry it 
all on my body. Hence, there must be a surrogate 
of the body, whereby that which is connected with 
this surrogate may be designated as my property 
absolutely by reason of thus being connected with 
it. Such a surrogate we call the house, using the 
word in its widest significance as designating equal- 
ly the room which a person has rented, the trunk 
of the servant, etc. My house is immediately un- 
der the protection and guarantee of the state, and 
through its means all that it contains. The state 



324 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



guarantees me against all violent entrance into my 
house. But the state knows not and has no right 
to know what is in the house. Hence, the single 
objects in it, as such, are under my own protection 
and under my own absolute control. In like man- 
ner all my actions in the house are under my own 
absolute control, provided their effect does not ex- 
tend beyond the house. The supervision of the 
state extends to the lock upon the door, and there 
begins mine own. The lock is the boundary line 
between the power of the government and my own 
private power. It is the intention of locks to make 
possible self-protection. In my own house my per- 
son is sacred and inviolable even to the government. 
In civil cases government has no right to attack me 
in my house, but must wait till I am upon public 
ground. In our investigation of Criminal Law, we 
shall see how this sacred Jiouse-right may be lost. 

The house designates and determines my abso- 
lute property. Something is my absolute property, 
because it has got into the house — of course with 
the knowledge and consent of the government. 
The fact of my having a house and something in 
it is the best proof, in a state such as we are de- 
scribing, that I have completed my obligations to- 
ward the state, for the state first appropriates what 
I owe to it. 

If I am absolute master and protector in my 
house, using the word as described above, then 
every thing that enters my house stands under my 
authority and my protection. 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



No one has the right to enter my house against 
my will. Even the state can not compel me to ex- 
tend this permission, since even the state can not 
enter against my will. In the house we are no 
longer under the supervision and guarantee of the 
government, but under our own supervision and 
protection, and hence we enter each other's houses, 
so far as our personal security is concerned, on 
trust and faith in each other. Whatsoever occurs 
in the house is a private affair, and may be for- 
given by the injured party ; but whatsoever occurs 
publicly is a public crime, and can not be so for- 
given. In the house a tacit agreement of mutual 
personal security is presupposed. Whosoever vio- 
lates this agreement becomes infamous, that is, un- 
trustworthy for all future time. 

(Thus, indeed, has a deep-rooted moral sentiment 
decided long ago among all nations. Everywhere 
it is considered infamous, if a landlord insults his 
guest, or a guest his landlord in his own house. 
Everywhere secret theft has been held to be in- 
famous to a degree which never was attached to 
open and bold robbery. Perhaps the latter is 
quite as dangerous as the former ; and hence this 
general opinion is not inspired by egotism. But 
robbery is bold, and opposes, confessedly, force to 
another force, which is not deceived ; whereas 
theft is cowardly, using the confidence of the other 
with a view to violating it.) 

Whatever is in the house — cash, furniture, vict- 
uals, etc., (except the goods of the merchant) — is be- 



326 THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 

yond the supervision of the state, and hence the 
right of proj^erty to such articles is not immediate- 
ly guaranteed by the government. If I lend my 
money to the other on his v^ord, and he denies the 
loan, I have no redress from the state, since our 
contract was not concluded under the guarantee of 
the state, and since I can not, therefore, legally 
prove the debt. But if I take his note — the state 
having announced such a note to be a legal proof 
of the debt — then the state owes me protection and 
redress against him. Contracts concluded upon mere 
trust and faith admit of no legal redress ; their vio- 
lation is punished solely by loss of character. 

GOOD NAME. 

The honor or character of a citizen is constituted 
by the opinion of his fellow-citizens, that he is 
faithful and trustworthy in all cases which are be- 
yond the reach of the state ; for where the state 
extends its power of compulsion, trust and faith are 
not taken at all into consideration. 

The government has neither the right nor the 
power to command that the citizens shall trust each 
other ; for the state is the very result of distrust ; 
nay, it is even the object of distrust, as shown in the 
constitution. 

But neither has the government the right to 
prohibit trust and confidence. True, it has a per- 
fect right to decree that none of its own affairs 
shall be transacted on the basis of trust and confi- 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 327 

dencc, and to annul the legal results of all enact- 
ments thus made. For instance : the state has a 
perfect right to pass a law, that land or houses shall 
not be sold otherwise than in the prescribed legal 
form ; for the government must always know the 
legal owner thereof But since the state has no 
supervision over the whole region of absolute pro- 
perty, nay, has not the right to take any notice of 
it whatever, it follows that each citizen must be 
permitted to do with his absolute property what- 
ever he pleases to do with it. He may throw it 
away or destroy it, and hence he may also loan it 
upon trust. Money, or any articles of personal, 
absolute property, may, therefore, be loaned with- 
out the authority of the law. 

Nevertheless, the state must protect the absolute 
property of each citizen. How, then, can it pro- 
tect him against infamous characters .'' Simply by 
warning all citizens against all men known to be 
infamous. 

The property-compact involves both the right 
and duty to do this ; for the state must protect 
against all dangers, and infamy is a great danger. 
Hence, the state ought to make that danger impos- 
sible as much as it may. This it can do by inflict- 
ing upon the acts hereinbefore specified the punish- 
ment of infamy. 

No one has the right to demand that other citi- 
zens should trust him, or that the state should com- 
pel them to trust him. Confidence is required and 
given voluntarily. But each one has the right to 



328 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



demand that he shall not be proclaimed infamous 
without legal conviction. The confidence of his 
fellow-citizens is worth a great deal to him, and 
perhaps he may require it hereafter. Hence, no 
one has a right to deprive him of this possibility 
by falsely charging him with infamy. 

The right to a good name is, therefore, simply 
the right not to be falsely proclaimed infamous. It 
is a mere negative right. The state has guaranteed 
it by agreeing not to interfere with public opinion, 
and the natural order of things in this respect. 

THE RIGHT OF PERSONAL SECURITY, 

The freedom and absolute inviolability of the 
body of each citizen is not expressly guaranteed in 
the municipal compact, but is rather constantly 
presupposed together with the personality of each 
citizen. The very possibility of the compact, and 
of all its contents, is grounded upon it. No one 
may beat, push, or hold a citizen without infringing 
V upon the use of his freedom, and diminishing his 
activity and well-being. Blows or wounds inflict 
pain ; and each one has the right to be as well 
as nature permits him to be ; and another free 
being has not the right to infringe upon it. An 
attack upon the body of a citizen is an attack upon 
all the rights which a citizen has in a state, and is, 
therefore, indeed, a crime in the state. 

Hence, whenever I am on public dominion, that 
is, outside of my house, I am always under the 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 329 

protection and guarantee of the state. Each at- 
tack on my person in such places is a public 
crime, which the state is obliged to investigate and 
punish, and which the parties interested must not 
be allowed to settle among themselves. But 
whilst I am in my house, I am not under the pro- 
tection nor under the jurisdiction of the state, 
although the house itself stands under that juris- 
diction. Hence, a forcible entrance, whether by 
day or by night, is a public crime, and must be pun- 
ished as such. But persons who enter quietly, 
without having broken open the lock — and for this 
reason the custom of knocking at a door has been 
introduced, and should always be upheld ; the 
" Come in !" giving the necessary legal authority 
to enter — have entered with my consent, and stay 
with me as a matter of mutual faith and trust in 
each other. I have not presupposed that they will 
attack me or my property, or else I should not 
have admitted them. 

But supposing that, nevertheless, they should at- 
tack me, ray body or my property, or both, if I de- 
fend my property with my body, is the state in 
such a case bound to protect me or not 

The state does not know what happens in my 
house, has not the right publicly to know it, nor to 
act as if it knew it. If the state is to take cogni- 
zance of it, it must be because I myself have legal- 
ly made it known to the state, that is, by having 
preferred complaint. 

The rule, where there is no plaintiff there is no 



330 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



judge, applies only to the cases which happen 
within private dominion ; but on no account to 
occurrences upon public dominion. Bar-rooms, 
coffee-houses, in short, all places which one may 
enter who proposes to spend money, are under pub- 
lic jurisdiction ; and all violations of law happen- 
ing in such places must be investigated and pun- 
ished by the state, whether complaint has been 
preferred or not. 

But is the state really obliged to take cognizance 
of my complaint concerning occurrences in my own 
house, and if so, why The reason is this : the 
state is obliged to protect me and all my property 
in my house ; not immediately, however, but only 
mediately. The immediate protection of the state 
would violate my right because its condition, the 
taking cognizance of it by the state, would violate 
my right. If I resign this right by voluntarily giv- 
ing the state notice of the facts, I submit immedi- 
ately to the state what previously was only medi- 
ately under the state's jurisdiction. Of course, this 
must be specified in the penal law, so that every 
citizen may act accordingly. 

But by this arrangement we get into a great dif- 
ficulty. For if a citizen is killed in his own house, 
he can not prefer complaint. Perhaps he also has 
no relatives, who may do it for him ; or his relatives 
may have been implicated in his murder. Since 
the state has no jurisdiction over the house, it would 
seem that there is no legal protection against such 
murder ; nay, more, that the law expressly invites 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



thieves and robbers to add murder to their crimes, 
so that no complaint can be preferred against 
them. 

This can not be the case. There must be some 
rational solution of this difficulty. Let us look 
for it. 

If the murdered man were alive, he might prefer 
complaint or might pardon. He has been unjustly 
killed ; he ought still to live, and the state does not 
know of him yet except as living, since he has been 
killed beyond the jurisdiction of the state. The 
state has still the right to ask him what he has 
resolved to do concerning that occurrence, and 
hence his will is to be assumed, with perfect exter- 
nal right, as still continuing to exist for the state. 
The murdered man has not determined this will of 
his ; but it is determined, declared, and guaranteed 
by the general will of all the citizens of the state, 
regarded as separate individuals ; not by the com- 
mon will of the state as a body, for the state judges, 
decides, and grants, but does not demand and sue in 
the present case. (We shall speak of this general 
will of the individuals of a state again, when we 
come to speak of Wills ; for this general will is- 
manifested always when it is the interest of all the- 
individuals of a state that a deceased citizen should' 
have had a will, and that his will should be still 
valid ; because they all wish that, in a like case, the 
same should be assumed of them.) How, then, is 
the will of the murdered man determined by the 
general will of all citizens ? They all say, his will 

T 



V 



332 THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 

would have been to prefer complaint. Hence, there 
should be a representative of the general will in 
regard to this last will of the deceased — a sort of 
public prosecutor ; for the state can not prefer the 
complaint, since the state does not and can not 
know of the murder ; and each private citizen has 
the right to see that this public prosecutor does his 
duty. Each one has the right to notify him of such 
occurrences, and to prefer complaint against him if 
he neglects to prefer complaint against the mur- 
derer. 

Each private citizen must not only have the 
right, but must be obliged to give public notice of 
what he knows of such occurrences, and must be- 
come liable to punishment if he neglects to do so. 
Nay, even the government takes, to some extent, 
notice of the occurrence, since it must take notice 
of the death and the manner of death of all citi- 
zens — for to die is a public act. All doctors must 
be under the supervision of the government. 
Hence, it is rather in the interest of the offender 
to spare the life of the attacked party ; for so long 
as that party lives, he may forgive ; but when he 
dies, his cause devolves upon the people and the 
public prosecutor ; and the people can not pardon, 
for the sake of their own security. 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



333 



THE RIGHT OF SELF-DEFENSE* 

No one has the right to defend with his own body 
property which is marked by the state, and thus to 
jeopardize his own life and the Ufe of his opponent ; 
for so far as such property is concerned, title can 
ahvays be proved, even if it should be taken pos- 
session of by the other party, and the true owner 
can be reinstated and have his aggressor punished 
by the state. 

But property which is not thus marked, the title 
to which can only be proved by its actual posses- 
sion, either upon one's body or in one's house, each 
person h^s the right to defend even at the risk of 
the life of the assailant. The question. What is 
money worth compared to life can not be properly 
asked in such cases. For that question rests upon 
moral, not legal, considerations. Each joerson has 
the absolute right to prevent any one from taking 
things away from him by force, and to prevent it at 
all hazards. A violent attack upon my property, if 
I protect it by my own person, thus becomes an at- 
tack upon my body, and I have the same right of 
self-defense. The ground of this right is, that the 
assistance of the state is not immediately on hand, 
and that the defense — since the property to be de- 
fended can not be replaced — must be immediate. 

We have thus obtained, at the same time, the 

* The limitations of this right, as here exposed, deserve particu- 
lar notice in our republic, where no right is more shamefully abus- 
ed. — Tran slator. 



334 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



limit of the right of self-defense. I have this right 
only in so far as the state can not defend me ; hence, 
it must not be my fault that the state can not do so, 
and I am legally bound to do my best to make it 
possible for the state to do so. I am bound to call 
upon the state for help, and this is done by calling 
for help. It is absolutely necessary to do this, and 
it is the exclusive condition of the right of self-de- 
fense. The code of laws should specify it, and citi- 
zens should be taught it from their earliest youth, 
so that they may accustom themselves to it. For 
how, if I murder some one, and say : He assailed 
me, and I could save my life only by taking his 
The murdered man can not expose my lie. But if 
I call for help, I can prove that I was the attack- 
ed party ; or, at least, if the contrary can not be 
proved against me, the presumption remains in 
favor of my innocence. 

(The laws of the twelve tables justified the killing 
of a thief who defended himself, and very correct- 
ly, if he had stolen unmarked property ; for no one 
can be required to let things be taken from him to 
which he can not afterward prove his right of pro- 
perty. He was justified in reclaiming the articles 
by force. If the thief defended himself, the attack 
upon the property became an attack upon the per- 
son of the injured party, and hence he was justified 
in defending himself at the risk of killing the thief 
But the law required him, as a condition of that 
right of defense, to cry out for help ; and again very 
correctly, for only by thus crying out for help did 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



335 



he place himself in a position to get the public to 
•witness his innocence, or to obtain assistance which 
might secure the thief and obviate the necessity of 
killing him.) 

Such an attack upon unmarked property may oc- 
cur cither upon public territory or in my house. In 
the first case, the application of the above principles 
is clear enough. In the latter case, no private per- 
son, not even government, has the right to enter my 
house. It is only by crying out for help that I jus- 
tify government and every private person to enter 
my house. My crying out for help is a complaint 
preferred, and hence a voluntary abandoning of my 
house-right. 

Each person who hears another one cry for help 
is lawfully bound by the state-compact to hasten to 
his assistance. For all individuals have promised 
io all individuals to protect them ; and the cry for 
help is the annojcncement that a danger exists, which 
the representative of the protecting power, the govern- 
ment, can not immediately remove. Hence, the cry 
for help confers upon each individual again not only 
the right but also the obligation to render immedi- 
ate protection. If it can be proved that a citizen 
heard the cry for help and did not hurry to assist- 
ance, he is liable to punishment ; for he has violated 
the original municipal compact, and the law should 
provide punishment for such cases. Such assist- 
ance in need is not only moral and religious duty, 
but is the absolute duty of citizenship. 

Those who hasten to render help have no further 



336 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



duty than tp part the combatants, but on no accoun 
have they a right to decide their dispute. For the 
grounded extends no further than the ground. The 
immediate right of protection is grounded upon the 
present danger ; and that danger has been removed 
by the interference of the others. The judicial de- 
cision and investigation on the part of the state 
can now be safely awaited for. It is, for instance, 
an unlawful barbarism which should be severely 
punished, when mobs punish criminals after they 
have been caught. As soon as the immediate dan- 
ger has been removed, by the capture of such crimi- 
nals, government again becomes sole protector and 
judge. 

There is still another case of self-defense, based 
upon a pretended right of necessity, the theory 
whereof we shall also consider in this connection. 
This right is said to come into play when two free 
beings are brought by mere natural casualty — and 
on no account by any action of their own — into a 
position wherein the one person can save himself 
only by the death of the other, wherein both must 
die unless one of them is sacrificed. This category 
of supposed cases includes that wonderful problem 
of the law colleges, which assumes a board, to 
which two shipwrecked persons cling, the board 
being only large enough for one ; and which pro- 
blem has recently been changed for the more ac- 
commodating illustration of a boat of the same quali- 
ties as the board. But having clearly determined 
this whole class of cases, we may well refrain from 
examples. 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



337 



Much pains have been taken to solve this law- 
problem, and various solutions have bec^n proposed, 
simply because the legal principle involved has not 
been clearly thought. 

The problem of the Science of Rights is, How may 
many free beings, as such, exist together ? In thus 
inquiring after the manner of such a coexistence, 
the possibility of such coexistence is evidently pre- 
supposed ; and hence, when this possibility does not 
exist, the inquiry after the manner of its existence 
is clearly inadmissible. Such is the case in the as- 
sumed instance. Hence, there exists no positive 
right to sacrifice another individual to the preser- 
vation of my existence ; but neither is it against 
the conception of rights, that is, it is not in con- 
flict with any positive right of the other to sacrifice 
his life to the preservation of my own. In short, 
the question of right and not right does not enter 
here at all. Nature has canceled her permission 
for both of us to live ; and the decision is a matter 
which physical strength or free will may settle. It 
may be, however, that this free will, which is not de- 
termined by the conception of rights in the present 
instance, stands under a higher legislation — the mo- 
ral law. Such, indeed, is the case. Morality tells 
each of the two : Do nothing at all, but leave the 
matter to God, who can certainly save you, if it is 
his will, and to whom you must surrender your life 
if it is his will. This consideration, however, does 
not properly belong to a Science of Rights. 

When the right of self-defense has been exer- 



I 



338 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



cised, whether upon provocation or by accident, 
the person who has exercised it is obliged to sur- 
render himself to the government for justification, 
and to prove that he went beyond the pale of the 
laws of the state only because a case had arisen in 
which those laws could not be applied. The person 
who does not voluntarily thus give notice of the fact, 
renders himself liable to suspicion. 

The last will of the person killed is, presumptive- 
ly, that the deed shall be investigated. It is, there- 
fore, the duty of the public prosecutor to prefer the 
complaint. The defendant is not obliged to furnish 
the positive proof that he did act in self-defense ; 
for in the fewest cases, however just the provoca- 
tion, could such a proof be procured. Provided it 
can not be proved against him that he acted with- 
out sufficient cause, judicial proceedings against 
him must be suspended. A complete exoneration 
can not be pronounced unless he can furnish posi- 
tive proof Concerning this mere suspension of 
judicial proceedings, we shall have more to say 
hereafter, when speaking of Criminal Law. 

The property and honor of citizens is thus clear- 
ly defined and secured as perfectly as their life ; 
nor does it appear likely that greater security is 
obtainable. 

ACQUISITION AND DERELICTION OF PROPERTY. 

We speak here of acquisition of property only in 
the strictest meaning of the word, as signifying 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



339 



really the acquisition of a new kind of property, 
and not as signifying a mere exchange or trade of 
similar property. 

All property is of a double nature ; it is either 
absolute, and hence not under the jurisdiction of 
the state, as money and valuables, etc., or relative, 
and immediately under the jurisdiction of the state^ 
as real estate, houses, licenses, etc. 

When both kinds of property are exchanged, 
that is, when a sale takes place, each party acquires 
a new kind of property, and hence the supposed ac- 
quisition takes place. It is clear enough that the 
deed of sale must be concluded under the supervi- 
sion of the state, that is, according to the forms of 
law, and must be guaranteed by the state. For the 
state has all this property under its jurisdiction, 
protects it and assigns it to the proper person ; the 
state must, therefore, know the owner. No one is 
the legal owner of such a piece of property, except 
through the recognition of the state. The only 
question can, therefore, be, whether the state is 
obliged to give its consent to all such sales or con- 
tracts between private persons ; or whether the 
state may interfere, and to what extent. 

The legal end of the state in all the property 
conveyed to citizens is, that this property shall be 
properly used for the necessities of the state. 
Hence, the purchaser must agree to use it, and 
must be in a position to be able to use it ; for in- 
stance, if he purchases lands, he must be able to 
farm ; if a profession, he must understand it. 



340 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



Whether houses may be purchased for the pur- 
pose of puUing them down depends upon the spe- 
cial provisions of the law, which always shapes it- 
self according to circumstances. 

Again : since the seller retires from the jurisdic- 
tion of the state, so far as the money he receives in 
consideration is concerned, which is absolute pro- 
perty, and since, nevertheless, the state guarantees 
him a living, the sale must be of such a character 
that the sustenance of the seller is perfectly secur- 
ed, and may never devolve upon the state. This 
can be done either when the seller retains a claim 
upon his property in the shape of a mortgage, 
etc., or when he loans out the purchase-money 
under the supervision of the state. He is not ab- 
solute proprietor of his money so long as it is his 
only sustenance, he being responsible to the state 
for his ability to make his living. 

A second mode of acquiring and ceding property 
is, where the party who deeds it away receives no 
equivalent for it — bequests and last wills. 

Property thus bequeathed may be either absolute 
or relative. Absolute property may, of course, be 
given away without form of law, the state having 
no jurisdiction over it. Relative property, how- 
ever, can be bequeathed only in the form prescribed 
by law. The same condition applies here which 
applies to sales : the bequeather must retain suffi- 
cient to sustain his life. A bequest conveys full 
title, and can not be repealed. 

A will conveys property after the death of the 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



grantor. The important question is here : How 
can the will of a dead person be obligatory upon 
the living ? The conception of rights applies only 
to persons who stand, or may stand in reciprocal 
influence with each other in the sensuous world. 
Dead persons have, therefore, at first view, no rights, 
and their property reverts to the state, which is the 
first claimant, since no individual can take posses- 
sion without the state's permission. But it is very 
possible that a man may cherish in his life wishes 
for others after his death ; and the firm belief that 
those wishes will be carried out after such death as 
well, is frequently a real present advantage — for 
instance : better attendance, care, and love of those 
who are the presumptive heirs, are an actual bene- 
fit of life. In short, the conviction that wills are 
valid is an enjoyment of life, to which it may well 
be possible to acquire a right. This is the only 
proper point of view from which to consider this 
matter. The question is not one concerning the 
rights of the dead — the dead have no rights — but 
of the living. 

Whenever the necessity of such a conviction 
arises among men, provisions will be made for it 
in the property-compact ; that is, all will guarantee 
that conviction to all. 

But it should be constantly kept in mind that 
this agreement is arbitrary ; that is to say, a legal 
relation among men is possible without such an 
arrangement. It is not necessary that a law dis- 
pute should arise about the possessions of the 



342 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



dead, since the state is ready to claim them. I call 
this agreement regarding the validity of wills arbi- 
trary, therefore, merely because it is not necessary 
for the realization of the conception of rights. 

The conviction that wills will be considered valid 
after death can be realized only by establishing a 
law that all wills, without exception, shall be thus 
considered. Each one, then, guarantees for his 
own sake to all others the validity of their will, and 
in doing so guarantees his own will. The right of 
the dying is thus made to connect with the rights 
of all surviving citizens. It is not the dying per- 
soil's own will which the state respects, but the will 
of all surviving individuals. 

It is the business of the public administrator, as 
the representative of the will of all individuals of a 
state, to watch over the wills, and see that they are 
properly executed. He must not be a member of 
the government, since the government is an inter- 
ested party in the matter, but simply a representa- 
tive of the people, as individuals, precisely like the 
public prosecutor. 

Hence, likewise, every private person must have 
the right to prefer complaint against him. 

Wills should be executed in presence of this 
administrator and of witnesses who represent the 
public. 

Since the legal validity of wills is arbitrarily 
established, it follows that the law may also provide 
how far the right shall extend to inherit at all. It 
is the duty of the legislator, with due regard to the 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 343 



peculiar circumstances and conditions of his state, 
to establish such provisions. There is only one 
a priori limitation to this right of willing away pro- 
perty, namely, that the heirs of the deceased must 
be provided for sufficiently, that is, that they may 
not become a burden to the state. 



§ 2. 
PENAI- LAW. 

Thesis. — Whosoever violates the municipal com- 
pact in any manner, whether from neglect or inten- 
tionally, loses, strictly speaking, all his rights as a 
citizen and as a man, and becomes an outlaw. 

Proof. — A person has rights only on condition 
that he proves himself fit for a community of free 
beings, that is, that he makes the fundamental 
principle of law his constant rule of action ; and is 
also able to actually determine his free acts by the 
representation of that principle. He who willingly 
violates the law has not made that principle his 
rule of action ; and he who violates it through care- 
lessness is not able to determine his acts by that 
principle. In either case, therefore, the condition 
of a person's having rights does not exist, and hence 
with the condition the conditioned also vanishes. 
In either case the person has no rights, and is an 
outlaw. 

Antithesis. — The only object of the erection of 



344 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



a State government is to secure to each the full 
possession of his rights ; and the state has only to 
discover and apply the means which will secure 
this object. Hence, if that object can be attained 
without the absolute outlawing of transgressors, 
the state is not necessarily obliged to affix this pun- 
ishment to violations of the law. It may do so or 
not as it pleases. If, moreover, it should appear 
that the interest of the state requires the preserva- 
tion of its citizens, and that each citizen is likewise 
interested in not having each little offense of the 
laws punished by outlawing the transgressor, a 
compact of the following character would become 
necessary : All citizens promise to all citizens that 
they shall not be outlawed and expelled from the 
state by reason of their offenses, provided such be 
compatible with public security. Let us call this 
compact the compact of expiation. 

Such a compact is equally useful for all (for the 
whole state) and for each single person. For the 
whole state has thus the prospect of retaining citi- 
zens whose usefulness far exceeds the injury they 
may do, and obliges itself merely to accept the ex- 
piation. The single individual, on the other hand, 
has thus the perfect right to ask that his expiation 
shall be received in place of the greater punish- 
ment which he has deserved. It is a very useful 
and important right, this right of citizens to expi- 
ate offenses. 

This compact becoming a law, the government is 
bound to act according to it. 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



345 



Of course, the right of expiation extends no fur- 
ther than is compatible with pubhc security. If it 
is made to extend further, it is irrational ; and a state 
in which it extends beyond this limit, is not a legal 
state at all ; that is, does not sufficiently guarantee 
public security, and has no claim to toleration. 

Punishment is not an absolute end. In fact, the 
proposition that punishment is an end for itself, as 
is, for instance, involved in the expression, " He 
who has killed must die," is positively meaningless. 
Punishment is merely a means for the end of the 
state " to maintain public security ;" and the only 
intention in providing punishment is to prevent by 
threats transgressions of the law. The end of all 
penal laws is, that they may not be applied. The 
threatened punishment is intended to suppress all 
evil purposes and to promote a good disposition, 
so that the punishment may never be applied. 
Hence, in order to attain this end, each citizen 
must know that the threat of the law will invaria- 
bly become reality if he should commit any offense. 

It is, therefore, to some extent true, that punish- 
ment serves as an example, namely, to convince all 
of the infallible execution of the law. But the ori- 
ginal intention of punishment was solely to deter 
the criminal from the crime. Now, since this end 
could not be attained, he having committed a crime, 
his punishment has another aim in view, namely, 
to deter other citizens from committing the same 
offense. The execution of the penal law is, there- 
fore, a public act. Each citizen who has heard of 



34^ THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 

an offense, must also learn that it has been pun- 
ished. It would be an evident injustice toward all 
those who might, in future, be tempted to violate 
the same law, if the actual punishment of previous 
violations of that law had been concealed from 
them ; for such concealment would lead them to 
hope for escape from punishment. 

The material principle of positive punishments in 
a state has already been suggested. Each indivi- 
dual must stake precisely that portion of his rights 
and privileges (his property, in the widest signifi- 
cance of the word) which he is tempted to violate 
in the others, whether wilfully or through neglect. 
In other words, the punishment must be equal to 
the crime : pcena talionis. Each one must know, 
that the injury he may intend to do to the other 
will be done to himself. 

The essence of this principle is, as we have also 
seen, that a sufficient counterpoise must be estab- 
lished for the evil intention or the neglect. 

Whenever this principle becomes applicable, the 
compact of expiation can become valid ; and hence 
the legal extent of the validity of that compact de- 
pends upon the answer to the question : How far is 
such a counterpoise possible 

This counterpoise becomes possible or impossi- 
ble, first, either from the nature of the case, or, 
second, from the peculiar position of the subject 
for whom the punishment is intended. 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



347 



PUNISHMENT BY FINES. 

I. a. Such a sufficient counterpoise, or a punish- 
ment which may be perfectly equal to the crime com- 
mitted, is practicable from the nature of the case 
where a wrong has been committed through care- 
lessness, and where the will of the criminal was a 
maUria/itcr evil will, having selfish ends in view, and 
longing for the possession of another man's property. 
There is, however, this distinction : In the case of 
carelessness, a fine equal to the amount of damage 
done is equal to the injury committed ; but in the 
case of a crime, the criminal must not only restore 
what is taken, but must, moreover, pay an equal 
amount from his own property, in order to have the 
punishment made equal to the offense. For if you 
take away from him merely that which he has taken, 
he will always be tempted to commit the same crime, 
having nothing to lose and every thing to gain. By 
establishing the theory of a sufficient counterpoise, 
however, and hence by making him pay precisely 
the same amount which he has stolen, there is no 
inducement for him to steal. In case of discovery, 
he will lose precisely the amount he would gain if 
not discovered. Hence, the only incentive to rob 
would be the consideration that the chances of dis- 
covery were in his favor. But such a probability is 
not likely to happen in a well-regulated state. 

d. The principle of a counterpoise is not applica- 
ble from the nature of the case when the will of 

the transgressor is formalitcr evil ; that is, when the 

z 



348 



rilE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



violation of the law is done, not for tlie sake of get- 
ting possession of anotlicr person's goods, but mere- 
ly for tlie sake of injuring tlie other. For such a 
formaliter evil will is not deterred by the punish- 
ment of an equal loss ; nay, an envious, malicious 
person may gladly submit to such loss, provided his 
enemy is also injured. Unless we find some other 
means of protecting citizens against such a forma- 
liter evil will, the only punishment adequate to it 
must be outlawing, or exclusion from the state. Let 
us consider this subject. 

Firstly, it is to be remarked that we have here a 
case where the sentiments and intentions which in- 
spired the crime must be taken notice of. Never- 
theless, it should not be held that this is a case 
wherein the morality of the act is considered. No 
man can and no man should be the judge of another's 
morality. The only object of civil punishment, and 
the only measure of its degree is the possibility of 
public security. Violations of the law, prompted by 
malicious intentions, are to be punished more severe- 
ly than violations inspired by selfish motives ; not 
because they are more immoral'^ — morality, in- 
deed, has no degrees ; and there is only one morali- 
ty — but because the fear of a milder punishment, a 
punishment simply of equal loss, would not afford 
adequate security. 

Hence, the question arises : How can it be known 

* Moreover, who would assert that the man whose malicious act 
evinces, at least, courage and energy, is more dead to morality than 
the man who is prompted only by egotism .'' 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



349 



and proved for external law what motives inspired 
the crime ; and what punishment shall be applied 
to crimes prompted by malicious motives ? 

He who can prove that he stood in need of what 
he has appropriated from the other, and for what 
purposes he needed it, etc., is to be considered as 
having appropriated it for the sake of selfish gain. 
He who can not prove this, who, perhaps, did not 
even take or intend to take the property of the 
other, but merely destroyed it, has made himself lia- 
ble to another doubt : Did he injure it intentionally 
and maliciously, or inadvertently ? 

We have two criterions for malicious motives ; 
one external and one internal criterion. We have 
an external criterion when previous free acts of the 
same person can be proved, which can be inter- 
preted only as means for the final end to effect a 
malicious injury. 

On the other hand, the pci'son who pretends that 
he has injured the other's property unintentionally, 
must be able to furnish positive proof that those 
other acts which are connected with the injury had 
quite a different end in view. Unless he can fur- 
nish this proof, he is to be held as convicted of a 
malicious act. 

And yet remarkable connections of circumstances 
are possible which will give to an accidental crime 
all the appearance of premeditated maliciousness, 
without any true ground. Hence, regard must also 
be paid to the internal criterion of maliciousness, 
namely, whether the two persons have previously 



350 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



been enemies, and whether the accused has exhibi- 
ted signs of mahcious intent in his previous hfe. 

But how if all this circumstantial evidence nei- 
ther proves the suspicion nor removes it complete- 
ly, as is very possible ? A great number of jurists 
recommend in such cases a mild sentence ; but such 
mildness exhibited toward a guilty person is a great 
injury to the commonwealth. By thinking the case 
clearly, the solution of this problem will show itself 
The investigation is not yet closed, and can not be 
closed by the proofs furnished as yet ; hence, the 
accused is not pronounced either guilty or not guil- 
ty. He has, however, been convicted, at least, of 
carelessness, and this punishment he has to suffer 
for the present. As far as his malicious intent is 
concerned, the state says nothing, but allows him 
to show, by his future life, proofs for or against it. 
Moreover, additional circumstances may be discov- 
ered in the future concerning the motives of the 
crime, and those additional circumstances, together 
with his behavior, will determine within a speci- 
fied time whether he ought to be convicted or com- 
pletely cleared. This suspension of judicial pro- 
ceedings we have already had occasion to recom- 
mend in cases wherein the right of self-defense is 
exercised, and is, indeed, to be recommended in all 
cases of unproved suspicion. In a well-regulated 
state, no one should be punished innocently ; but 
neither should any offense pass unpunished. 

As a matter of course, the state will have to pro- 
vide by law more severe punishment for offenses 

( 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



committed with malicious intent than for those 
committed for selfisli motives of gain. For each 
one must know beforehand by what law he will be 
punished; otherwise, the punishment would involve 
an injustice ; and the intent of the law, to deter men 
from committing offenses, can be achieved only by 
publishing the law. It is also clear, that the state 
must expressly provide by law what shall be held to 
constitute criminal neglect, and hence must specify 
the care which each citizen is required to observe in 
particular cases. Whosoever observes the care thus 
required by law, is to be released ; and if any dam- 
age happens in spite of such care, it is to be con- 
sidered as a misfortune, which must be borne by 
the sufferer ; or it must be paid for by the state, if 
it was occasioned by a want of proper law or of 
proper police regulations. 

The plea of anger or of drunkenness — as having 
placed the criminal for the moment beyond the con- 
trol of his reason — relieves him from the charge of 
premeditated and malicious intent ; but a rational 
legislation will rather provide more severe than 
milder punishment for such cases, particularly if 
such a state of mind is habitual with the accused ; 
for a single unlawful act may well constitute an 
exception from an otherwise blameless life. But a 
person who pleads, " I habitually get so angry or so 
drunk as not to be any longer master of my sen- 
ses !" confesses thereby that he changes himself 
into a beast on a fixed principle, and that he is, 
therefore, not fit to live among rational beings. He 



352 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



must either be content to lose his freedom until his 
recovery is sure, or else be excluded from the state 
forever. Our laws treat far too leniently pleas of 
drunkenness. True, if a nation or a class of men 
in a nation can not renounce this vice, the laws can 
not prevent them from shutting themselves up in 
their houses with any one who chooses to keep 
them company, and there to drown their reason, 
provided they remain so shut up until they again 
become rational ; but the state may well lock up 
every person found intoxicated on public terri- 
tory. 

II. a. The counterpoise becomes impossible of 
application from the peculiar position of the subject 
for whom the punishment is intended, when that 
subject has nothing to lose but his body. Let no 
one complain of injustice in this respect, because 
the wealthier man, who has no need to rob, and in 
robbing only risks his property, is allowed to expi- 
ate his offense ; whereas, the poor man, who needed 
what he took for his absolute requirements, can not 
expiate it, and hence must be completely outlawed, 
simply because he has nothing. For such an objec- 
tion would falsely assume that the state is the mo- 
ral judge of men, and must make the punishment 
equal to the moral depravity. But the state has no 
such moral end in view. The state merely wishes 
to secure property. Now the threat, " What you 
steal from another citizen I shall take from your 
possession," has little terror for a person who owns 



THE SCIENCE OF KICI/TS. 



353 



nothing. Hence, the state must use another threat 
for such persons. Whether this threat must neces- 
sarily be excUision from the state, or whether an- 
other punishment can be contrived for the poor, 
we shall see hereafter. 

b. It is impossible to contrive a punishment as a 
counterpoise against the will, to arise in immediate 
hostility to the law and its power. The utmost 
that can be done and must be done, is that the law 
be made to maintain its authority ; and hence the 
law can not, as an equal punishment for the at- 
tempt to overthrow it, provide double severity for 
all its subjects. This would be to punish all citi- 
zens for the crime of one individual. The punish- 
ment of an equal loss is, therefore, not allowable 
here ; and there is no manner of expiating the 
original punishment for all crimes — to outlaw the 
criminal. 

Two modes of committing this crime against the 
state are possible ; it may be committed mediately 
against the state in the person of its citizens, name- 
ly, by violating in them the compact to which the 
state, as such, is one party ; or it may be committed 
directly against the state, in which case the offense 
is rebellion or high treason. 

I. We shall first explain the former. The original 
municipal compact contains two distinct compacts. 
Firstly, a compact of each citizen, as an individual, 
with all others, as individuals, concerning their pro- 
perty. This property-compact the individuals con- 
clude, (not the state, as such, that is, not as the or- 



354 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



ganized whole of all individuals, for the state only 
guarantees this compact.) In other words, the gov- 
ernment is not a party to the original property-com- 
pact, but is merely a created organization to gua- 
rantee it. 

But the original municipal compact contains, se- 
condly, this very agreement of all citizens, as indi- 
viduals, with themselves, as an organized whole, or 
as a state, in which agreement the state promises 
each citizen, when he has fulfilled all the duties of 
a citizen, to jorotect his absolute property, his body, 
and his life. The state has, of itself, renounced all 
claim to the absolute property ; it has no right upon 
it, only duties concerning it. The state is, there- 
fore, pa7'ty of the citizen, to whom it has guaran- 
teed protection of this property against all viola- 
tion. Hence, if some individual should break this 
compact of the state by robbery or by violent as- 
saults upon a citizen's life or body, he would be- 
come guilty of an immediate attack upon the state ; 
for he would have broken the compact of the state, 
and have done his best to make the state faithless, 
and thus to destroy the compact existing between 
the state and the citizen. For the state having 
guaranteed the protection of that property, life, or 
body, the criminal directly offends against the state, 
and for this attack upon the state he should be de- 
clared outlawed according to the above. 

2. To attack the state immediately is to be guilty 
either of rebellion or high treason. Rebellion is 
to, attempt to raise, or actually to raise, a power in 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 355 

hostility to the power of the state, and to resist 
therewith that power of the state. Treason is to 
use a power which has been conferred by the state, 
to destroy or annihilate the ends of the state ; or 
not to execute the ends of the state ; hence, to 
take advantage of the confidence of the nation to 
render nugatory its purposes. Not to exercise 
the power of government is often as injurious to 
public security as to abuse it ; and hence should be 
equally punished. It is all the same to the citizens 
whether government officials abuse their power for 
positive aggressions of their own, or whether, by 
neglecting to exercise it, they permit the aggres- 
sions of others. In either case, the citizens are 
oppressed. After an individual has signified his 
willingness to accept an office, the nation properly 
calculates that the duties of that office will be exe- 
cuted, and hence takes no other precautions to have 
them executed. If he had no intention to execute 
the duties of his office, he should have refused to 
accept it. 

Only private persons can be rebels ; only govern- 
ment officials can become guilty of high treason. 



PUNISHMENT BY CONFINEMENT. 

All these classes of offenses condition outlawing 
or complete exclusion from the state, because the 
only mode of expiation whereof we know as yet, 



3S6 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



that of fines equal to the loss inflicted, is not ad- 
missible in these cases. The question remains, 
however, whether there is not another mode of 
expiation which may be applicable to these offen- 
ses ? 

a. Let us first consider the case of the poor man 
who appropriates something from selfish motives, 
and who has not wherewith to expiate the loss. 
Why should the harsh punishment of exclusion 
from the state be applied in his case ? There is, 
indeed, a way of settling the difficulty, whereby he 
also can participate in the benefits of the law of 
expiation. He has a property in the strength of 
his body, and hence he can expiate the fine by la- 
bor. This labor must, of course, be assigned to 
him immediately ; for every offense, strictly speak- 
ing, annuls the citizenship of the offender. Only 
after the punishment of the offense has been expi- 
ated does the offender become a citizen again. It 
is also necessary that this labor must be carried on 
under the supervision of the state. Hence, the 
offender loses his freedom until he has expiated his 
offense. This is the punishment of the workhouse, 
as distinguished from that of the penitentiary and 
house of correction, whereof we shall speak here- 
after. This punishment both satisfies the principle 
of an equal loss, and establishes a threat, which will 
be likely to deter all persons from committing crimes 
in any well-regulated state where the criminal is sure 
of detection. 

We now proceed to consider the other cases. 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



357 



b. A forvialitcr evil will, or an immediate attack 
upon the state, presupposes such sentiments, that 
the criminal who is guilty of either crime can not 
be tolerated in society ; he must be outlawed, or 
cxiDclled from the state. But since it is not neces- 
sary that the criminal should continue to harbor 
such sentiments, it may be possible to establish a 
second mode of expiation in the form of the following 
agreement : All citizens promise to all citizens that 
they will extend to them an opportunity of again 
becoming fit to live in the society of rational beings, 
should they ever have been convicted of unfitness 
therefor, and that after such reform they shall be 
again received as members of the commonwealth. 
Such an agreement is arbitrary and beneficial ; but 
it benefits all ; and hence, the criminal is invested 
by it with a rigJit to an opportunity to reform. 

The punishment which is established by such an 
agreement is an expiation of utter exclusion from 
the state ; hence, it is a benefit extended by the 
law to the criminals. Each person has the privi- 
lege to reject his rights, and hence the criminal 
may reject this benefit granted him by the law ; 
but by rejecting it he clearly proves himself an in- 
corrigible scoundrel, and must be expelled without 
further delay. Let no one imagine, that by giving 
a criminal this privilege of accepting or rejecting 
the punishment of expulsion, the criminal obtains a 
means to escape punishment altogether. If a state 
is arranged rationally, and its neighboring states 
are also arranged rationally, there is no punishment 



358 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



SO terrible as expulsion from the state ; and it is not 
to be expected that any one will choose it in prefer- 
ence over the established expiation, or that the pros- 
pect of having the privilege to choose it, if discov- 
ered, will quiet him when about to commit a crime. 

(This same privilege of accepting the expiation 
established by law, or of submitting to the exclu- 
sion from the state, must, of course, be allowed also' 
where the punishment is one of fines ; although it 
is not to be supposed that any one would ever pre- 
fer to be expelled from the state, and thus to lose 
all his property, rather than pay the fine.) 

By means of this compact, a reform is to be made 
possible in the criminal. Not a moral reform, not 
a reform of inner sentiments ; for no man is a judge 
of another's morals ; but merely a political reform, 
a reform of obedience to the law and of rules of 
action. Moral sentiment is a love of duty for the 
sake of duty ; but political sentiment is love of 
one's self for the sake of one's self and care for the 
protection of one's own body and one's own proper- 
ty. This all-transcending love of one's self be- 
comes the very means in the hands of the penal 
legislator by which to force each citizen not to vio- 
late the rights of the other ; for in the Penal Law 
it is established that every evil act you do unto an- 
other you do unto yourself It is this care for one's 
own security which originally impelled man to build 
up a state, and he who has no such care has no rea- 
son to remain citizen of a state. It is this care 
alone by means of which each citizen gives to the 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



350 



state a sufficient guarantee, and is controlled by 
the state. The law has no hold uj^on a man who 
has not this self-love. There arc two ways of 
escaping from it. Firstly, by pure morality, when 
each one forgets his empirical self in the ultimate 
end of all reason ; in which case the Penal Law 
does not determine his acts, since duty itself causes 
him to obey the laws ; and, secondly, by barbarism, 
when a man does not care for his own welfare ; in 
which case he becomes unfit to live with other free 
beings, since the Penal Law can not apply to him. 
Political reform is a return to a care for one's own 
security and welfare. 

He who has inflicted injury for the sake of the 
injury, has exhibited not only internal malice, which 
the state does not judge, but also barbarous man- 
ners and an unusual carelessness for his own wel- 
fare. If those barbarous manners are replaced by 
milder traits, and if the criminal learns to care for 
his own security, he may again be tolerated in 
society. Long confinement and its many evils 
are very apt to teach him this. The same holds 
good in regard to those who have attacked the 
body or property of other citizens. They are wild 
and untamed natures, and in the latter case, more- 
over, lusting after another's possessions. Let them 
first learn to live and take care of their own. It is 
only the reckless squanderer of money who is a 
thief or robber. Rebels may often be good-natured, 
but erring visionaries. Let them have their con- 
ceptions corrected, and learn to esteem the benefits 



360 THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 

of a civil government, particularly of that in their 
own state, and they may grow to be excellent citi- 
zens. It is only the traitor who has acted both 
faithless and infamous ; hence, he can never again 
be trusted with a public office. Used to power and 
to command, he will, however, not find it easy to 
stay content with modest retirement and a small 
private business. The only question is, whether he 
can not be tamed down } It may be a difficult 
matter, but who would assert the absolute impossi- 
bility of it (Dionysius became schoolmaster in 
Corinth.) The chief rule is, that we should not 
despair of their reform, nor make them despair of 
themselves ; and secondly, that they should always 
be made to retain some degree of satisfaction with 
their condition, and some hope of a future better 
fate. To some extent this is accomplished by al- 
lowing them the privilege of choosing between ex- 
pulsion and expiation. They will trust themselves 
when they perceive that the state trusts them. 

The institutions of correction for these offenders 
must be practically arranged. They must be re- 
moved from society, and the state must be made 
heavily responsible for any injury which may be in- 
flicted upon society by persons who have been sen- 
tenced to these institutions. Hence, the freedom 
of such persons must be completely taken away 
from them. But he who is to reform his manners 
must be free ; and he must be free, moreover, in 
order to render possible a judgment as to his re- 
form. Hence, it is a chief maxim, that these men 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



361 



must be free within necessary restrictions, and must 
live socially together. 

Nothing for them without labor. It would be the 
greatest mistake if these institutions were so ar- 
ranged that the prisoners received their food whe- 
ther they worked or not, or if laziness were pun- 
ished by the most degrading treatment — blows — 
instead of by its natural sequence — lack of food. 
Again : All the production of their labor, after de- 
duction of their board, must remain their own. In 
the same manner, their property in the state must 
be kept for them under the supervision of the gov- 
ernment. The object of their confinement is, to 
awaken in them love of order, of labor, and of pro- 
perty. But how could this love arise, if order and 
labor were to them of no advantage, and if they 
could not acquire property .'' They must be under 
the supervision of the state, and yet they must also 
be free ; in other words, so long as they act proper- 
ly they must seem to be perfectly free ; but when 
they act wrongly, punishment must follow immedi- 
ately. 

It will be well to use remote countries, uninhab- 
ited islands and deserts for such institutions. To 
urge the expense would be criminal. For what are 
the revenues of the state for, unless for such pur- 
poses The expense, moreover, will not be very 
great, if such colonies are properly arranged, and 
if each person is employed in the occupation with 
which he is familiar. 

The object and condition of allowing criminals 



362 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



to expiate their offences is their reform. Unless, 
therefore, they really do reform, the conditioned, 
that is, the patience of the state, ceases. It would 
be very practicable if each criminal could be re- 
quired to prescribe a fixed term for his own reform, 
which term he might, perhaps, be allowed to extend 
a little if it should be considered advisable. But a 
certain general term must be peremptorily fixed for 
all. We have already said, that the object in- 
tended is not moral, but political reform ; and acts 
alone can decide whether it has taken place or not. 
Hence, if the discipline of government is relaxed 
as each prisoner gives evidence of improvement, it 
will not be difficult to determine soon whether a 
reform is taking place. It will be necessary to ap- 
point sensible and conscientious men for these offi- 
ces, who will make themselves responsible for the 
future good conduct of all persons whom they pro- 
nounce reformed. 

The reformed criminals return into the common- 
wealth and are reinstated in their previous condi- 
tion. They have been completely reconciled with 
society by their punishment and subsequent reform. 
Nor will there be entertained any more distrust — 
but rather confidence — in these reformed criminals, 
when men have once resolved to consider such in- 
stitutions as really means of reform, and not merely 
as means of punishment ; and when only those are 
allowed to return into society who have reformed, 
but not, as is done at present, all who have been de- 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



tained for a fixed term, and who have only been 
made worse by irrational treatment. 

All prisoners who have not reformed within the 
prescribed term, arc excluded from the state as in- 
corrigible. 

These institutions arc to be not only places of 
conversion, but also of punishment ; and hence 
they must be of a nature to deter citizens from 
committing crimes. Loss of freedom, exclusion 
from society, and strict discipline — all this is ter- 
rible enough for men accustomed to freedom ; but 
there is no reason why the fate of the prisoner 
should not be generally considered to be still more 
severe than it really is, or why distinctions should 
not be made in their treatment which terrify oth- 
ers without being in themselves an evil ; as, for in- 
stance, a peculiar dress, or a chain which does not 
pain much. The prisoner gets used to it, and 011 
the outsider it makes the projDcr impression. 

MURDER. 

The only crime which does not allow of an at- 
tempt to reform the criminal, and which must, 
therefore, be punished immediately by absolute ex- 
clusion from the state, is intentional and premedita- 
ted murder. (Not a murder which is merely the ac- 
cidental result of another violence.) The ground 
is this : Of him who has committed murder, it is to 
be apprehended that he may murder again ; and 
since the state has no right to compel any one to 

AA 



364 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



expose his life, no one can be compelled to under- 
take the supervision over the murderer, who must 
be allowed some degree of freedom, if he is to re- 
form ; nor can the other criminals be compelled to 
tolerate a murderer in their midst. True, if any- 
one is willing voluntarily to risk his life in behalf 
of the murderer, he may do so. Hence, societies 
might be permitted to establish institutions for the 
purpose of attempting the reform of such criminals ; 
but such societies must guarantee to the state the 
safe-keeping of the murderer. 

THE PUNISHMENT OF OUTLAWING. 

But what shall be done with those who are abso- 
lutely excluded from the state, either without pre- 
liminaiy attempts to reform them, or because they 
did not reform within the prescribed term, or be- 
cause they refused to expiate .'' This is by far the 
most important investigation in the theory of pun- 
ishments. We hope by its means to put an end to 
a number of confused notions ; and we shall not 
merely, as is usual, assert, but prove. 

I. The declaration that a citizen is an outlaw is 
the highest punishment which the state can inflict 
upon any rational being. For the state exists for 
the individual as state only through the compact. 
The utmost the state can do, therefore, is to declare 
this compact annulled. Both the state and the in- 
dividual do not now exist for each other any more. 
The compact, the legal relation between them, and 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



indeed all relation between them, has been utterly 
canceled. The state has now no right upon the 
individual by virtue of the compact ; and since there 
is no other positive, determined, and determinable 
right than through the compact, the state has no 
right whatever upon the individual thus outlawed. 

2. But what, then, are the results of this declara- 
tion The perfectly arbitrary treatment of the out- 
lawed. Not as if you /mda right to treat him thus ; 
but there is ncitJicr a right against it. The outlawed 
person is, therefore, declared to be a thing — an ani- 
mal. For, in regard to animals and their relation 
to us, the question is never one of right, but of 
physical force. I can not say, I have a righ't to 
kill this animal ; but neither' can I say, I have not 
a right to kill it. It is so with the outlaw. No 
reason can be shown — from positive law — why 
the first citizen who meets him should not kill or 
torture him ; but neither can any reason be shown 
why he should do so. 

3. Supposing some citizens should thus treat the 
outlaw, what would follow ? No proceeding against 
them on the part of the state, for the outlaw has no 
rights ; but certainly the contempt of all men, or in- 
famy. He who tortures an animal for mere plea- 
sure, without having any positive advantage in 
view, is justly held in abhorrence as an inhuman 
barbarian ; how much more he who would torture 
or kill, for mere pleasure, a being which at the 
worst has, at least, a human countenance ! It will 
not be done, therefore ; not because that outlaw has 



366 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



any rights, but from motives of self-respect and of 
the esteem of otlier men. (Tlie moral view of the 
act we do not take into consideration here ; but 
merely its civil aspects.) 

4. How, then, is the state situated in regard to 
this outlaw We have already shown, that by the 
breaking of the compact the state ceases to exist as 
a state for the outlaw. Hence, if the state should 
kill him, it does not kill him as state, but as the 
stronger physical force, as a mere natural force. 
But the state has the same reasons for not killing 
or torturing him which we discovered to influence 
the private individual, namely, respect for itself, for 
its citizens, and for other states. 

Nevertheless, there is a possible ground why the 
state should kill the outlaw, to wit : Because it is 
the only manner in which the state can protect 
itself against him. Since there is no reason why it 
should not kill him, this consideration is, therefore, 
decisive in such a case. The outlaw is considered 
simply as a wild beast, which must be shot ; or as an 
overflowing river, which must be stopped ; in short, 
as a force of nature, which the state must render 
harmless by an opposing force of nature. The 
death of the outlaw is not a means of punishment, 
but merely of security ; and this consideration gives 
us the whole theory of capital punishment. 

THE PUNISHMENT OF DEATH. 

The death of the outlaw is not decreed by the 
state as a judge. The state, as judge, has merely 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 367 

pronounced the sentence of exclusion from the 
state, and this is the only public act of the state 
If, after such sentence, the state, nevertheless, kills 
him, it does not kill him through the judicial power, 
but through the police power. The condemned has 
been placed beyond the pale of the judiciary ; he 
belongs to the police. The killing is not done by 
virtue of a positive right, but from sheer necessity. 
Such matters, however, are not honorable, and 
hence, like all that is dishonorable and yet neces- 
sary, must be done secretly and shamefully. Let 
the criminal be throttled or beheaded in prison. 
His civil death has been pronounced publicly by 
the sentence of expulsion, and that sentence has 
killed him in the memory of all citizens. The citi- 
zens do not care what is done with the physical 
man after that sentence. 

(What a disgrace to reason that so much pomp 
should accompany executions ; or that the dead 
bodies of the criminals should be hung up for 
public show, tied to the wheel, etc., just as the 
Indians hang up the scalps of their enemies around 
the walls of their wigwams !) 

The death of the criminal is something acciden- 
tal, and hence can not be officially announced ; but 
the exclusion from the state must be officially an- 
nounced. 

To increase the death-penalty by torture is bar- 
barous. It changes the state into a wild, malicious, 
revengeful enemy, who loves to torture his enemy 
and to make him feel death. 



368 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



It is often necessary to strengthen the proofs of 
reason by facts of experience. Here is one well 
known : In the Roman Republic, those who were 
condemned to death were allowed the choice of 
exile. It was only when danger was to be appro* 
hended of them, as in the case of Catilina's con- 
spirators, that the Romans permitted their death. 
But they killed them secretly, in prison ; not pub- 
licly. The consul Cicero was sent into exile, and 
very justly, in so far, not because of that execution 
itself, but because the trial of those conspirators 
had been decided in the senate, and not before the 
people, as the law required. 

One other circumstance is to be considered in the 
execution of criminals, which we can not well pass 
by here, although it is not of a legal nature. For 
the moral law explicitly prohibits in each case the 
intentional killing of another. Each man must be 
regarded as a means to promote the object of rea- 
son ; and no one can renounce the belief that the 
other, however corrupt he may now be, may re- 
form his moral character, without renouncing his 
own end, as necessarily established for him through 
reason. The strict proof of this assertion is to be 
furnished in a Science of Morality. Hence, a pri- 
vate person has never a right to kill, but rather 
than kill should endanger his own life. It is differ- 
ent in the case of the state, which, as police power, 
is not a moral, but simply a legal body. Govern- 
ment officials may be often morally obliged to ex- 
pose their own lives to danger rather than kill the 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



life of another ; but they have not the right to cx- 
jDOSc the Hfe of others, still less the life of the state—' 
that is, the life, security, and legal relation of all — by 
allowing a dangerous outlaw to remain alive. 

Hence, the execution of incorrigible rascals al- 
ways remains an evil, though a necessary one, and 
it is the problem of the state to render it unneces- 
sary. But what is to be done with them, if they 
must not be killed Imprisonment for life is a 
burden for the state ; and how, indeed, could the 
itate require its citizens to pay taxes for something 
which will realize none of the ends of the state, 
since there is no hojDC for reform } The only re- 
maining punishment is banishment for life ; not 
deportation, for deportation is, as we have shown, a 
means of conversion, and is carried on under the 
superintendence of the state. If there is any fear 
that the criminal may return, let him be branded* 
in a manner as little painful as possible, for the state 
must not appear as a torturer. The branding, also, 
is not punishment, but a means of public safety, and 
devolves upon the police. 

What shall be done with the criminals who have 
thus been branded and expelled from the state .'' 
This is a question put, not by the citizens, but by 
men. Let the branded criminal go into the wilder- 
ness and live among animals. This has accidental- 
ly happened to many who were not criminals ; and 

* The custom in Nebraska, Kansas, and all border states of civil- 
ization. — Translator's Remark. 



370 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



the criminals, branded under laws as we have de- 
scribed, are incorrigible. 

Against the theory of punishments as established 
here by us, there is usually opposed another theory, 
which establishes an absolute right of punishment, 
and looks upon judicial punishment not as a means, 
but as an end in itself Since this latter theory 
claims to rest upon an unprovable assertion, and 
hence manages very cleverly to escape furnishing 
proof, it is easy for its advocates to sneer at all 
those who think differently, to charge them with 
sentimentality, affected humanity, etc., and to call 
them sophists and legal quibblers ; quite in violation 
of the much-praised and justly-to-be-demanded 
equality {of reasons) and freedom (of opinions, sup- 
ported by reasons) on the field of philosophy. The 
only prominent side of this system, by which it ex- 
poses itself to attacks, seems to me to be this : It 
has often been remarked, that no person condemned 
to death for murder has ever been known to com- 
plain that he was being punished too severely or 
unjustly ; and if any one should so complain, all 
sensible men would laugh in his face. Now, apart 
from the laughing in his face, this is so very true 
that a murderer could not say he were suffering too 
much or unjustly, even though he should have been 
sentenced to the gallows by a government which 
was entirely ignorant of his crime of murder, and 
which was hanging him altogether unjustly. There 
is nothing more true than that we are forced to con- 
fess : In a moral world, governed by an all-knowing 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



judge, and according to moral laws, no one who is 
treated according to the same law which he himself 
established suffers unjustly ; and this confession, 
which forces itself upon all men, is based upon a 
categorical imperative. Hence, the question is not 
at all whether tJie murderer suffers unjustly, when 
he also loses his life in a violent manner ; but the 
question is : Whence does any other mortal derive 
the right to personify this moral rule of the world, 
and to punish the criminal according to his deserts ? 
A system which asserts the supreme ruler of a 
state to have this right is undoubtedly compelled 
to say that the title to it is beyond demonstration, 
and hence to call it a right given by God. Such a 
system is, therefore, bound to consider the monarch 
as the visible representative of God in this world, 
and to consider all government as a theocracy. In 
the Jewish theocracy, the doctrine was, therefore, 
eye for eye, tooth for tooth, and very properly. 

PILLORY, DAMAGES, ETC. 

He who maliciously defames another citizen, na- 
turally defames himself, for he renders himself unfit 
for the confidence of others. But since the state 
owes retribution to the one who has been innocently 
slandered, it must make public the defamation of 
the slanderer. 

Pillories are a means to call the attention of the 
public to this defamation, and to symbolize infamy. 
They must be as little painful as possible, and are 



372 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



a punishment in themselves ; hence they must not 
be connected with other punishments, unless, in- 
deed, when a crime has been committed which in- 
volves the infamy of the criminal, as, for instance, 
burglary. For the common criminal does not be- 
come infamous when there are hopes of his reforrh ; 
and if there are none, if he is an outlaw, it would 
be no punishment to put him on a pillory. 

The one who has been injured must receive dam- 
ages in all cases. He holds the state directly 
responsible for his damages, since the state guar- 
anteed him protection against all injuries; and the 
state holds the criminal responsible. It is clear 
that the injured party must not be made to pay the 
costs of the proceedings. What does he pay his 
taxes for The state must hold the criminal re- 
sponsible. When the criminal is outlawed, all his 
property is, of course, confiscated by the state. 

There are two distinct kinds of iDunishment, as 
we have seen, such as are based upon a com- 
pact, and such as are based upon the absolute 
nullity of the compact. It is clear that the citizen 
is obliged to submit to the first class without com- 
pulsion, since they are in a certain other respect 
also his rights, and that he may very properly be 
compelled to submit to them voluntarily, since there 
are worse punishments possible, and since the re- 
mainder of his property is still to the state a gua- 
rantee of his submission to the law. He must, 
therefore, voluntarily appear at the investigation of 
his crime, and can be punished if he does not ap- 



THE SCIENCE OF RICIITS. 



373 



pear. Hence, there is no reason why his body 
should be taken possession of by law.* 

But the guilty person, can give no proper guaran- 
tee when his crime involves punishments of the 
second class ; that is to say, when it involves either 
exclusion from society or deportation to institu- 
tions of reform. The reason is, that in the first 
case he has lost all his rights categorically, and in 
the second case problematically, that is, unless he 
reforms. Hence, the state must take possession 
of the bodies of such offenders. The right of com- 
pulsion which the state has commences with the 
relative property of citizens ; if that is not sufficient, 
the state takes hold of their absolute property ; and 
if the guilty person refuses to pay, the state enters 
his house by force ; and, in the extreme case, the 
state takes possession of their persons. 

* In other words : for all such crimes each citizen has an absolute 
right oibail. — TRANSLATOR'S Remark. 



§3 



POLICE LAW. 

What is the Police ? This we can best answer 
by a deduction of the conception of the poHce power 
of the state. The state, as such, has entered into 
a common compact with its citizens by which each 
party assumes certain duties and receives certain 
rights. We have shown the means of connection 
between the state and the citizens in all cases in 
which the citizen can and undoubtedly will prefer 
complaint. But we have also shown up a number 
of matters regarding which no complaint will be 
preferred, because the state is officially obliged to 
watch over them. Hence, there must be a pecu- 
liar means of connection for these cases between 
the citizens and the government ; and this means 
of connection is the police power of the govern' 
ment. By its means the reciprocal influence be- 
tween government and citizens first becomes pos- 
sible. Hence, it is one of the necessary require- 
ments of a state. 

The state has a twofold relation to its subjects : 
it has duties to perform, namely, to protect their 
rights ; and it has rights, namely, to require their 
obedience to the laws and the fulfillment of their 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



375 



duties as citizens. In cither case the police power 
is the mediator between state and citizens. As the 
judicial power is related to positive law in its appli- 
cation to the citizen, so the police power is related 
to positive law in its application to the government. 
The police furnishes the case of the application of 
the law. 

It is, as we have said, the duty of the state to 
protect the rights of its citizens, and the police 
power is the executive power of this protection. 
Some persons might object that citizens are very 
apt to remind the state themselves when the pro- 
tection stipulated in the constitution is required. 
But very often a damage received can not be made 
good ; and it is far more the object of the state to 
prevent attacks upon the rights of its citizens, than 
to punish attacks after they have been committed. 
Hence, the arrangements necessary for protecting 
and securing the rights of citizens are the first 
branch of the police power. 

Each citizen must be able to travel throughout 
the whole state free and safe from all accidents, 
whether he does so by virtue of his right to culti- 
vate the ground, or to purchase products, or to 
carry on trade, or to enjoy his capital. The greater 
the number of men is who are gathered at one 
place, the more effective must be the arrangements 
for protecting them. Hence, armed police-squads 
are necessary in the streets, and on the roads where 
roads are unsafe. These subordinate officials have 
no judicial power, but simply the power to tempo- 



376 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



rarily arrest suspicions persons. Tliey are to be 
held heavily responsible for all crimes committed 
within their precinct. 

This protection of the safety of life and property 
involves also a superintendence of roads. Each 
citizen has the right to demand good roads or streets, 
for the state has guaranteed to him the speediest 
and most comfortable mode of carrying on business, 
or most agreeably enjoying his justly acquired gains. 
Hence, signs must be put up at all unsafe places. 
Persons who are injured at places which have no 
such signs are entitled to redress from the state, 
for the state has guaranteed to them secicrity in all 
acts not prohibited by law. Persons who are injured 
where such signs have been put up have no re- 
dress ; but neither must they become liable to a 
fine, for each person is master of his own body. 

This protective power of the police involves, like- 
wise, superintendence of doctors and apothecaries. 
The examination of physicians is best left to the 
medical colleges, who in this examination are, thei'e- 
fore, considered as government officials. Quackery, 
etc., must be prohibited, that is, for those zvho carry 
it on ; but not for those who make use of it ; for 
each i^erson is master of his own life. 

The police must also afford protection against 
robbery, against fire, and against the overflowing 
of rivers, etc., etc. All this is the absolute duty of 
the state, and is not merely to be regarded as a be- 
nefit conferred. 

But besides this direct protection by means of 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



377 



the police, the state has also the right, for the same 
purpose of protecting the rights of its citizens, to 
pass certain laws tending to facilitate the police su- 
perintendence, the discovery of guilty persons, and 
the general security of citizens. These laws arc 
called Police Laws, to distinguish them from the 
real Civil Laws. For, whereas the latter laws pro- 
hibit merely the actual violation of the fundamental 
compact, the police laws are made to prevent the 
possibility of such violation. Thus, the civil laws 
prohibit acts which directly interfere with the rights 
of others, as, for instance, theft, robbery, assault, 
etc., and hence these laws are not likely to be con- 
sidered unjust by any one. The police laws, how- 
ever, prohibit acts which may appear perfectly in- 
different, and which in themselves harm no one, but 
which are calculated to facilitate the wronging of 
others, and to render difficult the protection of the 
rights of citizens by the state. Hence, these laws, 
the violation whereof is not injurious in itself, are 
often considered vmfair by people who do not com- 
prehend their peculiar nature, and the right of a 
state to pass them has often been doubted. But 
the right and the duty of the state to pass such laws 
uppear clearly from the police power of the state. 
Let me illustrate the matter by an example : If a 
citizen carries arms, he thereby does not directly 
violate the rights of any other citizen ; for what 
can it matter to the other citizen what I choose to 
carry about my person But my carrying arms 
facilitates the injuring of other citizens ; and hence 



378 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



the State has, in my opinion, a perfect right to pro- 
hibit the carrying of arms. Nay, it would have the 
right to prohibit the harboring of arms in my house, 
if the state could only be sure that I would never 
require to use them in self-defence. (In the Roman 
Republic it was prohibited to appear armed in the 
city ; and the general who awaited the honor of his 
triumph was required to remain outside of the city 
until the day of his solemn entrance, or, if he chose 
to enter before, the law required him to lay aside 
his arms and renounce the expected honor.) At 
any rate, the state has the undoubted right to pro- 
hibit the possession of certain weapons, such as air- 
guns, which seem especially made for assassination, 
and are not necessary for self-defence. 

Another instance : It would be a very proper 
police law to prohibit citizens from walking the 
streets at night without a light. The object of this 
law is that each citizen may be easily recognized by 
the policeman. True, by walking without a light, 
the rights of no citizen are injured ; but in the 
darkness it is much easier to injure a citizen, and 
this possibility is to be removed by the police law. 

He who violates a police law must suffer all the 
disagreeable consequences which may result to 
him, and is, moreover, liable to a fine. 

The chief principle of a well-regulated police is 
this : That each citizen shall be at all times attd 
places, when it may be necessary, recognised as this 
or that particular person. No one must remain 
unknown to the police. This can be attained with 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



379 



certainty only in the following manner : Each one 
must always carry a pass with him, signed by his 
immediate government official, in which his person 
is accurately described. There must be no excep- 
tion to this rule. In the case of important per- 
sons, who can afford to pay for it, it may be well to 
use their jDortrait (photograph) in the place of 
word-descriptions, which are always more or less 
insufficient. No person should be received at any 
place who can not thus make known by his pass 
his last place of residence and his name. But in 
order not to interfere with the innocent enjoyment 
which may arise from temporary incognito, police- 
men should be strictly prohibited from ever de- 
manding the exhibition of such passes from mere 
curiosity. It is only to be required when necessary 
to identify the person. 

The state does not know what passes in the 
house, but it does take cognizance of what happens 
in the streets, which, after all, we must pass in 
order to get into the house. Hence, the citizens 
can not assemble in a house without the knowledge 
of the police ; and the police have thus not only 
the power, but also the right to prevent such as- 
semblages — since the streets are under their super- 
intendence — if they excite suspicion. If enough 
men gather together to possibly endanger public 
safety, which is always the case when the number 
is large enough to resist effectually the armed 
power of the government at such a place, the police 
has the right to ask of them their intentions, and 

BB 



38o 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



to watch that these intentions alone are carried out. 
The house-right ceases in sucli cases ; or, if the 
owner of a house does not wish to give up that 
riglit, he can assemble tlie masses in a pubhc liouse, 
where house-riglit does not exist. Gatherings of 
the people in the streets, marlcet-places, etc., belong 
to the same class, and may likewise be prevented 
by the police, or at least watched. The state may 
properly arrange this matter by providing that, when 
a certain number of people gather together, they 
must notify the police of their intention, so that the 
police rhay act understandingly. 

In regard to the security of absolute property, 
two more questions are to be answered : firstly, 
how is the counterfeiting of drafts to be jjrevented 
and secondly, how the counterfeiting of gold and 
silver ? I am the more inclined to reply to these 
questions, since I can thus illustrate how that which 
is deemed impossible is easy enough for a well- 
regulated police. 

Firstly, concerning forged drafts. I refer here 
only to those which are transferable by indorse- 
ments. In large cities, such drafts often change 
owners many times in a day. Perhaps the persons 
through whose hands the draft passes know each 
other not at all or only slightly. Now, it is very 
true that merchants do not usually take a draft 
unless they know the maker or makers, and his or 
their signature to the draft. But signatures can 
be forged ; and the simple fact is, that forged drafts 
are passed, and that hence it must be possible to 



THE SCIENCE OF RICnTS. 



381 



cheat by means of them. The forgery is finally 
discovered. But how is it now possible to find out 
the man who is guilty of the forgery, and to get 
hold of him.'' There is no difficulty about the mat- 
ter under such police laws as we have described. 

The names of those through whose hands the 
draft has passed are written on its back. Under 
present circumstances, however, people can easily 
adopt false names, and it is impossible, therefore, 
to trace them. According to our proposition, each 
person who indorses the draft must show by his 
pass that he is this particular person, and where he 
resides. The one who receives the draft makes a 
note of this by writing on the back of the draft 
over the name, " Pass from ," naming the gov- 
ernment official who has issued the pass. These 
few additional words are all that is necessary to 
make known the true name and residence of the 
indorser. 

But how can the indorser be found again, if the 
draft, after the lapse of some time, should turn out 
to have been forged by him ? Under our police 
laws, no one can leave one place without announc- 
ing his next place of residence, which must be 
marked on the pass and recorded in the books. 
No other place receives him except the one men- 
tioned in his pass, and when he leaves that place 
again the same rule holds good. 

But how if he is a foreigner or travels abroad t 
All police-states, particularly those who are also 
commercial, must come to an agreement about this 



382 THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 

matter, so that the forger may be arrested in any 
country. The pass of a state which has not entered 
into this agreement must not be recognized, and 
hence people who present passes from such a state 
can not have their drafts cashed. Such an under- 
standing would force all commercial states to adopt 
this agreement. 

But how if some one should also forge such a 
pass .'' The forging of passes ought to be made 
impossible ; to accomplish which there are doubt- 
less ample means. For instance, by a paper or 
parchment prepared exclusively for this purpose, 
as was used for the French assignats, the secret 
of making which must be known only to the gov- 
ernment. But can not this paper be forged, as was 
done in that same case of the French assignats ? 
It was done in that case, because a great interest, 
as well of pecuniary gain as of political animosity, 
was to be satisfied ; and because the forged paper 
could be used hundred-fold. But when only one 
pass is to be forged, will any one go to all that 
trouble Not likely, unless a forged draft of a very 
large amount is to be passed. But the dangers 
which would accompany such an undertaking would 
in all probability deter from the costs and trouble 
of it. 

As regards the second point, the counterfeiting 
of money, there is this to be considered : The state 
guarantees the value of the money, and whoever 
accepts a piece of money accepts it on the faith of 
the state, the seal whereof is stamped upon it. 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



383 



Hence, the state must guarantee to each citizen the 
genuineness of the money, and whoever is cheated, 
without any fault of his own, by counterfeited mo- 
ney, should be justly indemnified by the state, and 
have his false money exchanged for genuine money. 

But when is a citizen cheated without any fault 
of his oivn ? Under what conditions is it to be be- 
lieved that he could not distinguish the false money 
from the genuine ? It is a part of the education of 
each citizen to learn to know money, and it should 
be held as a rule that counterfeit money can not be 
readily recognized as such when many citizens are 
cheated by it. 

It is, therefore, in the immediate interest of the 
state, and a part of its police laws, to discover 
counterfeiters and to prevent the counterfeiting of 
money. How is this to be done ? It can not be 
accomplished by means of passes ; for no one can 
say from whom he has received certain pieces of 
money, unless he has received them in very large 
quantities. Hence, it must be accomplished by 
keeping a strict watch over the materials which 
may be used in counterfeiting coin, and which 
chemistry can designate, and by providing that 
such materials shall not be issued except to such 
as present their pass and give notice of the use they 
intend to make of them. This is all the easier for 
the state, since the state is exclusive possessor of 
all mines, as has been shown above. 

Besides these duties, the government has the 
right to see that the laws — civil laws as well as 



384 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



police laws — arc properly executed. The state has 
to indemnify for each offense which is committed 
within its limits, and to bring the offender to jus- 
tice. It is clear, however, that no particular or ad- 
ditional arrangements are necessary for this guar- 
dianship over the laws ; for, in each case of such 
violation of the laws, there is some one who must 
be protected, and hence all the arrangements made 
for protection cover these cases. 

The exclusive condition of the efficiency of leg- 
islation, and hence of the whole state organization, 
is this, that each citizen shall know beforehand that, 
if he commits a crime, he will be surely discov- 
ered and punished in the manner prescribed by law. 
For, if the criminal can entertain hopes of escaping 
detection, what is to deter him from committing a 
crime In such a case, we merely continue to live, 
no matter how wise the laws we have, in our previ- 
ous condition of nature, wherein each depends upon 
the good intention of the other ; and it is injustice 
to punish the detected criminal according to the 
strict letter of the law, since we allowed him to hope 
that he would escape unpunished, like all the other 
criminals whom he knows to have escaped unpun- 
ished. How could a laAv deter him which he could 
not but consider null and void The sarcasm which 
the common people love to levy against our laws 
and government — namely, that they do not punish 
men for having committed crimes, but for having 
been foolish enough to allow themselves to be de- 
tected — is just and appropriate. It is an indispen- 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



sable requirement addressed to the police, as the 
servant of the government, that each guilty per- 
son, without exception, should be brought to trial. 

I have heard many objections raised to the possi- 
bility of satisf)'ing this requirement. If such ob- 
jections were grounded, I should not hesitate to 
draw the conclusion : In that case government and 
law are equally impossible among men ; all so-called 
states are nothing else and never will be any thing 
else but the oppression of the weak by the power- 
ful under the pretense of law ; and the science of 
law is nothing but the science of how the stronger 
may be unjust without injury to themselves, as 
Montesquieu ironically describes it. But is there 
really any valid reason for this assertion of the im- 
possibility of satisfying that requirement Whence 
does that assertion arise .'' It arises from this, that 
the conception of a state as here established, that 
is, as an organic whole, is not firmly entertained, but 
is constantly darkened by the image of our modern 
states. In our modern states, as they are constitu 
ted now, it would, of course, be impossible to bring 
to trial the author of every offense ; or if it could 
be done, that is to say, if some one state should 
make use of some of the police regulations sug- 
gested by us, it would involve an injustice which no 
people would be content to suffer. For a state 
wherein disorder and injustice rule, the government 
can maintain itself only by also allowing the people 
a good deal of disorder, provided that disorder does 
not injure the government itself. 



386 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGhTS. 



The source of all evils in our present states, as 
they are constituted, is disoi-dcr, and the impossi- 
bility to produce order. The fact that it is so very 
difficult to discover a criminal arises solely from 
the fact that there are so many persons in a state 
who have no fixed position, and about whom the 
state does not concern itself In a state such as we 
have described, each citizen has his fixed position ; 
and the police know pretty well where each citi- 
zen is, and what he does at every hour of the day. 
Each one must work, and each one who does work 
has enough to live. Loafers {chevaliers d' industrie) 
are not tolerated in any part of the state. By means 
of his pass, each citizen can be identified at a mo- 
ment. Crime is something very unusual in such a 
state ; and is preceded by a certain unusual emo- 
tion, which the police, quickly observing, proceed 
to watch. I, for my part, can not see how, in such a 
state, an offense and the offender can remain undis- 
covered. 

It is also to be considered, that, with such a police 
establishment, detectives or spies are not needed. 
Secrecy is always petty, low, and immoral. Each 
one should have the face to do before the whole 
world whatever he dares to do at all. Moreover, to 
whom could the state intrust such a dishonorable 
occupation ? Shall the state itself encourage infa- 
my and immorality .'' If the state authorizes secre- 
cy in the conduct of some men, who will guarantee 
that these men may not make use of that secrecy 



THE SCIENCE OF KICIITS. 



for their own purposes and for the commission of 
crimes by tliemsclvcs ? 

Again : Why should a government secretly place 
a watch over its citizens ? In order that they may 
not believe themselves watched. But why should 
they not believe themselves watched ? That they 
may discover their thoughts respecting the govern- 
ment and its plans, and may thus become their own 
betrayers ; or may betray whatever they know of 
other secret and illegal acts. The former is neces- 
sary only where government and citizens live in 
perpetual war with each other ; where the citizens 
are unjustly oppressed, and seek to regain their free- 
dom again by employing all the means and tricks of 
war : the latter is necessary only where the police 
are not watchful enough. 

The Paris chief of police, who proposed to clothe 
his detectives in uniform, became the laughing-stock 
of a corrupt people, and saved his life thereby. But 
in my opinion he evinced healthy common sense. 
In a state organization such as we have described, 
the police official can be uniformed. They are quite 
as much the venerable witnesses of innocence as 
the accusers of crime. Why should honesty hate 
the eye of watchfulness 



FIRST APPENDIX 

TO THE 

SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



FUNDAMENTAL PRINCIPLES 

OF THE 

RIGHTS OF FAMILY. 



§ I. 

DEDUCTION OF MARRIAGE. 
I. 

Precisely as we were compelled to deduce the 
necessity of the coexistence of rational beings, and 
their relation to a sensuous world, in order to ob- 
tain an object for the application of the conception 
of rights, so shall we now be compelled to obtain a 
knowledge of the nature of marriage by its deduc- 
tion, in order to be enabled to apply the conception 
of rights to it understandingly. It is not to be 
understood as if the conception of rights gave rise 
to marriage ; for marriage is not merely a legal as- 
sociation like the state, but rather a natural and 
moral association. Hence, the following deduction 
is not legal, but is necessary in a Science of Rights, 
as giving an insight into the legal propositions 
which follow it. 

Nature has based her end of propagating the 
human race upon the existence of a natural impulse 
in two different sexes, which impulse seems to ex- 
ist only for its own sake, and to crave only its own 
satisfaction. That impulse is itself end of our na- 
ture, although it is only means for nature in gene- 



392 



THE SCTE.VCE OF RIGHTS. 



ral. While men have no other object than to sat- 
isfy this impulse, the natural consequences of this 
satisfaction result in the end which nature had in 
view, without any additional cooperation of man. 

The ground why nature must separate two dif- 
ferent sexes, through the union whereof alone the 
propagation of the race is possible, I shall suggest 
here only in outlines, since it is an investigation 
not properly belonging here. The formation of a 
being of its own kind is the last degree of creative 
power in organic nature ; and that power neces- 
sarily works whenever the conditions of its causa- 
lity are given. If these conditions, therefore, were 
always given, nature would be an everlasting transi- 
tion into other forms, but never a permanency of 
the same form ; would be an everlasting Becoming, 
but never a Being ; nay, even transition and be- 
coming would be impossible, since there would be 
nothing to change and to become ; all of which is, 
indeed, an unthinkable and contradictory concep- 
tion. 

If a nature was to be possible, it was necessary 
that the species should have another organic exis- 
tence besides that of the species, and yet that it 
should remain species, so as to be able to propagate 
itself This was possible only by separating the 
organic power, which forms the species, into two 
absolutely connecting halves, as it were, which only 
in their union would form an itself propagating 
whole. In this separation that organic power forms 
only the individual. The individuals are and form 



THE SCIENCE OE RIGHTS. 



393 



the species only, (for to be and to form is the same 
in organic nature,) in so far as they are united and 
can be united. The individual is permanent only 
as a tendency to form the species. Only thus did 
rest and permanency of power enter nature, and 
with that permanency form, and m-ade it nature ; 
and hence this law of a division into two separate 
sexes necessarily pervades all nature. 

11. 

The particular determinedness of this institution 
of nature is this, that in the satisfying of the im- 
pulse, or in the promotion of the end of nature, so 
far as the real act of generation is concerned, the 
one sex keeps purely active, and the other purely 
passive. 

The ground of this determinedness also can be 
discovered. The system of all the conditions for 
the generation of a body of the same species had 
to be completely united somewhere, and, when put 
in motion, to develop itself after its own laws. The 
sex which contains these complete conditions is 
called throughout all nature the female sex. Only 
the first moving principle could be separated from 
it. The sex in which this principle generates itself, 
apart from the substance to be vitalized by it, is 
called throughout all nature the male sex. 



394 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



III. 

The character of reason is absolute self-activity ; 
pure passivity for the sake of passivity contradicts 
reason, and utterly cancels it. Hence, it is not 
against reason that the one sex should propose to 
itself the satisfaction of its sexual impulse as an 
end in itself, since it can be satisfied through acti- 
vity ; but it is absolutely against reason that the 
other sex should propose to itself the satisfaction 
of its sexual impulse as an end, because in that 
case it would make a pure passivity its end. Hence, 
the female sex is either not rational even in its ten- 
dencies, which contradicts our presupposition that 
all men should be rational, or this tendency can not 
be developed in that sex in consequence of its 
peculiar nature, which is a self-contradiction, since 
it assumes a tendency in nature which nature does 
not accept ; or, finally, that sex can never propose 
to itself the satisfaction of its sexual impulse as its 
end. Such an end and rationality utterly cancel 
each other in that sex. 

Nevertheless, the sexual impulse of this female 
sex, as well as its manifestation and satisfaction, 
are part of the plan of nature. Hence it is neces- 
sary that the sexual impulse should manifest itself 
in woman under another form ; and, in order to be 
conformable to reason, it must appear as an impulse 
to activity ; and as a characteristic impulse of na- 
ture, it must appear as an activity exclusively apper- 
taining to the female sex. 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



395 



Since our whole subsequent theory rests upon 
this proposition, I shall endeavor to place it in its 
proper light, and to disarm possible misunderstand- 
ing of its meaning 

Firstly : we speak here of nature and of an im- 
pulse of nature ; that is, of something which a 
woman will find in herself as something given, 
original, and not to be explained by any previous 
act of her own, nor originated by any application 
of her freedom whatever ; something which woman 
will thus find in herself as soon as its two condi- 
tions, reason and activity of the sexual impulse, 
exist. But we do not at all deny the possibility 
that woman may not sink below this condition of 
nature, or may not through freedom elevate herself 
above it, which elevation, however, is itself not 
much better than the sinking below it. A woman 
sinks below nature when she degrades herself to 
irrationality ; in which condition the sexual impulse 
may manifest itself in consciousness in its true 
form, and may become a well-considered object of 
activity. A woman elevates herself above her na^ 
ture when the satisfaction of the sexual impulse is 
not an end for her, neither in its coarse form nor in 
that form which it receives in a well- formed female 
soul ; hence, when it is considered by her as means 
for another end, which she has with free conscious- 
ness proposed to herself Unless this other end is 
to be an utterly wicked and degrading end — as, for 
instance, if she should have done it for the purpose of 
becoming a married woman, and in view of a pros- 

c c 



39^ THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 

pcct of a secure income, thus making of her person 
tlie means to obtain an enjoyment — we must assume 
it to be tlie same end which nature has in view, that 
is, to have children, and which some such women, 
indeed, claim to have been their motive. But since 
she could attain this object with every possible man, 
and since thus there is no ground to be discovered 
in her principle why she should have chosen pre- 
cisely this man and none other for that purpose, we 
must assume, as, after all, the least degrading mo- 
tive, that she chose this man because he was the 
first one she could get, which surely does not evince 
great personal self-respect. But even apart from 
this grave circumstance, and admitting for the mo- 
ment that such an end would justify the resolve to 
cohabit with a man, the serious question would still 
remain: Whether the end will be produced by such 
means, or whether children are really begotten by 
the resolve to beget them 

We hope this plainness will be pardoned in our 
endeavor to show up certain dangerous sophistries 
in all their nakedness, by means of which sophis- 
tries many seek to palliate the repudiation of their 
true destination, and to perpetuate it forever. 

Let me characterize this whole relation in an 
image : The female sex stands one step lower in 
the arrangement of nature than the male sex ; the 
female sex is the object of a power of the male sex, 
and no other arrangement was possible if both sexes 
were to be connected. But at the same time both 
sexes, as moral beings, ought to be equal. To make 



I 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 397 

this possible, a new faculty, utterly wanting in the 
male sex, had to be given to the female sex. This 
faculty is the form in which the sexual impulse ap- 
pears to woman, whereas to man it appears in its 
true form. 

Man may confess to himself that impulse, and 
may seek its satisfaction without thereby losing 
his self-respect or the respect of others. I speak, 
of course, of the sexual impulse in its original con- 
dition ; for a man who should propose to himself 
the satisfaction of that impulse for its own sake 
with a loving wife, would show himself to be a 
coarse character, whereof we shall discover the 
ground hereafter. But a Vv-oman can not confess 
that impulse to herself Man may court, but not 
woman. A woman who were to do so would exhi- 
bit the highest self-contempt. For a refusal re- 
ceived by a man signifies merely, " I will not sub- 
mit myself to thee !" and this may be borne. But 
a refusal received by a woman would signify, " I 
will not accept the submission thou hast offered 
me !" and this is insupportable. It is nonsense to 
apply legal arguments in this case. If some women 
claim that they ought to have the same right to 
court as men, we would answer : " No one disputes 
you that right ; why, then, do you not make use of 
it The truth is, such arguments are as absurd 
as it would be to question whether man has the 
same right to fly as the birds have. Of course he 
has ; so let him fly ! 

This one distinction constitutes, indeed, the v.'hole 



398 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



difference of 'the sexes. It is this natural constitu- 
tion of woman which gives rise to female modesty, 
which modesty is by no means developed to the 
same extent in the male sex. Vulgar men some- 
times boast of their deeds of voluptuousness ; but 
even in the times of the worst demoralization into 
which the female sex has repeatedly sunk, and then 
by far exceeded the demoralization of the men, 
women have never been known to do so ; and even 
the prostitute will rather confess that she carries on 
her horrible trade from lust of gain than from vo- 
luptuousness. 

IV. 

Woman can not confess to herself that she gives 
herself up — and since, in a rational being, every 
thing is only in so far as it arises in consciousness — 
woman can not give herself up to the sexual im- 
pulse merely to satisfy her own impulse. But 
since she can give herself up only in obedience to 
an impulse, this impulse must assume in woman the 
character of an impulse to satisfy the man. Woman 
becomes, in this act, the means for the end of an- 
other, because she can not be her own end without 
renouncing her ultimate end — the dignity of rea- 
son ! This dignity she maintains, although she be- 
comes means, because she voluntarily makes her- 
self means in virtue of a noble natural impulse — 
love ! 

Love, therefore, is the form in which the sexual 



THE SCIEXCE OE KIGIJIS. 



399 



impulse appears to woman. But love is, to sacrifice 
one's self for the sake of another not in conse- 
quence of a reasoning, but in consequence of a 
feeling. Mere sexual impulse should never be 
called love ; to do so is a vulgar abuse of language, 
calculated to cause all that is noble in human nature 
to be forgotten. In fact, my opinion is that noth- 
ing should be called love but what we have just 
now described. Man originally does not feel love, 
but sexual impulse ; and love in man is not an ori- 
ginal, but a coinnmnicated, derived impulse, name- 
ly, an impulse developed through connection with a 
loving woman ; and has, moreover, quite a different 
form in man to what it has in woman. Love, the 
noblest of all natural impulses, is inborn only in 
woman ; and only through woman does it, like 
many other social impulses, become the common 
property of mankind. The sexual impulse received 
this moral form of love in woman, because in its 
original form it would have canceled all morality 
in woman. Love is the closest point of union of 
nature and reason ; it is the only link wherein na- 
ture connects with reason, and hence it is the most 
excellent of all that is natural. The Moral Law re- 
quires that man should forget himself in the other ; 
but love even sacrifices itself to the other. 

Let me state it concisely : In an uncorrupted 
woman the sexual impulse does not manifest itself 
at all, but only love ; and this love is the natural 
impulse of a woman to satisfy a man. It is cer- 
tainly an impulse which urgently requires to be sat- 



400 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



isfied, but its being thus satisfied is not tlie satisfac- 
tion of the woman. On the contrary, it is the sat- 
isfaction of the man, and for woman it is only the 
satisfaction of Iie.r heart. Her only requirement is 
to love and to be loved. Only thus does the im- 
pulse which the woman feels to sacrifice receive 
that character of freedom and activity which it 
must have in order to be rational. Perhaps there 
docs not exist a man who does not feel the absurd- 
ity to turn this around and to assume in man a 
similar impulse to satisfy a need of woman ; a need, 
in fact, which he can neither presuppose in woman 
nor consider himself as its tool without feeling him- 
self disgraced to the innermost depths of his soul. 

Hence, also, woman in the sexual union is not in 
every sense means for the object of the man. She 
is means for her own end, to satisfy her heart ; and 
she is means for the end of the man only in so far 
as physical satisfaction is concerned. 

The attempt to hold up this m.ode of regarding 
woman as deceptive, and to say, for instance, " Af- 
ter all, it is only the sexual impulse which impels 
woman, under the deceitful cloak of love," is a dog- 
matic error. For woman sees no further, and her 
nature goes no further, than love ; hence woman is 
only love. It does not matter to woman whether 
man — who does not possess that female innocence, 
nor is intended to possess it, and who may become 
conscious of all that is within him — proceeds to 
analyze that impulse or not ; it suffices to woman 
that the sexual impulse is to a woman only love. 



THE SCIEXCE OF RIGHTS. 



401 



If women were men, it would certainly be other- 
wise. 

V. 

Woman, in making herself the means to satisfy 
man, gives up her personality ; and she receives 
this and her whole dignity back again only by thus 
making herself means to satisfy man from love for 
a particular one. 

If this sentiment ever should cease ; if woman 
ever should cease to regard in the man whom she 
satisfied the most lovable of all his sex, this 
thought alone would make her contemptible in her 
own eyes. If it were possible that he should ever 
not be in her eyes the most lovable of all his sex, 
then the presumption would be, that in giving her- 
self up to him she gave herself up only from a con- 
cealed natural impulse to give herself up to the 
first one who might come — a thought which would, 
doubtless, dishonor her in her own eyes. As sure- 
ly, therefore, as she thus gives herself up with 
full preservation of her dignity, she does it under 
the presupposition that her present feelings can 
never change, but that they arc as eternal as she is 
herself The woman who gives herself up once, 
gives herself up forever. 

VI. 

The woman who thus surrenders her personalit}'', 
and yet retains her full dignity in so doing, neces- 



402 



THE SCIEXCE OF KIGIirS. 



sarily gives up to her lover all that she has. For, 
if she retained the least for her own self, she would 
thereby confess that it had a higher value for her 
than her own person ; and this undoubtedly would 
be a lowering of that person. Her own dignity re- 
quires that she should give herself up entirely as 
she is, and lives to her choice and should utterly 
lose herself in him. The least consequence is, 
that she should renounce to him all her property 
and all her rights. Henceforth she has life and 
activity only under his eyes and in his business. 
She has ceased to lead the life of an individual ; 
her life has become a part of the life of her lover. 
(This is aptly characterized by her assuming his 
name.) 

VH 

The position of the man, meanwhile, is this : 
Since he may confess all to himself, and hence finds 
in himself the whole fullness of humanity, he is able 
to overlook his whole relation to woman, as woman 
herself can never overlook it. He, therefore, sees 
how an originally free being voluntarily submits 
itself to him with unlimited confidence, and that 
she makes not only her whole external fate, but 
also her internal peace of soul and moral character 
— at least her own faith in it — dependent upon 
him, since the faith of woman in herself and in her 
own innocence and virtue depends upon this, that 
she may never cease to esteem and love her hus- 
band above all others of his sex. 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



403 



As tlic moral impulse of woman manifests itself 
as love, so in man that impulse manifests itself as 
generosity. His first wish is to be master ; but if 
another being surrenders itself to him in perfect 
confidence, he lays aside all his power. For to be 
strong against the vanquished is fit only for the 
weak-hearted who can not oppose force to resist- 
ance. 

In consequence of this natural generosity, man, 
in his relation to his wife, is compelled, first of all, 
to be worthy of esteem, since her whole peace of 
mind depends upon his being held in esteem by 
her. Nothing so irrevocably kills the love of the 
wife as the meanness or infamy of her husband. 
Indeed, the female se.x will pardon in our sex every 
thing but cowardice and weakness of character. 
The ground of this is by no means a selfish calcu- 
lation upon our protection ; but solely the impossi- 
bility to submit to such men, as woman's destiny 
nevertheless requires her to submit. 

The peace of the wife depends upon her being 
utterly submitted to her husband, and having no 
other will than his own. Now, since he knows 
this to be so, his character of manly generosity, 
which he can not deny without denying his own 
nature and dignity, requires that he should make it 
as light as possible for her to do so. This he can 
not do by allowing his wife to rule him ; for the 
pride of her love consists in being and seeming to 
be submitted and not knowing otherwise. Men 
who submit themselves to the rule of their wives 



404 THE SCIENCE OE RIGHTS. 

thereby make themselves contemptible in the eyes 
of their wives, and destroy all their matrimonial 
happiness. He can do it only by attentively dis- 
covering her wishes, and causing to be done, as 
if it were through his own will, what he knows she 
Avould most gladly have done. It is not to be taken 
that he thus gratifies her notions and whims merely 
in order to have them gratified, but that he has the far 
higher purpose of thereby making it easier for her 
to love her husband always above every thing, and 
of thus retaining her innocence in her own eyes. 
It can not fail but that the wife — whose heart can 
not be satisfied by an obedience which calls for no 
sacrifice on her part — will seek to discover, on her 
part, the concealed higher wishes of her husband, 
in order to satisfy them at some sacrifices. For 
the greater the sacrifice, the more perfect is the 
satisfaction of her heart. Hence arises connubial 
tenderness ; that is, tenderness of sentiments, and 
of the whole relation. Each party wishes to give 
up its personality, so that the other one may rule 
alone. Each finds content only in the satisfaction 
of the other ; the exchange of hearts and wills be- 
comes perfect. It is only in connection with a 
loving woman that the heart of the man opens to 
love, to the love which confidingly surrenders and 
loses itself in the beloved object ; it is only in the 
tie which connects the wife with the husband that 
she learns generosity and conscious self-sacrifice ; 
and thus the tie unites them closer every day of 
their wedded life. 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



COROLLARIA. 

1. In the union of both sexes, and hence in the 
reahzation of man as a wJiolc, or as a completed pro- 
duct of nature, but also only in this union, is thefe 
to be found an external impulse to virtue. Man is 
compelled by his natural impulse of generosity to be 
noble and venerable, because the fate of a free being 
which surrendered itself to him in full confidence 
depends upon his being so. Woman is compelled to 
observe all her duties by her inborn modesty. She 
can not act contrary to reason in any manner, be- 
cause it would lead her to suspect herself of having 
acted so in the chief manner, and that she had 
chosen her husband, not from love — the most in- 
supportable thought to woman — but merely as a 
means to satisfy her sexual impulse. The man 
in whom there still lingers generosity, and the wo- 
man in whom there still dwells modesty, are open 
to the utmost degree of culture ; but both are on 
the sure path to all vices when the one becomes 
mean and the other shameless, as indeed experience 
invariably shows it to be the case. 

We have, therefore, also solved here the pro- 
blem : How the human race can be led to virtue 
through nature. This can be done only by restoring 
the natural relation between both sexes. Moral 
education of mankind is possible only from this 
point. 

2. Such a union as we have described is called a 
■marriage. Marriage is a ccviplete tmion of two 



4o6 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



persons of both sexes, based upon the sexual im- 
pulse, and having its end in itself. 

It has its ground in the sexual impulse in either 
sex, that is, for the external observation of the phi- 
losopher ; but it is not necessary that either of the 
persons who desire to conclude marriage should be 
conscious of it. A woman can never confess this 
to be the case. She can only confess the motive 
to be love. Nor is the continuance of marriage in 
any way conditioned by the satisfaction of this im- 
pulse ; for that end may vanish utterly, and the 
marriage relation may, nevertheless, continue in its 
whole intensity. 

Philosophers have hitherto considered it neces- 
sary to assign some end to marriage, and have spe- 
cified that end variously. But marriage has no 
other end than itself; it is its own end. The mar- 
riage relation is the true mode of existence of grown 
persons of both sexes, required even by nature. In 
this relation all man's faculties develop ; but out of 
it many, and among them the most remarkable 
faculties of man, remain uncultivated. Precisely 
as the whole existence of man has no relation to 
any sensuous end, so neither has its necessary 
mode, marriage. 

Marriage is a union between two persons — one 
man and one woman. A woman who has given 
herself up to one, can not give herself up to a 
second, for her whole dignity requires that she 
should belong only to this one. Again, a man who 
has to observe the slightest wish of one woman 



THE SCIENCE OF KIGIirs. 



407 



can not conform to the contradictory wishes of 
many. Polygamy presupposes that women are not 
rational beings like men, but merely willess and 
lawless means to gratify man. Such is, indeed, the 
doctrine of the religious legislation which tolerates 
polygamy. This religion has — probably without 
being clearly conscious of the grounds — drawn one- 
sided conclusions from the destination of woman to 
remain passive. Polyandry is utterly against na- 
ture, and hence very rare. If it were not a condi- 
tion of utter brutishness, and if it could presuppose 
any thing, it would have to presuppose that there 
is no reason and no dignity of reason. 

The union of matrimony is in its nature inse- 
parable and eternal, and is necessarily concluded 
as being eternal. A woman can not presuppose 
that she will ever cease to love her husband above 
all of his se.x without abandoning her personal dig- 
nity ; nor can the husband presuppose that he will 
ever cease to love his wife above all of her sex 
without abandoning his manly generosity. Both 
give themselves to each other forever, because they 
give themselves to each other wholly. 

3. Marriage is, therefore, no invented custom, 
nor an arbitrary institution, but a relation neces- 
sarily and perfectly determined through nature and 
reason in their union. Perfectly determined, I say, 
that is, only a marriage such as we have described, 
and absolutely no other union of both sexes for the 
satisfaction of the sexual impulse is permitted by 
nature and reason. 



4o8 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



It is not the business of the Science of Rights, 
but of the far higher laws of nature and reason to 
establish and determine marriage. To look upon 
marriage as merely a legal relation leads to impro- 
per and immoral conceptions. The reason why, 
nevertheless, it has been done, may be found, per- 
haps, in the consideration that marriage, like all 
that is determined by the conception of rights, is a 
living together of free beings. But it would be 
bad if this cohabitation had no higher ground, and 
no other regulative principle, than a law of com- 
pulsion. Marriage must exist before we can speak 
of any matrimonial rights, precisely as man must 
exist before we can speak of rights at all. The 
Science of Rights neither asks how matrimony ori- 
ginated nor where men came from. After mar- 
riage has been deduced, as has just now been done, 
the question iirst arises as to how far the concep- 
tion of rights is applicable to it, what law disputes 
may enter it, and how these disputes ought to be 
decided ; or, since we teach here an applied Science 
of Rights, what rights and duties the state has in 
regard to the relation of both sexes in general, and 
particularly in regard to the marriage relation. 
We now enter upon this investigation. 



LAW OF MARRIAGE. 



I. 

. The conception of personality involves the con- 
ception of all the rights of man, and hence it is 
the first and highest duty of the state to protect 
the personality of its citizens. A woman loses her 
personality and her whole dignity when she is com- 
pelled to submit herself to the sexual lust of a man 
without love. It is, therefore, the absolute duty of 
the state to protect its female citizens against this 
compulsion, a duty which is not at all based upon 
any particular arbitrary agreement, but upon the. 
simple nature of the case, and the immediate prin- 
ciples of municipal law — a duty as holy and in- 
violable as the duty to protect the life of citizens, 
for it is the internal, moral life of the female citi- 
zens which is thus to be protected. 

IT. 

Such a compulsion may be effected upon a wo- 
man by immediate physical force, in which case it 



410 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



is called rape. Of course, rape is a crime ; for it is 
a most brutal attack upon the personality of a wo- 
man, and hence upon all her rights. 

The state has the right and duty to protect its 
female citizens against this compulsion, and does 
so partly through the watchfulness of the police, 
partly by providing for its punishment. This crime 
evinces, first of all, brutality in the criminal, mak- 
ing him incapable of living among human society. 
Violence of passion is no excuse, but, on the con- 
trary, increases the crime. For a man who has not 
control over himself is a wild beast, and society, not 
being able to tame him, must not tolerate him in 
its midst. It evinces, moreover, an unlimited con- 
tempt for, and neglect of, all human rights. Some 
laws punish rape by death, and a legislation which 
recognizes the punishment of death certainly acts 
logically in prescribing it as a proper punishment 
for this crime. According to my system, I should 
send such men to the colonies for correction ; for, 
although their crime is equal to murder so far as 
the contempt of human rights is concerned, still it 
is not impossible for men to live together with such 
criminals. 

Restitution is, of course, impossible. For how 
can we restore to the unfortunate woman the con- 
sciousness that she may give up, at some future 
time, her whole untouched personality to the man 
she loves Nevertheless, restitution must be made 
so far as it is possible, and since the criminal can 
give to the offended woman nothing but money, 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



411 



and since she can receive from him nothing but 
money, I should vote that he be compelled to de- 
liver all his property to the woman he has violated. 

Unmarried women are, as we shall see hereafter, 
under the control of their paixnts ; married women 
imder that of their husbands. Hence, the parents 
or husbands will be the plaintiffs in such cases. In 
the former instance, if the parents should refuse to 
prosecute, the woman might do so herself, but not 
if the husband should so refuse ; for women are 
submitted to their parents only conditionally, but 
to their husbands unconditionally. 

III. 

Or such a compulsion may be effected upon 
the female citizen indifectly through the moral in- 
fluence of her parents or relations, in compelling 
her to consent to a marriage for which she has no 
inclination, either by means of harsh treatment or 
of persuasion. Harsh treatment is, of course, a 
legal offense ; but is persuasion also one ? In this 
case — although in no other possible case — persua- 
sion is an indictable offense. For whereas in all 
other cases you can properly ask, Why did you 
allow yourself to be persuaded t this question is not 
admissible here. The ignorant, innocent daughter 
has no knowledge of love, knows not at all the na- 
ture of the connection she is inveigled into ; she is, 
therefore, cheated, and used as a means for the 
ends of her parents or relatives. 

DD 



412 



THE SCIENCE OE RIGHTS. 



This kind of compulsion is the most dangerous, 
and far more insulting than violence, if not in form 
at least in its results. For, in the case of rape, wo- 
man, after all, regains her freedom afterward ; but 
in the case of a compulsion of this kind, woman is 
usually cheated for her whole lifetime out of the 
noblest and sweetest sentiment, that of love, and 
out of her true female dignity and whole character, 
and lowered completely and forever to a tool. 

It can not, therefore, be at all a matter of doubt 
whether the state has the right and duty to protect 
its young female citizens against this kind of com- 
pulsion, by severe laws and strict vigilance. The 
only question is. Who is to prefer the complaint, 
since the unmarried daughter stands under the 
authority of her parents, who are her legal guard- 
ians, and who will not be likely to prefer complaint 
against themselves The solution of this difficulty 
we shall find when we come to see that the daugh- 
ter escapes that parental authority the moment she 
marries. Hence, the law can very properly provide 
that a daughter shall become independent the mo- 
ment her parents propose marriage to her, and 
shall, therefore, be full master of her own rights in 
such case. 

The final decision of the state in such a case 
would be this : Parents who have abused their 
power for the purpose of enslaving their children 
during their whole lives, must be deprived of that 
power, and the children, together with their inheri- 
tance, must be placed under the protection of the 



THE SCIENCE OF KIGIJTS. 



State, lint since it might, nevertheless, happen, 
that young and inexperienced daughters, not accus- 
tomed to disobey parental authority, would rather 
submit than prefer public complaint, the state 
ought to retain the right to officially interfere on 
its own account in such cases, even when no com- 
plaint has been preferred. 

IV. 

It is quite different with the male sex. Firstly : 
No man can be compelled, in the true sense of the 
word, to marry, for it is against the nature of the 
thing. If he is persuaded, it does not signify much, 
for real love in man docs not precede, but follows 
marriage. But if he knows his own advantage, he 
will not permit that any woman should be com- 
pelled to marry him, since this would be a violation 
of his human rights, depriving him, as it would, of all 
prospects of a happy marriage, which he has a right 
to demand. " Love will come afterward," say many 
parents. It is certainly to be expected in the case 
of the man, provided he marries a worthy woman ; 
but in the case of the woman it is very uncertain ; 
and it is terrible to sacrifice and degrade a whole 
human life upon the risk of this bare possibility. 

The result of our argument is, that marriage must 
be an absolutely free act ; and the state, as the pro- 
tector of the rights of each individual, and particu- 
larly of the female sex, has the right and the duty 



414 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



to watch over this freedom of all matrimonial al- 
liances. 

V. 

This jurisdiction of the state over the freedom 
of all marriages involves, that the state must recog- 
nize and confirm all marriages of its citizens. 

Every marriage must have legal validity, that is, 
it must not infringe upon the rights of the woman, 
who must give herself up with her free will, and 
from love. A citizen must be obliged to prove 
this to the state, unless he wishes to render him- 
self suspicious of having used violence. This 
proof he can not well furnish otherwise than by 
causing the woman to declare the marriage to be 
her own free will before the law. This is done in 
the marriage ceremony. The " Yes !" of the wo- 
man declares in reality only that she has not been 
forced to the act. For all the other obligations 
which are entered into in the marriage ceremony 
are of themselves necessary results of marriage. 
The significance of the husband's " Yes !" we shall 
investigate later. That he is not compelled in the 
act appears clearly from his leading the woman to 
the altar. It is very proper and reasonable that 
marriages, being based upon and having their exis- 
tence only in morality, should be celebrated by 
clergymen ; but in so far as the ceremony has legal 
validity, the clergyman is an official of the state. 

It is beyond comprehension why the state, or the 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



clergy, should have the right to prohibit marriages 
between persons of a certain degree of relation- 
ship. If nature has provided a prejudice against 
such mixtures, the laws are superfluous ; but if 
there is no such natural disgust, then we should not 
produce it by our laws. It is jDlausible why some 
nations should believe such marriages to be an of- 
fense to their divinity, but that does not justify the 
state in prohibiting such marriages. Those who 
believe such to be the case will not conclude such 
marriages ; and those who do not believe it, or wish 
to risk it, will be punished by their own act if the 
belief of the nation is a true one. It is better to 
let the gods revenge their own insults. 

But, independently of all religious grounds, might 
there not be political reasons for considering cer- 
tain marriages as not allowable It seems to me 
that the best that has been said on this subject is 
to be found in Montesquieu. {De T Esprit des Loix, 
liv. 26, chap. 14.) It has always been the natural 
destination of the fathers to watch over the inno- 
cence of their children, and to keep them as pure 
in body and soul as possible. Incessantly occupied 
with this care, the doing of any thing which might 
seduce these was furthest removed from them. 
The same reason implanted a disgust against mu- 
tual intercourse in son and daughter ; and is also 
the source why marriages between cousins are pro- 
hibited. For in the first times of our race all chil- 
dren remained at home, and the children of two 



4i6 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



brothers considered each other as of the same 
father and mother. 

This preservation of chastity in families was 
under the care of the fathers of the family, but on 
no account an affair of civil legislation — as an actual 
violation of the rights of another family — or of police 
legislation — as merely facilitating such a violation. 
Hence, those who did not keep such care could 
merely be taught and educated by the more culti- 
vated people to do so, but could not be compelled 
by force of law to keep this care over the chastity 
of their families. Again : the grounded vanishes 
Avhen the ground vanishes, which in our instance 
is the living together of many relatives. So far 
as marriage between parents and children, and 
between brothers and sisters is concerned, this 
ground can never vanish in its generality. So far 
as the marriage of cousins, or of uncles and nieces, 
etc., is concerned, this ground rarely occurs in the 
present condition of mankind. 

Cohabitation is the real actualization of marriage ; 
for only through it does the woman submit her 
whole personality to the husband, and shows him 
her love, from which the whole described relation 
between married people emanates. Where this 
cohabitation has occurred, marriage is always to be 
presupposed ; where it has not occurred, any other 
union than a union of marriage has taken place. 
Hence, a mere engagement to be married, whether 
public or private, does not constitute a marriage; 
and the breaking off thereof is not to be considered 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



417 



as a divorce. It may entitle to damages. The in- 
nocent party must be reinstated in her previous 
condition so far as possible. Even the perform- 
ance of the marriage ceremony, if — as is conforma- 
ble to propriety — it precedes marriage, does not 
constitute marriage, but merely legally recognizes 
in advance the marriage to be culminated. 

VL 

Man and wife are intimately united. Their union 
is a union of hearts and of wills. Hence, it is not 
to be assumed at all that a law dispute can arise 
between them. The state, therefore, passes no 
laws regulating the relation of husband and wife, 
their whole relation being of a natural and moral, 
but not of a legal character. Both are one soul, 
and are presupposed to be as little likely to quar- 
rel with each other or to prefer suit against each 
other, as one and the same individual is supposed 
likely to quarrel with himself 

As soon as a dispute arises, the divorce has al- 
ready been accomplished, and it is only legalized by 
the judicial decree of divorce. 

VII. 

The conception of marriage involves the most 
unlimited subjection of the woman to the will of 
the husband ; not from legal, but from moral rea- 
sons. She must subject herself for the sake of her 



4i8 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



own honor. The woman does not belong to her- 
self, but to the man. The state, by recognizing 
marriage, that is, by recognizing a relation based 
upon something far higher than itself, abandons all 
claims to consider the woman as a legal person. 
The husband supplies her place ; her marriage 
utterly annuls her, so far as the state is concerned, 
by virtue of her own necessary will, which the state 
has guaranteed. The husband becomes her gua- 
rantee in the eye of the law ; or becomes her legal 
guardian. He lives in all her public life, and she 
retains for herself only a house life. 

The guarantee of the man is a natural conse- 
quence of the relation. Its limits we shall discover 
hereafter. Nevertheless, it might be advisable to 
have him so declare himself specially as the gua- 
rantee of this woman. The " Yes !" of the man in 
the marriage ceremony may be regarded as such a 
pledge, and obtains significance indeed, only when 
so regarded. 

VIII. 

The conception of marriage involves, that the 
woman who surrenders her personality shall at the 
same time surrender the possession of all her pro- 
perty and her exclusive rights in the state. The 
state, in recognizing the marriage, recognizes and 
guarantees the possessions of the wife to the hus- 
band ; that is, not as against the claims of tJie wife, 
for a law dispute with her is impossible, under our 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



419 



presupposition, but against the claims and attacks 
of all other citizens. The husband becomes, in so 
far as the state is concerned, the sole proprietor of 
his previous possessions, and of those which his 
wife held at the time of her marriage. 

These possessions of the wife have either been 
held by her before marriage, in her own name, and 
are, therefore, known to be hers by the state, in 
which case they are simply transferred to the hus- 
band ; or they are conferred upon her at the time 
of marriage by the parents, in which case the state 
is notified by the public transfer at the time. The 
absolute property, money, and valuables, the state, 
as we have shown before, takes no cognizance of ; 
nevertheless, for the sake of a possible future di- 
vorce, which necessitates repartition, as we shall 
see, it is necessary that this absolute property 
brought by the wife to the husband should also be 
known to the state, or at least that arrangements 
should be made whereby it can be proved in future 
cases of emergency. A sealed document or con- 
tract, deposited in a court of record, is sufficient. 

The conception of marriage also involves com- 
mon residence, common labor ; in short, living toge- 
ther. To the state both husband and wife appear 
as only one person ; what the one does is as valid as 
if the other had also done it. All public legal acts 
are performed only by the husband. 



420 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



■ IX. 

It needs no law of the state to regulate the rela- 
tions between married persons, or the relations be- 
tween them and other citizens. My views on laws 
concerning adultery, in so far as those laws are in- 
tended, or appear intended, to secure a property, 
the property of a man to his wife and of a wife to 
her husband, I shall express hereafter. Precisely 
as the state regards husband and wife as only one 
legal person, externally represented by the husband, 
and their property as one property, so each citizen 
also must regard them and their property. In law 
disputes citizens must deal with the husband ; none 
have a right to immediately appeal to the wife. 
The only consequence of this requirement is, that 
husband and wife are obliged to make their mar- 
riage publicly known, which, indeed, is necessary 
also for moral purposes, to prevent the annoyance 
illegal, or supposedly illegal, connectioTis might give 
rise to ; and which is, therefore, most properly made 
the duty of the clergy. 

X. 

Originally, that is, so far as his mere natural 
inclination is concerned, man, it is true, seeks to 
satisfy his sexual impulse. But when he learns, 
either before or after marriage, through reflection 
or through the teachings of others, particularly 
through actual intercourse v/ith esteemable per- 



THE SCIE.XCE OF RIGHTS. 



421 



sons of the female sex, (above all, from his molher,) 
that woman loves, and ought to give up her person- 
ality only from love, his mere natural impulse, will 
become ennobled. He will no longer desire merely 
to enjoy, but also to be loved. Knowing that wo- 
man makes herself contemptible by surrendering 
herself without love, and that lust in woman is de- 
grading, he no longer will wish to use her as mere 
means for sensual gratification. He would neces- 
sarily have to despise himself were he compelled 
to look upon himself as the mere tool for the satis- 
faction of an ignoble impulse. These principles 
govern all judgments respecting the effect of the 
wife's adultery upon the husband. 

Either such a wife, who gives herself up to an- 
other man, does so from pure and whole love. In 
that case, since love does not admit of partition, 
she has ceased to love her husband, and the whole 
relation to him is broken of itself. Moreover, she 
has degraded herself, although she pleads love, for 
her first connection with her husband must now 
appear to her, if she is susceptible to moral feelings, 
as an ignoble and animal connection from the rea- 
sons assigned before. If she allows the sham of 
her relation to her husband to continue, she de- 
grades herself still further to the utmost extent ; for, 
whether she does so from sensuous lust, or from 
some external purpose, she certainly uses her per- 
sonality as a means for a low purpose, and thus 
makes also a means of the husband. 

Or such a wife has surrendered herself to the 



422 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



Stranger from sensuous lust ; in which case it is to 
be assumed that she also does not love her hus- 
band, but merely uses him to gratify her passion, 
which is beneath his dignity. 

In either case, therefore, adultery destroys the 
whole matrimonial connection ; and the husband 
can not continue to keep the wife without losing 
his self-esteem. 

(This, indeed, has shown itself in the universal 
sentiment of all nations, even of the least civilized. 
A man who tolerates the dissipations of his wife is 
held in contempt, and a peculiar expression of igno- 
miny has been invented for him. The reason is, 
that such a man acts dishonorably, and shows him- 
self to be mean and ignominious.) 

Man's jealousy has the character of a contempt 
of the faithless woman. If it has any other cha- 
racter, as, for instance, that of envy and jealousy, 
man renders himself contemptible. 

X. 

Adultery on the part of the husband evinces 
either a low mode of thinking, v/hen the woman 
with whom he commits it surrenders herself, not 
from love, but from other motives ; or, when the 
woman gives herself up from love, it evinces the 
grossest injustice toward this woman ; for by ac- 
cepting her he obliges himself to fulfill all the 
duties of marriage, to be unlimitedly generous and 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



careful of her peace of mind, while he knows that 
he can not be so. 

Now, although it is low in a man to merely gratify 
his passion, still to do so docs not absolutely kill his 
character, as it does that of the woman. Neverthe- 
less, his wife, seeing him commit adultery for such 
a low purpose, might thereby be properly led to 
suppose that he considers her in a like manner, 
and that all his jDretended generous tenderness 
is merely sexual impulse — a supposition which 
would materially lower her in her own estimation. 
Even apart from this, it would certainly be painful 
for a loving woman to know that the same sacrifice 
she has made of herself to her husband has been 
made by another woman. (Hence the jealousy of 
woman has always a mixture of envy and of hatred 
against her rival.) It would thus become very 
probable that the wife's heart would be alienated 
from her husband ; at least, it is sure that her 
relation would be embittered by such conduct on 
the part of her husband, and hence it is not con- 
formable to the generosity which the husband 
owes to his wife. 

Whereas, therefore, the wife's adultery neces- 
sarily destroys the whole relation between husband 
and wife, the husband's adultery does not do so 
necessarily, but, nevertheless, may possibly destroy 
it. His guilt is as great as that of the faithless 
wife, perhaps even greater, for he evinces lack of 
generosity, that is, meanness. The wife may par- 
don ; and a noble, worthy wife certainly will pardon. 



424 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



But it is painful for the husband to be pardoned, 
and still more painful for the wife that she should 
have something to pardon. The husband loses 
the courage and power to be the head of the 
family ; and the wife feels pained that she can not 
esteem him to whom she has given herself Their 
relation becomes reversed. The woman becomes 
the generous, and the husband the submissive 
party. This is, indeed, shown in common experi- 
ences. A wife who knows and tolerates the 
dissipations of her husband is not despised, but, 
on the contrary, is held all the more in esteem the 
gentler and wiser she bears it. The presupposition 
is, therefore, that she ought not to seek legal 
redress. Whence does this opinion rise, which is 
so deeply rooted in men's souls 1 From our legis- 
lation, or from our own sex .'' It seems not, since it 
exists also among the women, who complain about 
that legislation. It has its ground in the funda- 
mental difference between both sexes, as pointed 
out by us. 

XI. 

In order to get a thorough view concerning the 
civil consequences of adultery, we must, above all 
things, investigate the relation of the state, and of 
legislation, toward the satisfaction of the sexual 
impulse outside of the marriage relation. 

It is the duty of the state to protect the honor of 
the female sex ; that is, to see that women are not 



THE SCIENCE OE RIGHTS. 



compelled to give themselves up to a man whom they 
do not love ; for this honor is a part, nay, the noblest 
part, of their personality. But each woman has also 
the right to sacrifice her personality, that is to say, 
there is no external legal ground against her doing 
so. Precisely as each person has an unlimited 
external — not internal, or moral — right to take 
away his own life, the state having no right to 
make laws against suicide, so also has woman 
unlimited external right over her own honor. She 
is externally free to lower herself to a brute, as 
the man is also externally free to think meanly and 
low. 

If, therefore, a woman chooses to give herself up 
from mere voluptuousness or from other motives, 
and if a man can be found who is willing to dis 
pense with love, the state has no right to pre- 
vent it. 

Strictly speaking, therefore — we shall see here- 
after how this may be limited — the state can pass 
no laws against prostitution and adultery, nor affix 
any punishment to these offenses. 

(Such, indeed, was the original rule in all Chris- 
tian states. Offenses of this kind were punished, 
not as violations of a civil law, but of a moral law, 
and hence were punished by the moral penal power, 
the church. Their chief punishment was always a 
church penance. We do not wish to discuss the 
propriety of this conduct here, since we do not 
speak of the church, but of the state. The 
Papal revenues from prostitutes, for instance, are 



426 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



a great consequence in inconsequence : for it 
is from the church that sanction must be obtained 
for this mode of Hfc, if it is to be at all permitted ; 
and the money which is paid is the penance paid 
in advance for sins to be committed thereafter.) 

XII. 

A relation, the end whereof is mere gratification 
of the sexual impulse, and which is based upon 
egotism, may be public and permanent, in which 
case it is called concubinage. Its publicity results 
from the living together of both parties in a suffi- 
ciently public manner, at least, to be known to a 
watchful police. 

The state, as we have seen, can not prohibit 
concubinage. But as the protector of women, the 
state must be satisfied that the woman has volun- 
tarily entered the infamous compact. This can 
be achieved only by the declaration of such a wo- 
man, which declaration, however, on account of its 
infamous character, must not be a solemn ceremony 
before the teachers of morality, as the marriage de- 
claration, but before such officers of the police as 
may be intrusted with affairs of this low character. 

The state must also know that this connection, 
although it has the external appearance of a mar- 
riage, is none. It has not the legal consequences 
of a marriage ; the husband does not become the 
legal representative of the woman. The tie can be 
dissolved whenever either party pleases, without 



THE SCI E AXE OF RIGHTS. 427 

any formality. The state has not guaranteed it ; 
nor does the state guarantee the conditions of the 
arrangement ; and hence, the woman obtains no le- 
gally valid claim upon the man. For such claims 
can be obtained only in a relation recognized and 
guaranteed by the state. True, the state can not 
prevent such a relation as this of concubinage, but 
neither can the state confirm it, since it is im- 
moral. If, therefore, the man refuses to conform to 
the obligations given to the woman, he certainly 
caps the climax to his meanness, and, it is to be 
hoped, makes himself universally contemptible ; 
but the woman can not substantiate her claim be- 
fore the law. The courts will refuse to entertain 
her complaint. 

XIII. 

A relation for the njere gratification of the sexual 
impulse may also be transitory and not public. 
Two cases are possible. 

Firstly, the woman may submit to the will of the 
man without receiving any payment, or promise of 
payment — neither money, presents, services, or any 
other kind of payment whatever, and without ex- 
pressly declaring that she does so from other mo- 
tives than love. In this case, it is to be assumed 
that she has done so from love ; for it is clear that 
she has not done it from motives of gain ; and this 
is all the more to be presupposed, because it is. 
against the nature of woman to do it from volup- 

E E 



428 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



tuousness, unless, indeed, it can be proved that she 
is known to have intercourse with every body. She 
having thus surrendered herself from love, the rela- 
tion between both persons is a true marriage rela- 
tion, although no specific promise to marry has been 
given. The only thing wanting is the public recog- 
nition of this marriage, that is, the marriage cere- 
mony. This the state, as the protector of woman's 
honor, owes to the woman. She herself is presup- 
posed not to have sacrificed that honor, and hence, 
the state can not sacrifice it either. The man may 
be compelled to wed her. He is not compelled to 
marry her, for he has already married her, but 
merely to publicly declare this marriage. If he 
evinces an insurmountable aversion, or if there arc 
other reasons which form obstacles to a continu- 
ance of marriage, (for example, perfect inequality 
of condition,) he may be divorced immediately after 
marriage, such divorce to be treated according to 
the general laws of divorce, which we shall speak 
of directly. 

Secondly, the woman who has thus surrendered 
herself to the will of a man may have had previously 
or afterward intercourse with other men, or she 
may have done so for money. In the latter case, 
it must be evident that she has placed that price 
upon her personality, and has given herself up only 
for the sake of such price. The fact that she has 
received presents on other occasions from her lover 
is no proof against her virtue. But if that proof can 
be furnished, she is dishonored, and has no claim 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



429 



upon the law for protection ; for the law can not 
protect an honor which does not exist, and which 
she has surrendered herself. 

Prostitutes, who make prostitution their sole 
business, can not be tolerated in a state, but must 
be sent out of its limits, (although their freedom to 
do with their body what they please remains unim- 
paired,) for the following very simple reason : The 
state must know on what each person subsists, and 
must extend to each person the right (license) to 
carry on a certain business. A person without 
business (means of support) is no citizen. Now, 
if a woman should assign prostitution as her means 
of support, she would properly be considered insane 
by the state. Propriavi tnrpitiidincvi confitenti non 
creditur is a just rule of law. It is, therefore, the 
same as if she had assigned no business ; and this 
is the reason why she can be expelled from the state 
unless she chooses to reform. 

In a properly arranged state such a case can 
not well occur. Each person is rationally taken 
care of If persons carry on another business than 
their legitimate occupation, the state ignores it, 
because it is not a public matter, and hence not 
subject to the law. The state knows nothing of 
such irregularities. The state does not guarantee 
to men the enjoyment of their dishonorable lusts, 
as it guarantees to all its citizens quiet and com- 
fortable highways. Hence, it is not within the pro- 
vince of the police to be supervisors over the health 
of the prostitutes ; and I confess that I consider 



430 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



such a supervision unworthy of a state. Whoever 
chooses to he dissipated must bear the natural 
consequences of such dissipation. Nor does the 
state guarantee any contracts which may be made 
concerning these matters. A prostitute can not 
prefer complaint in such things. 

XIV. 

Let us apply these principles to adultery. The 
state can no more prohibit it or punish it by law 
than any other illegitimate satisfaction of the sexual 
impulse. For, let me ask, whose rights are vio- 
lated by this offense The rights of the husband 
whose wife, or of the wife whose husband, commits 
adultery .'' Is conjugal fidelity then an object of 
penal legislation } Or has it not, in fact, its ground 
in a connection of hearts } But such a connection 
of hearts is free, and can not be compelled by penal 
laws ; and if it ceases, the compulsion of external 
fidelity — which compulsion alone is physically pos- 
sible — is both illegal and impossible. 

XV. 

If the relation which ought to exist between 
married people, and which constitutes the essence 
of marriage, consisting of unlimited love on the 
part of the woman and unlimited generosity on the 
part of the husband — if this relation is destroyed, 
then the marriage is already canceled. Married 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



fcoplc divorce themselves as they have married them- 
selves, out of their oivn free will. If the ground of 
this, their relation, is canceled, their marriage does 
not continue, no matter whether they remain toge- 
ther or not ; henceforth their cohabitation is in 
truth only concubinage ; their connection is no 
longer end in itself, but has an external end, usually 
some temporary advantage. Now, the law can re- 
quire no one to do that which is dishonorable, as 
concubinage is ; hence, it can not require persons 
whose hearts have been separated, to live together 
any longer. 

From this it would appear that the state has 
nothing to do in cases of divorce beyond making 
the divorce public, as it made the first marriage 
public. The legal results of the marriage which 
the state guaranteed having ceased, of course the 
divorce, which causes them to cease, must be 
equally made known to the state, and through it 
to its citizens. 

XVI. 

Nevertheless, most of our states assume to have 
legal jurisdiction over divorces. Are they utterly 
in the wrong t and if not, what is the ground of 
their right .'' 

The following : It may happen that the parties 
to be divorced call upon the state for aid, in which 
case the state has to judge whether it will extend 
it to them or not. The result would be, that the 



432 



THE SC/EyCE OF RIGHTS. 



state gives no other decisions in divorce cases than 
decisions as to the assistance it must furnish to the 
parties interested. 

XVII. 

Both parties may Iiave agreed about their separa- 
tion and the partition of their property ; in which 
case there is no dispute, and all to be done is, that 
they should declare their separation to the state. 
They have settled the whole matter among them- 
selves ; the object of their agreement is an object 
of their natural freedom ; and the state, strictly 
speaking, has not even the right to ask for the rea- 
sons of their se^Daration. 

Result: The consent of both parties separates 
the marriage legally, without any further investiga- 
tion. 

XVIII. 

One of the parties may not agree to the separa- 
tion. In this case the notification to the state is 
not merely a declaration of the fact of such divorce, 
but also an appeal for its protection, and hence the 
state may now take legal cognizance of the divorce. 

What can the party demanding the separation re- 
quire of the state If it is the husband who ap- 
peals for a divorce, the meaning of his request is : I 
want the state to drive my wife out of my house. 
If, on the contrary, the wife sues for a divorce, her 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



433 



appeal signifies : That, since the husband, as repre- 
sentative of the family, owns the house and can not, 
therefore, be driven out of it ; and since she, more- 
over, is willing to go, and possibly is also at liberty 
to go, the state should force her husband to provide 
for her otherwise. 

According to what law is the state to settle this 
matter ? 

XIX. 

Let us assume the case of a husband suing for 
civil divorce on account of the adultery of his wife. 
According to the above, it is against the honor of 
the man to keep up his relation with her ; indeed this 
relation is no longer a marriage, but a concubinage. 
But the state can not force a person to do any thing 
against his honor and moral feelings. It is, there- 
fore, the duty of the state in this case to rid the 
husband of his wife. What reasons, indeed, could 
the wife have to desire the continuance of this re- 
lation } Love is not to be presumed in her ; hence 
she must have other ends in view. But the hus- 
band can not allow himself to be made the tool of 
her ends. Even the church is not interested in 
persuading the husband to retain the adulteress and 
to pardon her, for the church can not advise him to 
do that which is dishonorable and immoral. 

Or let us assume that the husband sues for divorce 
on the plea that his wife does not love him. If she 
admits the plea, the state must grant the divorce ; 



434 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



for love only is the ground of a legal marriage, and 
where there is no love the relation is merely a con- 
cubinage. What reasons could a woman have, in- 
deed, to continue to live with a man whom she con- 
fessedly did not love ? These reasons could only 
be of an external character, and the man can not 
allow himself to be made their tool. If she does 
not admit the plea, the state can not proceed direct- 
ly, but must either wait to collect sufficient grounds 
for a divorce, or until both parties come to an agree- 
ment. 

The refusal on the part of the wife of what has 
been very ignobly called " connubial duty," is a 
proof of want of love, and in so far constitutes 
legal ground for a divorce. For love proceeds 
from this submission of the woman, and this sub- 
mission remains the constant expression of love. I 
have said in so yhras it proves this want of love ; for 
if sickness or some other physical obstacle can be 
proved, it does not prove want of love ; and in such 
a case the suit of a man for a divorce would be mean 
beyond all expression. But supposing he is so 
mean 1 In that case the state can not consent to 
be the servant of his meanness ; but neither is it to 
be hoped that the wife of such a man will oppose 
any obstacle to a divorce. 

If the wife becomes subject to a criminal prose- 
cution, the very facts of the case separate her from 
her husband ; for the state takes her away from him. 
In all civil cases the husband is the legal represen- 
tative of the wife ; but in a criminal, that is, an ex- 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



435 



clusivcly personal case, he can not be so. She is 
reinstated in her full personality, and thereby di- 
vorced from her husband. If she is found to be in- 
nocent, she returns under the jurisdiction of the 
husband. If the husband wishes to take her back 
again, after she has been found guilty and suffered 
punishment, he may do so ; but he can not be com- 
pelled to do it, for she has dishonored him. 

XX. 

Let us now assume that the wife sues for a di- 
vorce on the plea of her husband's adultery. We 
have shown that it is certainly possible, nay, even 
honorable, to the wife to pardon her husband in 
such a case. Hence, it is advisable to dissuade 
her, or to let her wait awhile. But if she insists, 
the divorce must be granted ; for she alone knows 
her own heart, and alone can decide whether the 
infidelity of her husband has rooted out all her love 
for him or not ; and it would be utterly unjust to 
force the wife to submit herself to her husband 
after her love has expired. 

The state, indeed, is generally obliged to grant a 
divorce to the wife, if she insists upon it. The fe- 
male sex must be favored by the law to this extent, 
for the reason that, although the suit of the wife 
may prove nothing against the husband, it proves, 
at least, the absence of love in her, and no woman 
should be forced to give herself up without love. 
But as women often do not know their own heart, 



436 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



and love more than they are aware of, it is advisa- 
ble, as we have said, to first use dissuasion or tem- 
porary separation, (from bed and board.) 

■ That a woman should plead impotency, etc., on 
the part of her husband is a dishonor to her sex, a 
sin against nature, and it may safely be called bar- 
barism, if the state — or the church — accepts such a 
plea. Experience confirms, moreover, that women 
are themselves ashamed of this plea, and usually 
put it forth merely as a pretense. 

A criminal investigation, to which the husband 
becomes subject, does not necessarily cause a di- 
vorce. The relation here is a very different one. 
Nevertheless, such an investigation is a very valid 
reason for the wife to insist on a divorce, since she 
can not esteem a criminal. Should she choose, 
however, to remain with him, to bear his fate and 
relieve it as much as the law allows, she is free 
to do so. 

Willful desertion, where the deserted party has 
not been made aware of it or of its grounds, is of 
itself a divorce, if used as a plea ; for the missing 
party must be regarded as having pronounced a 
divorce, and hence as consenting to it. 

XXI. 

The final question is : How shall the property be 
divided in cases of divorce 

As my principles on this subject differ from those 
usually entertained, I would ask my readers well to 
consider the grounds of my decision. 



THE SCIEXCE OF RIGHTS. 



437 



The wife, together with her personaHty, submits 
all her possessions to the husband ; and he can 
repay her love only by also submitting his person 
and freedom, as well as all his possessions, to her, 
with this difference, however, that he retains exter- 
nal control over the whole. The union of hearts 
necessarily involves union of possessions under the 
chief control of the husband. 

A divorce separates this union ; but when the 
ground ceases, so also does the grounded. It 
seems, therefore, at first sight, as if each party 
ought to be placed back again in its original posi- 
tion, and ought to receive back what it contributed 
to the common property. 

But there is this to be considered : both parties 
have for a certain time administered, enjoyed, in- 
creased, or diminished their property, presumptively 
imder one will and as one subject. The effect of 
this common administration can not be canceled ; 
is necessarily common to both, and remains com- 
mon to both. It is impossible to make a close cal- 
culation as to what amount of attention and care 
the one and the other party has stood in need of, 
etc. ; for, if it has been a true marriage, the needs 
of the one party were those of the other, and the 
gains of the one party those of the other. Both 
were but one legal person. It is as impossible for 
husband and wife to make such a settlement with 
each other or to sue each other as it is for one in- 
dividual to settle with or sue himself True, this 
relation is now canceled, but it was not canceled 



438 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



before, and the eftcct of that relation can not be 
annulled. 

Now, the external condition of this effect is the 
amount of property each party had before the mai'- 
riage. According to the ratio of the property thus 
contributed, the whole amount of property at the 
time of the divorce is to be redlvided, as effect. If 
the wife, for instance, contributed one third of 
the common property at the time of marriage, and 
the husband two thirds, then at the time of divorce 
the whole common property must be estimated, and 
one third given to the wife and two thirds to the 
husband. The wife does not get back the amount 
of her original third, but plus its gains or viimis its 
losses during the time of marriage. Other law pro- 
visions may have excellent political reasons, but 
they are not just. 

To whom the children are to be assigned we 
shall see hereafter, when we come to speak of the 
relation between parents and children. 



§ 3. 

CONCEKNING THE LEGAL RELATION OF BOTH SEXES 
IN GENERAL TO EACH OTHER IN THE STATE. 

I. 

Has woman the same rights in the state which 
man has ? This question may appear ridiculous to 
many. For if the only ground of all legal rights 
is reason and freedom, how can a distinction exist 
between two sexes which possess both the same 
reason and the same freedom 

Nevertheless, it seems that, so long as men have 
lived, this has been differently held, and the female 
sex seems not to have been placed on a par with 
the male sex in the exercise of its rights. Such a 
universal sentiment must have a ground, to discover 
which was never a more urgent problem than in 
our days. 

If we grant that the female sex, so far as its 
rights are concerned, has really been thus treated, 
it by no means suffices to assign as ground a less 
degree of mental and physical power. For women 
would reply : " Firstly, you men do not give us the 
same degree of culture which you extend to your 



440 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



own sex ; and secondly, that statement is not even 
true ; for if you will make a list of the men who 
are the pride of their sex, we can malce one of 
women, who will, justly estimated, be their peers 
in every thing ; but finally, even if this inequality 
were as you state it to be, it would on no account 
involve such a decided inequality of rights, since 
there is also among men a great distinction of men- 
tal and bodily powers, which does not involve such 
an oppressive inequality of rights." 

Hence, it will be necessary, above all things, to 
investigate whether women are really treated so 
badly and unjustly as some of them, and, still more, 
some uncalled-for advocates of their cause, assert. 

II. 

The question, whether the female sex has really 
a claim to all the rights of men and of citizens 
which belong to the male sex, could be raised 
only by persons who doubt whether women arc 
complete human beings. We do not doubt it, as 
appears sufficiently from the above. But the ques- 
tion may certainly be asked, whether and in hov^^ far 
the female sex can desire to exercise all its rights 
To facilitate the answering of this question, wc shall 
consider the several conditions of women. 

III. 

As a rule, woman is either a maid or married. 
If a maid, she is still under the care of her father, 



THE SCIENCE OF RICIirS. 



441 



precisely as the unmarried young man. Herein 
both sexes are perfectly equal. Both become free 
by marriage, and in regard to their marriage both 
are equally free ; or if there is to be a favor shown, 
it should be shown to the daughter. For she ought 
not even to be j^crsuadcd to marry, which may be 
permitted in the case of the son, as we have shown 
heretofore. 

If she is married, her whole dignity depends upon 
her being completely subjected, and seeming to be 
so subjected, to her husband. Let it be well ob- 
served, what my whole theory expresses, but what 
it is perhaps necessary to repeat once more em- 
phatically — woman is not subjected to her husband 
in such a manner as to give him a riglit of couipul- 
sion over her ; she is subjected through her own 
continuous necessary wish — a wish which is the 
condition of her morality — to be so subjected. She 
has \\\<i. pozvcr to withdraw her freedom, if she could 
have the will to do so ; but that is the very point : 
she can not rationally will to be free. Her relation 
to her husband being publicly known, she must, 
moreover, will to appear to all whom she knov^rs as 
utterly subjected to, and utterly lost in, the man of 
her choice. 

Her husband is, therefore, the administrator of 
all her rights in consequence of her own necessary 
will ; and she wishes those rights asserted and ex- 
ercised only in so far as he wishes it. He is her 
natural representative in the state and in the whole 
society. This is her public relation to society. 



442 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



She can not even allow herself to think for a mo- 
ment that she should exercise herself her rights 
in the state. 

So far as her private and internal relation in the 
house is concerned, the tenderness of the husband 
necessarily restores to her all and more than she 
has lost. The husband will not relinquish her 
rights, because they are his own ; and because, if 
he did so, he would dishonor himself and his wife 
before society. The wife has also rights in public 
affairs, for she is a citizen. I consider it the duty 
of the husband — in states which give to the citizen 
a vote on public matters — not to vote without having 
discussed the subject with his wife, and allowed her 
to modify his opinion through her own. His vote 
will then be the result of their common will. The 
father of a family, who represents not only his 
own but also the interests of his wife and children, 
ought indeed to have a greater influence and a 
more decisive vote in a commonwealth, than the 
citizen who represents only his own interests. The 
manner of arranging this is a problem for the 
science of politics. 

Women, therefore, do really exercise the right of 
suffrage — not immediately, however, in their own 
person, because they can not wish to do so without 
lowering their dignity, but — through the influence 
which results from the nature of the marriage rela- 
tion. This is, indeed, proved by the history of all 
great revolutions. They either emanated from, or at 
least were led and considerably modified by, women. 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



443 



Remark, 

If this must be admitted to be the case, what, 
then, do women and their advocates really demand ? 
What is it whereof women are deprived, and which 
must be restored to them ? The rights themselves ? 
They arc completely possessed of them, as we have 
shown. It can only be the external show of those 
rights. They not only want to accomplish, but also 
to have it known that they accomplished it. They 
not only want their ideas to be carried out, but also 
to have it publicly known, that they, even they, 
carried them out. They long for celebrity during 
life, and after death in history. 

If this alone is and can be their object in prefer- 
ring those complaints, then their complaints ought 
to be unhesitatingly rejected ; for they can not j^re- 
fer them without renouncing their whole female 
worth. The fewest, however, who prefer them, do 
so seriously. Most of them have been persuaded 
to utter such wonderful words, which they can not 
think without dishonoring themselves, by a few 
crack-brained men, most of whom have never 
thought sufficiently high of a woman to make her 
their companion through life, and who are therefore 
anxious to remedy the matter by having the whole 
sex, without exception, immortalized in history. 

Even the man who makes glory the chief or but 
one of the ends of his life, loses the merit of his 
acts, and sooner or later, also, that very glory. 
Women ought to be grateful that their position 

F F 



444 THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 

precludes the very suspicion of such a motive. 
But what is far more : by such thirst for glory 
women sacrifice the amiable modesty of their sex, 
vhich nothing can more disgust than to be put up 
/or a show. Ambition and vanity are contemptible 
in a man ; but in woman they are corrupting ; for 
they root out that modesty and self-sacrificing love 
for her husband, upon which her whole dignity 
rests. A rational and virtuous woman can be 
proud only of her husband and children ; not of 
herself, for she forgets herself in them. Add to 
this, that those v/omen who seriously envy men 
their celebrity, are deceived concerning the true 
object of their wish. Woman necessarily desires 
the love of some man, and, in order to attract it, 
she is anxious to attract the attention of the male 
sex. This is natural and very proper in an un- 
married woman. But those women calculate to 
increase the charms of their own sex — perhaps 
not having much confidence in them — by that 
which attracts the attention of men to men, and 
seek in celebrity merely a new means of captivat- 
ing men's hearts. If those women are married, 
their object is as contemptible as the means are 
unsuited to accomplish it. 

IV. 

If the husband can not or refuses to vote, there 
is no reason why the wife should not appear in his 
place and cast their common vote, but always as 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



445 



ihc vote of the Jnisband. (She could not cast it as 
her own without separating herself from her hus- 
band.) For the grounded extends no further than 
the ground ; and the ground why the wife could 
not vote was, because the husband voted for both. 
If he docs not, she can, therefore, vote. 

This furnishes us the principle applicable to wi- 
dows and divorced women, and to maids who are 
no longer under paternal authority and yet have 
never been married. All these classes of women 
are not subjected to a man ; hence there is no 
reason why they should not themselves exercise all 
civil rights precisely as men do. In a republic 
they have the right to vote, to apjjcar in court, and 
to defend their own cause. If from natural bash- 
fulness and modesty they prefer to choose a guar- 
dian, they must be permitted to do so, but there is 
no legal ground why they should be forced to 
choose one. 

V. 

Every citizen in the state is to possess property 
and to administer it according to his will ; hence, 
also, the woman who has no husband. This pro- 
perty need not be absolute property, money or 
valuables, but may also consist of civil rights or 
privileges. There is no reason why women should 
not have these. Woman can own land and carry 
on agriculture. Or she can carry on an art, or 
-a profession, or some commercial business. 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



n. 

Women are ineligible to public offices for the fol- 
lowing simple reasons : public officers are respon- 
sible to the state ; and hence must be perfectly free, 
and dependent always only upon their own will ; 
otherwise such a responsibility would be unjust 
and contradictory. Woman, however, is free and 
independent only so long as she has no husband. 
Hence the exclusive condition under which a 
woman might become eligible to office, would be 
the promise not to marry. But no rational woman 
can give such a promise, nor can the state ration- 
ally accept it. For woman is destined to love, 
and love comes to women of itself — does not 
depend upon her free will. But when she loves, it 
is her duty to marry, and the state must not form 
an obstacle to this duty. Now, if a woman, hold- 
ing a public office, were to marry, two cases are 
possible. Firstly, she might not subject herself to 
her husband so far as her official duties were con- 
cerned. But this is utterly against female dignity ; 
for she can not say then, that she has given herself 
up wholly to the husband. Moreover, where are 
the strict limits which separate official from private 
life Or, secondly, she might subject herself 
utterly, as nature and morality require, to her hus- 
band, even so far as her official duties are con- 
cerned. But, in that case, she would cease to be 
the official, and he would become it. The office 
would become his by marriage, like the rest of his 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



447 



wife's property and rights. But this the state can 
not permit ; for it must know the abiUty and the 
character of the person upon whom an office is 
conferred, and can not accept one chosen merely by 
love. 

VI. 

This fact, that women are not intended for pubh'c 
•offices, has another consequence, which the advo- 
cates of woman's rights put forth as a new com- 
plaint against our political institutions. For, very 
naturally, they are not educated for duties they will 
never have to perform ; are sent neither to colleges, 
nor to universities. Now they cry out, that men 
neglect their minds, and enviously and cunningly 
keep them in ignorance, and hold them removed 
from the sources of enlightening culture. We shall 
■examine this charge carefully. 

The learned man by profession studies not 
merely for himself; as student he studies, on the 
contrary, not at all for himself, but for others. If 
he wishes to become a preacher, or statesman, or 
doctor, he studies for the purpose of immediately 
applying what he has learned ; hence he learns at 
the same time the form, or the manner of applying 
his science. Or if it is his intention to become a 
teacher of future students in schools or univer- 
sities, it is also his intention to communicate again 
what he now learns, and to increase the stock 
■of his knowledge by discoveries of his own, so 



448 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



that culture may not come to a stand-still. Hence 
he must know Jiow to make these discoveries, and 
how to develop them out of the human soul. But 
this acquiring a knowledge of the form of science 
is precisely what they, women, can not make use of,, 
since they are to become neither teachers, preach- 
ers, doctors, or lawyers. 

For their own intellectual culture, men only re- 
quire the results of culture ; and these results women 
learn also in society : in each condition of society 
the results of the whole culture of that condition. 
That which they envy us is, therefore, the unessen- 
tial, the formal, the mere hull. By their position 
and by our conversation they are saved the trouble 
of working through this hull, and can receive its 
contents directly. They could not, indeed, make 
use of the form at all. Women are not habituated, 
and can not be habituated, to look upon the form as- 
means, because they could be accustomed to do 
so only by making use of the form. Hence they 
look upon it as an end in itself, as something noble 
and excellent in itself. This is the reason why 
really learned women — I do not speak of those who- 
reason purely through their common sense, for 
these are very estimable — are usually pedantic. 

To prevent my being misunderstood, let me ex- 
plain this further. It can not be maintained that 
woman is inferior to man in regard to talents 
of mind ; but it can certainly be maintained that 
the minds of man and woman have, by nature, a 
very different character. Man reduces all that is- 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 449 

in and for him to clear conceptions, and discovers 
it only through reasoning — provided, of course, his 
knowledge is a true conviction, and not a mere his- 
torical knowledge. Woman, on the other hand, 
has a natural sentiment of what is good, true, and 
proper. Not as if this were given her througli 
mere feeling, for that is impossible ; but when it is 
externally given to her, she has the faculty of judg- 
ing quickly through her feelings, and without clear 
insight into the grounds of such judgment, whe- 
ther it be true and good, or not. It may be said, 
that man must first make himself rational ; where- 
as, woman is already rational by nature. This is, 
indeed, clearly to be deduced from the fundamental 
distinction between woman and man. Her funda- 
mental impulse originally unites with reason, be- 
cause it would cancel reason unless it did so unite ; 
it becomes a rational impulse. And this is the rea- 
son why woman's whole system of feeling is ra- 
tional, and made to correspond to reason, as it were. 
Man, on the contrary, must first subordinate all his 
impulses to reason, through exertion and activity. 

Woman, therefore, is especially practical, and not 
at all speculative in her womanly nature. She can 
not and shall not go beyond the limit of her feeling. 
(This explains the well-known phenomenon, why 
some women have been known to become distin- 
guished in matters of memory, as languages, and 
even in mathematics, so far as they can be learned 
through memory ; and some also in matters of in- 
vention, in the gentler forms of poetry, in novel- 



450 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



writing, and even in tlie writing of history. But 
no women are known to have been philosophers, or 
inventors of new theories in the mathematical 
science.) 

A few words more concerning the passion of wo- 
men to become authors — a passion whicli is con- 
stantly on the increase among them in these our 
days. 

Literary labor can have only two ends in view: 
to make known new discoveries in sciences for the 
examination of the learned, or to communicate 
that which has already been discovered to the peo- 
ple at large by means of popular representations. 
We have seen that women can not make discove- 
ries. Popular writings for women, writings on fe- 
male education, moral books for the female sex, as 
such, etc., can certainly be most properly written 
l)y women ; partly because they know their own 
sex better than man ever can know it, (that is, if 
they have the gift, also, of rising in part above their 
sex,) and partly because such books are generally 
more read by women. Even the learned man can 
extend his knowledge of female character from 
such writings. Of course, the woman must write 
as a woman, and must not appear in her writings 
as a badly disguised man. 

I have presupposed, as it will be seen, that a wo- 
man will write only for her sex, and only for the 
purpose of being useful and to alleviate a discovered 
need of her sex ; but on no account for our sex, 
or from motives of vanity or ambition. Not only 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



451 



would her works have httle Hterary vaUic in the 
latter case, but the moral character of the authoress 
would also be greatly injured. Her authorship 
would be nothing but another means of coauctting. 
If she is married, she receives, through her literary 
celebrity, an independence which necessarily weak- 
ens and threatens to dissolve her relation to her 
husband ; or, if criticism is unfavorable, she will 
feel the reproof as an insult to her sex, and will em- 
bitter the days of herself and of her husband. 



8 4- 

CONCERNING THE LEGAL RELATION BETWEEN PA- 
RENTS AND CHILDREN IN A STATE. 

I. 

The original relation between parents and chil- 
dren is not merely determined through the concep- 
tion of rights, but chiefly through nature and mo- 
rality, precisely as the relation between husband 
and wife. Hence, our present investigation re- 
quires, as our previous investigation required, that 
we proceed from principles which are higher than 
those of law, in order to obtain, first of all, an ob- 
ject for the application of law. For this natural 
and moral relation may very possibly involve fur- 
ther determinations, which the conception of law 
has to regulate. 



452 



THE SCIEiYCE OF RIGHTS. 



The attempts to constitute the whole relation a 
simply legal one have failed by reason of their ab- 
surd presuppositions ; as, for instance, that children 
are property of the father, by reason of the act of 
generation being a species of manufacture, etc. 

II. 

The fruit generates itself in the womb of the 
mother as a part belonging to her. Her own 
health and life are conditioned by those of the fruit ; 
and, what is important above all things here, in the 
case of the mother, this condition is not merely so, 
as in the irrational animal, but is, moreover, knoivn 
to be so. It is not merely mechanically necessary 
that she should generate the fruit out of herself, 
and form it in her womb, but her own conscious- 
ness forces upon her considerate care of its pre- 
servation. 

In virtue of a law of nature, which is most as- 
suredly universal, the child is not born without pain. 
The moment of the child's birth is for the mother 
a moment of relief from pain, and hence, necessa- 
rily, a joyful moment. Joy connects the mother 
with the existence of the child. 

Even after the child is born, the organic tie which 
connects mother and child is not yet dissolved. The 
mother continues to furnish the food from her body, 
which she finds the same need to give to the child 
as the child to take it. 

(An organic body comprises all those parts, in 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



453 



one of which is an impulse to satisfy a need in the 
other, which that other jDart can not satisfy of itself; 
and the other of which is an impulse to satisfy a 
need of the first, which the first can not satisfy of 
itself And this relation I call the organic tie of the 
parts. Since it is only in the body of the mother 
that nature prepares the food which is most advan- 
tageous for the child, and since nature has provided 
no other way of relieving the mother of her milk 
than thi^ough the mouth of the child, an organic tie 
connects them even after they have become two 
separate bodies. It appears to me worth while to 
observe, how far this law of nature prevails also in 
the vegetable kingdom, since the young plant does 
not separate at once from the mother-body.) 

III. 

This law of nature, operating in the animal and 
vegetable kingdom, impels animals and plants to 
assist in the growth of external bodies. This im- 
pulse impels them necessarily ; the impulse and 
the activity required by it arise at the same mo- 
ment. But in intelligent beings there arises be- 
tween the impulse and the act required by it a 
third link — consciousness. The intelligence be- 
comes conscious of this natural impulse, as of a 
sentiment. This sentiment is the necessary pro- 
duct of the natural impulse, and succeeds it imme- 
diately ; or, to speak still more strictly, this senti- 
ment is the natural impulse in the intelligence. 



454 



THE SCIEXCE OF RIGHTS. 



The act required by the impulse or sentiment, how- 
ever, does not succeed in this necessary and imme- 
diate manner, but is conditioned by an appUcation 
of freedom. 

The natural impulse in animals and plants im- 
pelled them to take care of a strange body as of 
their own. How is this impulse likely to manifest 
itself in human intelligence Doubtless as a feel- 
ing of tJic needs of another body ; precisely as the 
mother feels her own needs. Such a feeling is called 
sympathy. Sympathy, therefore, is the form in 
which the natural instinct of the mother for her 
child manifests itself ; and this sympathy has the 
same end which the instinct of nature has — the 
physical preservation of the child. 

A mother is impelled by the sympathy which is 
an instinct of her nature to take care of the pre- 
servation of her child. Nature and reason com- 
bined have established this mechanism for the pre- 
servation of the child. Of course, a mother may 
resist it, since reason or freedom assists also in this 
mechanism, but only by becoming unnatural. Na- 
turally, no mother resists it. 
^ The question of rights does not occur yet at all. 
It is as absurd to say that the child has a right to 
demand this physical preservation from its mother, 
as it is to say that a branch has the right to grow 
on the tree ; and as absurd to say a mother must 
be compelled to preserve her child, as it is to say 
the tree must be compelled to bear the branch. It 
is a law of nature, although connected with reason. 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



455 



IV. 

There is an impulse in human nature generally, 
and hence, also, in man, to take care of the weak 
and helpless. This universal impulse will doubt- 
less speak in the father for his child ; but since it is 
a universal impulse, based upon the mere sight of 
helplessness, it will speak for every child, and there 
is no reason why a father should feel a particular 
preference for Jiis own child. Such a preference, 
however, we must discover ; and since the whole 
relation is a physical one, this love can only have 
a physical ground. But there is no physical tie to 
connect father and child ; and hence it is to be as- 
sumed that the father has no immediate love for his 
child. For the natural relation in the act of gene- 
ration does not involve it, since as such act, as 
generation of a particular individual, it does not 
occur in consciousness at all. 

The special love of a father for his child results 
originally — what its sources may be in our opinion 
as influenced by our social institutions, we do not 
investigate here — from his tenderness toward the 
mother. This tenderness makes all the wishes 
and desires of the mother his own, and hence, also, 
her wish to take care of the preservation of the 
child. Precisely as this is naturally the necessary 
duty of the mother, so does it now, by transfer, be- 
come that of the father also ; for both are only one 
subject, and their will is one. 

It is absurd to speak of the right of the mother 



456 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



to compel the father to maintain the child. The 
ground upon which it has been believed that such a 
right could be based is not sufficient. It was be- 
lieved that the mother might say to the father : 
" Thou art the cause of my having a child ; assume, 
therefore, the burden of taking care of it." J3ut 
the father can justly reply : " Neither I nor thou in- 
tended it ; nature gave the child to thee, not to 
me ; bear the results which have fallen upon thee 
just as I should have had to bear the results which 
might have fallen upon me." 

It would be different if both j^arties had arranged 
a contract about the maintenance of the child. But 
even in such a case the state must have guaranteed 
the contract to make it legally binding. 

V. 

The parents live together, and the child, recom- 
mended to the care of both by nature, must also 
live together with them. 

A natural impulse leads man to apprehend rea- 
son in all external nature so far as it is any way 
possible, and to treat objects (for instance, animals) 
as if they had reason. The parents will doubtless 
treat their child thus, and induce it to manifest free 
activit}'' ; and the child will assuredly, under such 
treatment, soon manifest reason and freedom. Ac- 
cording to the necessary conceptions of men, free- 
dom appertains to welfare, and hence the parents, 
who desire the welfare of their child, will doubtless 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



457 



give him freedom. But many a use of freedom 
might be detrimental to the preservation of the 
child's life and health, which are also objects of the 
parents. Hence, the parents will restrict that free- 
dom to such an extent that its exercise may not en- 
danger the preservation of the child. This is the 
first conception of education. The parents will edu- 
cate their child, because they both love it and wish 
to preserve it from danger. 

It can not be said that the child has a right to 
compel education, or that the parents are compelled 
to educate. Whether the state has any thing to 
•do with the matter will appear hereafter. 

VI. 

It is the universal moral duty of every moral and 
good man, to diffuse and promote morality every- 
where about him. Each free being, and hence, 
also, the child, is susceptible to morality. Living 
together with its parents, the parents, if they are 
moral themselves, will make use of all possible 
means to develop morality in the child ; and this is 
the conception of Jiighcr education. 

(We do not teach morality here, and hence we 
can not say, they shall do it ; but only, they will 
do it. We merely state natural and moral facts in 
■order to get objects for the application of the con- 
ception of rights.) 

This education involves the following two condi- 
tions : I St, the powers of the child must be deve- 



458 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



loped and cultivated for various uses ; and 2d, the 
morality of the child must be awakened. 

To attain the first object, the freedom of the 
child must be limited ; every use of this freedom 
which conflicts with the end of preserving the 
health and life of the child, and with the end of de- 
velojDing the powers of the child must be prohibit- 
ed, and every use thereof which tends to promote 
these ends must be insisted upon. It is only for the 
purpose of awaking the morality of the child, that 
its freedom must not be restricted ; for morality de- 
velops itself in man of itself, and can not be pro- 
duced by force or artificial measures. 

VII. 

Only the parents have a full knowledge of the 
end of the children's education ; not the children 
themselves, who are to be educated. Hence, only 
the parents, and not the children, can judge what 
measures are necessary for that end. They arc 
their own judges in their own case so far as the 
child is concerned ; they are sovereign and the 
child is unconditionally subject to them, in so far 
as they educate it. It is for their own conscience 
to tell them that they must use this sovereign pow- 
er only for the purpose of educating the child as 
they deem best. 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



459 



VIII. 

The possibility of a state depends upon the fact 
that its population remains pretty nearly the same 
numerically ; for all its measures of protection, tax- 
ation, etc., are calculated with a view to that specific 
number. If mortality should constantly decrease 
that number, the calculation would turn out wrong, 
disorders would ensue, and finally the state would 
utterly perish. The numerical equality of popula- 
tion, however, is conditioned by the fact that the 
dying-out generation is replaced by new citizens. 

Each citizen of a state promises, in the original 
compact, that he will promote, as far as lies in his 
power, all the conditions of the possibility of the 
state ; hence, also, the condition just mentioned. 
This he can best do by educating children who may 
grow up to realize various ends of reason. The 
state has the right to make this education of chil- 
dren a condition of the state-compact, and thus edu- 
cation becomes an external, legal obligation, which 
the parents owe to the state. 

I have spoken of the education of children gene- 
rally ; for the end of the state is realized by it. 
Now, it can not be left to the arbitrariness of the 
citizen what particular child he chooses to educate, 
since this would involve endless and unsolvable 
law disputes. A general law must be made to 
settle this matter, and the most rational provision 
is, that the parents should be obliged to educate 
their own children. 

GG 



460 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



IX. 

If the children are the offspring of a lawful and 
rational marriage, there is no difficulty about this. 
If, however, they come from a marriage which has 
not been legally solemnized at first, and which, 
after having been solemnized, was followed by an 
immediate divorce, or if they are the offspring of a 
concubinage, the care and education of the child 
devolves upon the mother as the one whom nature 
herself has intrusted with it ; for both parents — if 
separated — can not educate it. The father, how- 
ever, contributes his share to the child's mainte- 
nance and education in money. 

X. 

Infanticide committed by the mother is doubt- 
less a monstrous, unnatural crime ; for to commit 
it the mother must have silenced all the feelings of 
nature ; it is, however, no offense against the ex- 
ternal rights of the child. The child has no legal 
rights upon its mother. It is an offense against 
the laws of the state, which provide that all chil- 
dren must be educated, and in so far it is to be pun- 
ished. This crime belongs to the class of crimes 
which exhibit an unnatural brutality and savage 
disposition, and hence to that class for which the 
state must provide institutions of correction. In- 
fanticide is, therefore, to be punished with impri- 
sonment in such institutions until reform has taken 
place. 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 46 1 

(Some ancient republics, fearing too large an in- 
crease of population, especially of their iDrivileged 
classes, their real citizens, permitted the exposition 
of infants, particularly if they were weak ; and 
hence, indirect infanticide was allowed by law. 
To command it, no state has a right ; for it has no 
right to command any thing that is immoral or is 
a sin against nature. Nor has the state even a 
right expressly to permit it ; for such a permission is 
immoral, and dishonors the state and its citizens. 
But if a state tacitly permits it, no legal objection 
can be raised ; for it is not the state's business to 
take positive care of the morality of its citizens ; 
and new-born children have no external rights ex- 
cept in so far as the state guarantees them their 
life, which the state is bound to do only so far as 
the possibility of its own preservation depends 
upon it.) 

XL 

The state has, therefore, the right to provide 
that children are kept alive, fed, clothed, and raised 
among men ; for these are exclusive conditions of 
their becoming eventually men and citizens. 

XIL 

The state makes it the duty of parents to edu- 
cate their children. Hence, the state necessarily 
guarantees to them the conditions of the possi- 



4(j2 the science of rights. 

bility of such education. One of these conditions 
is, that no other citizen shall be allowed to take 
their children from them in order to educate them. 
Hence, the state necessarily guarantees to all parents 
the exclusive right to keep their own children. If a 
law dispute arises, the law must decide in favor of 
the true parents. 

Education requires also a fixed plan and uni- 
formity of principle, according to which the chil- 
dren are to be educated. This plan would be dis- 
turbed if strangers had a right to interfere, and to 
influence the children. Complaint can be preferred 
against such interference, and the law must decide 
in favor of the true parents. 



XIII. 

If the parents are moral, the education of their 
children is to them a matter of conscience. They 
wish to educate them as morally good as possible ; 
but each one necessarily considers his own princi- 
ples the best and most correct ; for if he did not, 
and retained them, he would act immorally. Now, 
the state can not interfere in matters of conscience. 
The state itself can not, therefore, interfere in edu- 
cation. The state has the right to establish public 
schools ; but it is for the parents to decide whether 
they will take advantage of them or not. The state 
has no right to compel them to do so. 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



463 



XIV. 

Neither the state, nor any citizen, nor the child 
itself — since it is the object of education — has a 
right to decide upon the principles which are to 
govern the education of the children ; hence, the 
parents are the sole judges. No law dispute can 
arise between children who are being educated and 
their parents. The parents are, in this matter, the 
final appeal, and sovereign. The state has no more 
right to regulate this relation than that between 
husband and wife by law, 

XV. 

Hence, the control of parents over children is 
based solely upon the parents* duty to educate them. 
This duty of education is established by nature 
and is guaranteed by the state. To consider the 
•children as property of the parents is absurd. 

XVI. 

The state has the right to watch that the child is 
educated ; hence, also, the right to prevent any use 
of the child which would evidently annul all educa- 
tion. The state can not, therefore, allow children 
to be used as property ; for example, a son to be 
sold into slavery. 



464 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



XVII. 

Only free persons are responsible before the law. 
Children are not free, for they are under the guar- 
dianship of their parents. Their father — as equally 
the representative of their mother — is thus their 
legal guardian. They have no rights for him to 
defend, since they are not yet themselves citizens ; 
but when they have committed any trespasses, the 
father is justly held responsible ; for the children 
are under his supervision, and he ought to have 
prevented them from committing such trespasses. 

Children can be subjected to no public punish- 
ment ; for they are not subject to the penal laws of 
the state. They are subject only to the penal laws 
of their parents, who punish them as they see fit. 

XVIII. 

The only ground for the control of jDarents over 
their children is the need of education. When the 
ground ceases, so does the grounded. When the 
education is completed, the child becomes free. But 
only the parents can decide when it is completed, 
since only they have preestablished its final end. 
If they hold that the child is sufficiently educated, 
they voluntarily give it freedom. They should, in- 
deed, increase the freedom of the child constantly 
during the progress of education, as one of the 
rules of such education, and not as a right which 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



the child has ; and when they cut the last tie, the 
child is wholly free. 

Or this tie may be cut when it appears, from the 
nature of the case, that the end of education is ac- 
complished. The general end thereof is the utihz- 
ing of our powers for rational jDurposes, and the 
external judge of the matter is the state. True, 
the state can not directly liberate the children ; for 
that would be interfering with their education ; but 
it can do so indirectly, by giving to the son a civil 
office or some other civil right or privilege. Such 
an office liberates the child from parental authority. 

Or, finally, the education, and hence, the subjec- 
tion of children may be annulled, by making it, 
from the nature of the case, no longer possible. 
This occurs in marriage. The daughter is now un- 
limitedly subjected to the will of her husband, and 
can therefore no longer be subjected to the will of. 
her parents. The son has now to care for the hap- 
piness of his wife with unlimited tenderness, and 
can not, therefore, allow himself to be disturbed in 
this care by the will of his parents. 

But precisely because marriage puts an end to 
education, and because parents alone have a right 
to decide when the education is finished, the pa- 
rents must also have the right to refuse their 
consent to the marriage of their children for a time, 
or to postpone their marriage. 

They have not, however, the right to prohibit 
marriage generally to their children, nor to choose 



466 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



for them in marrying, from the reasons stated here- 
tofore. 

XIX. 

Husband and wife have their property in com- 
mon. Children have no property. Where should 
they get it } Their parents owe them food and 
clothing, as means of education ; and it is a duty 
they owe to the state, and which the state may en- 
force, to thus provide for their children. 

But children work, it is said, and thus acquire 
property. This would be correct under the presup- 
position, which we have shown to be wrong, that 
formation gives title to property. But the object 
of this labor is merely to exercise their powers for 
educational purposes, and hence, the parents very 
properly take hold of its results as their property. 
The child can do nothing without the will of the 
parents ; it can not, therefore, acquire property 
without their consent. Or does any one pretend 
that the right of property is founded upon a con- 
tract with the parents Only free persons can 
make a contract ; but children are not free in their 
relation to parents. 

XX. 

Each independent citizen must have property of 
his own, and must be able to tell the state what he 
lives from. Hence, the state can justly demand of 
the parents, who allow a child its full freedom, that 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



467 



they shall give a certain amount of property to it, 
or, to use a very characteristic word, that they shall 
endow it. How much they ought to give it depends 
upon their own discretion. 

When two persons marry, the parents of both 
parties must agree as to whether both shall receive 
something, or only one of them, and what the 
amount shall be. It is no business of the state 
who furnishes the property, provided the new family 
can subsist. 

XXI. 

It is altogether arbitrary with the parents wheth- 
er one of the children receives more than the other 
or not. It may be unfair, but it is not illegal. What 
legal ground could the child have to complain } All 
that it gets, it gets through the voluntary kindness 
of its parents. 

XXII. 

When the parents die, their rights in the sensu- 
ous world, and hence, also, their rights to property, 
utterly cease. It depends altogether upon the posi- 
tive legislation of a state whether laws of inherit- 
ance shall be established or whether parents shall 
have the right to make wills ; and if so, to what ex- 
tent they may will away their property to strangers, 
•etc. These are questions purely of expediency, and 
not of a priori law. 



468. 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS, 



XXIII. : 

We have deferred to reply to the question, To whom 
children are to be a.ssigned when their parents are 
divorced ? because the reply was not well jDossible 
before we had a thorough insight into the relation 
between parents and children. 

Since parents have unlimited control over their 
children, parties who are being divorced must have, 
the right to come to an agreement about it among; 
themselves. The state has nothing to say in the 
matter, provided the education of the children is 
secured. It is only when the parents can not agree 
that the state decides. Only two grounds of such 
a dispute among parents are thinkable. Either, 
neither of them wishes to undertake the care of the 
children, or both wish to retain the children. 

In the former case the decision is this : The duty 
to take care of the children is immediate duty only 
for the mother, and for the father it is only a medi- 
ate duty derived from his love for the mother. The 
latter, and hence the natural, ground of his paternal 
tenderness having ceased, the children are to be 
returned to the personal care and attention of the 
mother ; but the father must contribute to their 
maintenance ; and the state has to see that he 
does so according to his means. 

In the second case, the decision is this : The legal- 
ly grounded object of the state is, that the children 
shall be educated in the best possible manner. As- 
a rule, the mother is the most proper person to edvi- 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



469 



cate daughters, and the father the most proper per- 
son to educate sons. General laws can take cog- 
nizance onl}'^ of such rules ; and hence the mother 
receives the daughters and the father the sons. 

As a matter of course, the child generated in 
adultery is not to be maintained by the husband, 
but by its true father. 



SECOND APPENDIX 

TO THE 

SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



INTERNATIONAL 

AND 

COSMOPOLITAN LAW. 



§ I. 

CONCERNING INTERNATIONAL LAW. 
I. 

Each individual, as we have shown, has the right 
to compel each other single individual to enter into 
a legal relation (state) with him or to remove from 
his sphere of activity. If one of the two is already 
a resident of a state and the other one not, then the 
former compels the latter to become a citizen of 
his state. If neither is as yet a resident of a state, 
"both unite to form at least the beginning of a state. 
From this it follows, that whosoever is not yet a /./ 
citizen of a state can be legally compelled, by the 
first state which chooses to do so, either to submit 
to its laws or to remove from its limits. 

The natural result of this proposition would be 
gradually to unite all men who inhabit the earth 
under one single commonwealth. 

II. 

. But it is equally possible that separate masses of 
men, unknown to each other, may gather together 
• at various places of the earth and unite themselves. 



474 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



This place has such requirements, and another place 
has other requirements, and these requirements are 
alleviated in each case without either party becom- 
ing aware of the requirements of the other. In 
this manner various states would arise on the earth. 

It is a proof that the state is not an arbitrary in- 
vention, but is established by nature and reason, 
when we actually find that, in places where men 
have lived together for a time and have become edu- 
cated, states are erected, although the people in the 
one such place know not that the same thing has 
been done in other places. 

The surface of the earth being, moreover, sepa- 
rated by seas, rivers, and mountains, this formation 
of separate states became necessary likewise from 
geographical reasons. 

III. 

The people in these several states know not of 
each other ; and hence are in no true legal relation 
to each other, since the possibility of a legal relation 
is conditioned, as we have seen, by actual and con- 
scious reciprocal influence. 

IV. 

Two citizens from these different independent 
states meet each other. Each one will require of the 
other a guarantee for his security, and has a per- 
fect right to do so ; which security consists in their 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



475 



both subjecting themselves to the chief government. 
But each one has a chief government ; hence, each 
one has the same right to make the same request, 
and their rights thus cancehng each other, neither 
party has a right to make it. 

Nevertheless, they must give each other mutual 
guarantee. Since this can not be done in the man- 
ner suggested, how^ can it be done Both are to- 
submit to a common judge ; but each one has his. 
particular judge. Hence, their judges must agree 
among themselves, and must become the One com- 
mon judge of both in matters which concern both ; 
that is, both their states must mutually agree to pun- 
ish the injury done by one of its citizens to a citizen 
of the other country, as if it had been inflicted upon 
one of its own citizens. 

COROLLARIA. 

1. The whole relation of states is based upon the 
legal relation of their citizens. The state in itself 
is nothing but an abstract conception ; only the 
citizens, as such, are actual persons. Again : this 
relation is based expressly upon the law, necessity, 
that citizens who meet each other in the sensuous 
world must guarantee security to each other. 
Hence, only those states are related to each other 
which are adjoining. How states, separated by 
space, may nevertheless be related to each other, 
we shall soon see. 

2. This relation of the states consists in their 

HH 



47^ T^^^ SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 

mutually securing to each other the security of 
their citizens. And the formula of the contract is 
as follows : I agree to hold myself responsible for 
all the damage which my citizens may do to your 
citizens, provided you will make yourself responsi- 
ble for all the damage which your citizens may do 
to mine. 

3. Such a compact is not involved in the original 
.state organization, but must be specially concluded, 
.and must be made publicly known to all citizens. 
The citizen satisfies all the conditions of the state 
compact by simply refraining from violating the 
rights of his fellow-citizen ; and it is only in virtue 
■of this special compact that he is obliged by law 
.also to respect the rights of citizens of adjoining 
states, and that he makes himself liable to punish- 
ment if he does not do so.* 

V. 

Such a compact of states necessarily involves 
their mutual recognition, since this is the presuppo- 
.sition of the possibility of such a compact. Both 
states accept each the guarantee of the other for its 
citizens, and hence assume each that the other has 
a legal constitution and can be held responsible for 
its citizens. 

* (It is sufficiently clear from what we have before said regarding 
the confederate form of government as applicable to the whole 
earth, how this doctrine of international law must be modified to 
become absolutely rational. — Translator's Ricmark.) 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



477 



Each state has, therefore, the right to judge about 
the legahty of another state, with the citizens 
whereof its own citizens are hkely to come into 
contact. But this right of judgment extends only 
to the external, not to the internal, administration 
of such state. 

This is what is signified by the independence of 
states. 

VI. 

Each people, which does not live in a condition 
of nature, but has a government, no matter how 
constituted, has a right to compel its recognition 
from all adjoining states. The proof of this is in- 
deed contained already in the preceding paragraph. 
Not to recognize a state signifies, to proclaim it? 
citizens as not possessing any legal form of govern- 
ment ; and this involves the right to subjugate 
them. A refusal to recognize is, therefore, suffi- 
cient ground for war. 

States are necessarily independent of each other. 

VII. 

When a people has no government, and hence 
does not constitute a state, the adjoining state has 
a right either to subjugate it under its own juris- 
diction, or to compel it to establish some form of 
government, or to expel it from its neighborhood. 
The reason is, that he who can not offer to the 



478 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



Other any guarantee for the security of his rights, 
has himself no rights. Such a people, therefore, 
has no rights at all. 

(Let no one fear that this proposition is favorable 
to ambitious nations. A people such as we have 
described most likely does not exist anywhere, and 
we have established this theory more to complete 
our argumentation than for the sake of its applica- 
tion. If a people has only a leader in war, it has 
doubtless a government. The French Republicans 
whipped the armies of the Coalition again and 
again, while the latter doubted whether the Repub- 
licans had any government, and were asking, " With 
whom shall we conclude peace " Why did they 
not ask those who had beaten them the name of 
their commander in battle ? Perhaps the men who 
had issued the command to beat the Coalition could 
also have given the command to cease beating them. 
At present, when they have been sufficiently beaten, 
the Coalition has finally hit upon this idea, and has 
thus discovered that the French have, after all, some 
kind of government.) 

VIII. 

Adjoining states guarantee to each other the 
rights of property of their citizens. Hence, they 
must have come to some agreement as to the limits 
of these rights. These limits have already been 
fixed in each state by the property compact of all 
citizens; and the treaty between the states only 

•V . 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



479 



adopts those limits. Thus, what before concerned 
only the citizens of the one state has become obli- 
gatory, likewise, upon those of the adjoining states. 
Possible disputes must be settled by compromise, 
.•since there are no a priori legal grounds why one 
piece of property should belong to this citizen and 
aiot to the other. Hence, the first condition of a le- 
gal relation between two states is the fixing of their 
boundaries ; and not only of the boundaries of the 
land itself, but also of certain rights, as, for instance, 
•of fishing, hunting, navigation, etc. The bounda- 
ries of the property of their citizens becomes for 
the states the boundaries of those states. 

IX. 

In this treaty both states are perfectly equal. 
What the one state does to protect the citizens of 
the other state from damage, the other must also 
do in regard to the former ; but neither is obliged 
to apply greater care than the other. Hence, it is 
very possible that in some states the rights of their 
own citizens are more protected than those of 
strangers — perhaps because the other states re- 
fused to afford sufficient protection on their side ; 
nay, it is even possible that the property of stran- 
gers from one adjoining state may be better protect- 
ed than that of strangers from another state, be- 
cause the other state, on its side, affords more pro- 
tection. The whole relation is one which is based 
jpurely upon an agreement. 



480 THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



X. 

Through this compact the states which are a 
party to it attain the right of mutually watching 
each other, to see whetlier its provisions are con- 
formed with and carried out or not. The ground 
of this right is clear enough. The agreement is 
vaUd only if both parties conform to it ; hence 
each party must have a right to know whether the 
other has complied with it or not. 

This watch can be realized only in the state which 
is watched. Hence the states send ministers to 
each other to conduct this surveillance. It is true, 
states also send agents to conclude treaties ; but 
the office of such agents is partly temporary and 
partly accidental. To distinguish both, the latter 
are usually called ambassadors. The original cha- 
racter, however, of a permanent, resident minister 
( charg^ d'affaires ) consists in keeping watch as to> 
whether the state to which he has been sent con- 
forms to its obligations or not, and perhaps in 
reminding it of its duties. Of course, he has na 
right to interfere in the internal arrangements of 
such a state, since his own state has not even the 
right to interfere in them. 

XI. 

Holding this office of watching the conduct of 
the state to which he has been sent, of course the- 
minister can not be dependent upon it, since, other- 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 481 

wise, he would have to render it obedience, and 
since thus the object of his mission would not be 
accomplished. Hence, so long as he preserves the 
character of mere minister, he is subject only to the 
authority of his own government. He is, for the 
state to which he has been sent, a holy and invio- 
lable person ; he represents his own independent 
state. Taxes, of course, he has none to pay ; for 
taxes are a contribution to the support of a govern- 
ment ; but he is not a citizen of this government. 
If the minister steps beyond the limits of his offi- 
cial duties, either by seeking to acquire an influence 
in the internal affairs of such a state or by creating 
disturbances through bad behavior otherwise, the 
state which has received him does not become his 
judge, but may send him back and demand satisfac- 
tion. 

XH. 

If the treaty between both states is clearly and 
plainly written — and since it only comprises few 
matters, it is easy to make it clear, and any indefi- 
niteness would at once indicate some evil intention 
not to observe its provisions — error and injustice 
are almost impossible. Nevertheless, violation of 
the treaty certainly gives a right to declare war, 
precisely as a refusal to recognize a state gives such 
right. For in either case, the state which is thus 
made war upon, shows that a legal relation with it 
is impossible, and hence that it has no rights at all. 



482 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



XIII. 

The right of war, like all rights of compulsion, is 
infinite. The opponent has no rights because he 
refuses to recognize the rights of the war-making 
power. True, he may afterward sue for peace, and 
promise to recognize those rights. But how shall 
the other party be convinced that he is in earnest 
and is not merely looking out for a better oppor- 
tunity to subjugate him Hence, the natural end 
of war is always the annihilation of the opponent ; 
that is to say, the subjugation of his citizens. True, 
a peace (or rather merely an armistice) may be con- 
cluded, because one party or both parties are too 
much weakened ; but mutual distrust remains, and 
the object of subjugation remains also. 

XIV. 

Only the armed powers of both states carry on 
the war, not the unarmed citizens ; hence, the war 
is not made upon them. That part of a state's ter- 
ritory which its troops no longer protect is an acqui- 
sition of the conqueror, the object of the war be- 
ing the subjugation of the hostile state ; and the 
conqueror can not plunder his own citizens or de- 
vastate his own possessions without acting irration- 
ally, and hence, also, against the laws of war. As 
soon as the conqueror has driven away the enemy's 
armed troops, the unarmed citizens of the enemy 
are his subjects. That part of the state's territory, 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



483 



"however, which its troops still protect, is not sub- 
ject to the enemy. The former part the enemy 
•can not devastate, because it is its own ; the latter 
part he can not devastate, because it is physically 
impossible, being held by fts troops. 

The usual manner of carrying on war is certainly 
irrational and barbarous. The conqueror devastates 
the subjugated provinces in order to plunder them 
in all haste, as much as possible, and to leave as 
little as possible to the enemy. He does not, 
therefore, calculate upon keeping possession of 
them. But why, then, does he carry on war t 

The disarmed soldier is also no longer enemy, 
but subject. Our mode of considering him as a 
prisoner of war and keeping him for exchange, is 
an arbitrary arrangement of modern policy, which 
has no thorough, independent object in prosecuting 
war, and hence at all times considers the possibility 
of treating with the enemy. 

The object of war is not to kill, but merely to 
drive away and disarm the armed force which pro- 
tects the country and its citizens. In a hand-to- 
hand fight, one man kills another to escape being 
killed himself, and hence, in virtue of the right of 
self-defense, but not of aity right confa'red by the 
state to kill the enemy ; which right, indeed, no state 
has, and hence can not, either, confer. In the same 
manner we may regard the modern manner of con- 
ducting war by means of cannons, guns, etc. It is 
not the object to kill with the bullets, but merely 
■>to drive the enemy away from the place covered by 



484 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



the cannons or guns. If, nevertheless, the enemy 
remains, it is his own fault if the balls kill him. 
(Reason would seem to require that we should al- 
ways advise the enemy when we intend to open a 
fire upon his posts ; precisely as we first send a de- 
mand to fortresses to surrender before opening fire 
upon them.) 

The only thing in our modern mode of warfare 
which is downright illegal, is the sharp-shooters, who- 
from hidden places, where they are safe themselves, 
cold-bloodedly take aim upon a man as upon a tar- 
get. With them murder is end. (The first use of 
sharp-shooters, by Austria against Prussia, did, in- 
deed, create universal indignation throughout Eu- 
rope. We have now become accustomed to it, and 
imitate it ; but it is not to our honor.) 

XV. 

The aggrieved state has a perfect right, as we have 
seen, to make war upon the unjust state, until it has 
subjugated it and united its citizens with its own. 
War would, therefore, seem a sure and legal means 
of securing the legal relation between the several 
states, if it were only possible to invent a contri- 
vance by means whereof the party which has the 
just cause at hand would always be victorious. 
But since every state has not the same amount of 
strength as of right, war may promote as often, if 
not oftener, the cause of injustice as the cause of 
justice. 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



But war is the only means to compel a state ; and 
hence the problem must be to arrange matters in 
such a way that the just cause will always be vic- 
torious in war. Strength arises from the masses ; 
hence a number of states must confederate among 
themselves for the maintenance of law and for the 
punishment of all unjust states. It is clear that 
such a combination will result in a power always 
victorious ; but the far higher question is, how can 
it be arranged that this combination of states al- 
ways will decree justly 1 

XVI. 

Many states unite and guarantee each to the 
other their independence and the inviolability of 
the compact just described. The formula of such 
a confederation would be as follows : We all pro- 
mise to exterminate with united force any state, 
whether it belong to this confederation or not, 
which shall refuse to recognize the independence 
of any one of us, or which shall violate a treaty 
concluded between it and one of us. 

I say the formula of this confederation, for it 
would be a confederacy, not a state. The distinc- 
tion is this : Each individual can be compelled to 
become member of a state, since otherwise it is im- 
possible to establish a legal relation with him. But 
no state can be compelled to enter this confedera- 
tion, because it can establish a legal relation with for- 



486 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



eign states without entering it.* To establish such 
a relation it suffices, indeed, to recognize them and 
conclude a treaty with them. No state, however, 
has the right to compel other states to furnish to it 
positive protection. Hence the confederation is an 
arbitrary, and not a compulsory union, and such a 
union is called a Confederation. 

XVII. 

Whether one state has recognized the indepen- 
dence of another state, appears from the fact whe- 
ther it has concluded a treaty with it or not. Hence, 
the confederation has a sure means of deciding this 
question ; and it is not to be presumed that this 
confederation will knowingly and intentionally pro- 
nounce a wrong judgment, since all the world 
would see immediately the injustice of such judg- 
ment. The question whether a state has fulfilled 
the conditions of its treaties or not, the confedera- 
tion must decide partly from the facts brought to 
its notice and partly from the terms of the treaty. 
So far as the facts are concerned, each state being 
obliged to conduct its matters publicly, it will not 
be difficult to obtain reliable knowledge concerning 

* Here we meet again the oversight which limits Fichte's whole 
application of his Science of Rights. No state can establish a 
Zif^a/ relation with foreign states, as we have shown, unless it estab- 
lishes also a common government and a supreme judiciary, that is, 
a confederate republic. Hence, every state can be compelled to 
become a member of a confederate republic. — Translator's Re- 
mark. 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



487 



them. A state charged with non-compHancc with 
an obligation of its treaties must furnish positive 
proof that it has compHed with it. If a state does 
not appear before the confederation to justify itself, 
it thereby virtually admits its guilt. True, a state 
not belonging to the confederation might say : 
What have I to do with this confederation It is 
not my judge. But the answer is : You are at least 
responsible to the state with whom you have made 
the treaty, and that state has, doubtless, a right to 
appeal to us. 

The confederation being the judge of violations 
of treaties, must also supervise their original con- 
struction so as to have them made clear and defi- 
nite. This appears, already, from the fact that all 
treaties are concluded under its guarantee. Inde- 
finiteness in the treaties can not be tolerated, be- 
cause there must be left no room for error of judg- 
ment. Any injustice will thus be .flagrant to all the 
world. Such a confederation, however, composed 
of states which all have private interests of their 
own, can not well have a common interest to act 
unjustly. An unjust sentence turns against the 
states themselves. For the principles which they 
apply to others will be applied to them. 

XVI 11. 

The confederation must have the power to exe- 
cute its dc!tisions. This is done, as appears from 
the above, by a war of extermination against the 



488 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



state condemned. Hence, the confederation must 
be armed. The question may arise, whether a 
special standing army shall be established, or whe- 
ther such an army shall be called out only in times 
of war by contributions from the separate states ? 
Since it is to be hoped that war will rarely occur, 
and in future never, I should vote for the latter ; for 
why have a standing army, when it will probably be 
idle most of the time 

XIX. 

The absolute impossibility of an unjust decision 
by the confederation has not yet been established. 
Nor can it be established, as we also could not show 
the absolute impossibility of an unjust decision by 
the people assembled in convention. Until reason 
herself appears in person upon earth and assumes 
judicial power, we shall always have a supreme 
court, which, being finite, is liable to error or to evil 
motives. The problem is simply to discover a tribu- 
nal from which there is the least likelihood to ex- 
pect this ; and such a tribunal is for civil relations 
the nation, and for the relations of states, the just- 
described confederation. 

XX. 

As this confederation extends and gradually em- 
braces the whole earth, eternal peace will be estab- 
lished — peace, the only lawful relation of states. 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



489 



Since war is as likely to give victory to the unjust 
as to the just, or, at the very best, under the direc- 
tion of a confederation of states, is only a means 
for the ultimate end — the maintenance of peace. 



§ 2 

CONCERNING COSMOPOLITAN LAW. 
I. 

Each citizen has the right to practice his occu- 
pation throughout the whole territory of his state. 
This right is a part of the rights guaranteed to 
him by the state. The minister of a foreign state 
has a right, by virtue of the treaty between both 
states, to travel also throughout that foreign state, 
this being the means for his end — to watch over the 
performance of the treaty stipulations. He shows 
his pass at the boundaries, and it is the duty of the 
state to which he is accredited to admit him. His 
unconditional rejection would be ground for a war. 
Private persons of one state visit another state 
either on business or pleasure. Their residence in 
foreign states is regulated by the treaties with such 
states. If both states have guaranteed to each 
other the safety of their citizens, the traveler-citi- 
zen is safe by virtue of the treaty. , His position as 



490 THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 

citizen of his own state he proves by showing his- 
pass. 

But how, when a stranger, who is neither the 
ambassador from some state nor citizen of a state 
which has a treaty with it, enters a foreign state ? 
The reply to this only remaining question of law 
furnishes the ground of the Cosmopolitan law. 

II. 

All positive rights, rights to something, are based 
upon an agreement. Now this stranger has made 
no agreement at all with the state visited by him, 
nor does he belong to a state which has made an 
agreement with it, foi such is the presupposition. 
Has he, then, no rights at all or, if he has any, 
upon what are they based } He has that original 
right of man, which precedes all law-agreements 
and first makes them possible, namely, the right 
that all men must pres7ippose the possibility of enter- 
ing into a legal relation with him ? 

This alone is the true right of man, which be- 
longs to man as man ; the possibility to acquire 
rights. This, and only this, right must be granted 
to every one who has not expressly lost it through 
his actions. Let us illustrate it more clearly by 
opposition. The person whose citizenship in a 
state is cancelled by that state on account of a 
crime committed by him, thereby loses all his 
positive rights, and not only them, but also the 
right to acquire rights in that state, he having 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 491 

shown himself absolutely unfit for a legal relation. 
A new stranger has also no positive rights in that 
state ; but he has the right to acquire rights within 
that state, and to insist upon that right. 

From this right is derived his right to enter the 
territory of a foreign state ; for to have a right to 
the end is also to have a right to the means ; and 
the attempt to enter a legal relation in that state 
can not be made without entering its territory. It 
is this right to wander freely over the whole earth, 
and to offer himself anywhere as candidate for a 
legal relation, which constitutes the right of the 
mere cosmopolitan. 

III. 

The ground of a stranger's right to enter the ter- 
ritory of a state is his right to attempt and offer to 
the citizens of such state a legal relation. That 
state has, therefore, the right to ask the stranger 
what he desires, and to force him to declare his 
object. If he does not do so, the ground of his 
right ceases, and he is expelled from its boundaries. 
Again : If he does declare himself, but if his pro- 
posal is rejected, the ground of his right also 
ceases, and he is justly expelled. But he must not 
be otherwise harmed. For the possibility remains 
that he may become citizen of another state. The 
right to this possibility can never be taken away 
from him. 

1 1 



492 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



IV. 

If his proposal is accepted, he then occupies an im- 
mediate relation to such state and the rights of both 
parties are determined by this relation. By recog- 
nizing the state, he has already recognized the right 
■of property of all its citizens. This he does not 
need expressly to reiterate, for it follows from the 
act of his entering into an agreement with the state. 
He is subject to the other laws of the state pre- 
cisely in so far as he has subjected himself to the 
state. 

Of course, the state thus becomes his judge, for 
no other state protects him. Disagreeable as this 
circumstance may be, he must submit to it, for it 
is unavoidable. 



CONCERNING 



NATURE OF ANIMALS. 



CONCERNING THE NATURE OF ANIMALS.* 
I. 

According to the Science of Knowledge, I trans- 
fer to nature the conception of myself as far as I 
•can do so without canceling nature herself in her 
own character, or in other words, without making 
nature an intelligence, that is, an Ego, or a Self- 
joositing. 

ir. 

To say the intelligence is a higher power or 
manifestation of nature may signify two things : 

I. If I arbitrarily gather together all that is 
thinkable, as known to me already empirically ; 
and if I rise higher in this gathering together of 
all the empirically known, I discover that man has 
in him altogether all that which nature contains ; 
but that man has, moreover, in him something else 
besides ; in other words, that man has in him a 
natural — the mere determ inability of articulation, 

* The following few pages of a fragment to the Science of Rights 
are appended as complementing the deduction of nature contained 
in the first part of this science. — Translator's Remark. 



496 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



which connects nature and freedom — and a super- 
natural. In so far it may be said in such a System 
of the Thinkable that the inteUigence is a higher 
manifestation of nature ; for in such a system, which 
mtrcXy narrates, but does not furnish grotcnds, nature 
and intelligence connect with each other, and there 
is no zhsolnie. hiatus. 

II. But when that proposition is made to signify 
that in a system of nature the intelligence is itself 
a higher power or manifestation of nature, then it 
is evidently incorrect, and is refuted thoroughly in 
transcendental philosophy. For the latter shows 
nature to be product of the intelligence ; how, 
then, can the intelligence again, through an evi- 
dent circle, be product of nature On the con- 
trary, in man himself, so far as he is nature, the 
power of nature has not gone to its ultimate ex- 
tent, for the very sake of man's freedom. 

III. It is only in a system of the intelligible 
world that this proposition would have any signifi- 
cance. For the finite intelligence is certainly a 
lower power of the absolute intelligence. But this 
absolute intelligence involves, also, a merely deter- 
minable, whereof the actual intelligence, or the em- 
pirical Ego, is the higher power. This merely de- 
terminable is nature in her utterly unexplainable 
and incomprehensible fundamental elements. These- 
latter elements, however, do not belong in a philo- 
sophy of nature, the business whereof it is to com- 
prehend nature only in so far as nature has become 
determined in actuality, or received into the ground 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



497 



form of the intelligence ; in other words, in so far 
as nature has again become product of the absolute 
intelligence. 

Hence, the above proposition is not really philo- 
sophical, but merely realistical and encyclopaedical. 
In a philosophy of nature, it is clearly false. It 
attracts only through its very poetical side, which 
poetry is always a presentiment of the intelligible ; 
as, for instance, in Jacob Boehme. 

III. 

This transferring of my own character into na- 
ture I always sensualize singly in contemplation. 
Thus it becomes my experience. 

IV. 

The highest within me, independently of con- 
sciousness and the immediate object of conscious- 
ness, is the impulse. The impulse is the highest rep- 
resentation of the intelligence in nature. Hence, 
the impulse is the immediate feelable, (substance or 
element of feeling,) but on no account feeling itself, 
since feeling is already a consciousness. 

V. 

The intelligence attributes to each atom in na- 
ture impulse ; or, to speak more strictly, through 
positing and realizing an impulse outside of itself, 



498 THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 

there arises for the intelligence a world of nature. 
Impulse is, therefore, a tendency to have externally 
causality, and to be the object of an external caus^ 
ality ; which latter two links are, indeed, exchange- 
able, and differ only in accordance with the degree 
of the product of nature. We shall find instances 
very soon — as, attraction and repulsion ; polarity in 
general ; chemical affinities and hostilities. 

VI. 

Through this internal and immanent impulse, 
the nature of every atom is absolutely determined. 
This nature of the atom I shall for the present call 
its dicmical nature, according to my own interpreta- 
tion of the word. 

VII. 

It is clear that these chemical forces in nature 
will remain without manifestation — precisely like 
the impulse in man — and that, hence, they are 
posited merely abstractly, unless the condition of 
their realization is posited at the same time. Posi- 
ted thus abstractly, they result in the conception of 
raw matter, which is nothing but an empty abstrac- 
tion from the causality of the impulse — as again, the 
impulse in general, as not throughout determined, 
is also nothing but an abstraction. (Every thing 
posited in the intelligence must 2c^^Q.?iX in concreto^ 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



499 



VIII. 

This conception of raw matter is an abstraction 
•of lower degree, because the impulse is put into 
operation by a union of atom-affinities. 

It may thus be put into operation in a twofold 
manner : 

I. Onc-sidcdly : in which case the impulse is 
posited as mere causality, resulting in a product 
which does not retroact upon the impulse, and in 
which product the impulse, therefore, posits only a 
quiet residuum of exhausted power. The product 
arising from such one-sided causality of the impulse 
we call minerals — crystallization of earths and met- 
als — which, for that very reason, join in straight 
lines. For here there is mere result and no organ- 
ization whatever ; hence, also, no continuous and 
thus itself-renewing reciprocity with the rest of the 
universe. The chemical force — speaking abstract- 
ly — is as yet held in confinement by the impene- 
trated and throughout similar mass. 

II. Reciprocally : in which case both or all chemi- 
cal forces intimately penetrate each other, dissolve 
into each other, and melt together into a new whole. 
The product of such a reciprocal causality of the 
impulse is organization, as exemplified in its sim- 
plest abstraction in the plant. Such a new whole, 
which is neither a, nor b, nor c, but rather the result 
of all of them in their closest union — such a sepa- 
rate organization (or plant) forms a higher power 



500 THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 

within nature — a nature of its own, finished and' 
completed in itself. 

IX. 

But nihil per saltum. The tmion is absolute ; the 
interpenetratio7i, however, proceeds gradually. In 
this work of interpenetration each force draws 
unto itself from surrounding nature that which 
is homogeneons to itself, and repels that which 
is averse to the tendency of the interpenetra- 
tion. Thus it influences as a totality the sur- 
rounding chemical nature as far as its sphere of 
causality extends ; and the result of this infinite 
reciprocity within itself, and with the external 
world, we call life: here the life of the plant, or. 
groivt/i, and the absolute interpenetration mani- 
festing itself, we call here blossom. 

X. 

From the moment of this highest penetration 
the organic forces, as separates, are canceled, since 
they are concentrated in that product, the blossom. 
Hence, with it expires the impelling power of de- 
velopment, and the plant ceases to grow, as, in- 
deed, it grows less toward the time of bloom. By 
this stoppage of life and the expurgation of that 
which can not be used in the absolute interpene- 
tration, the plant retires from its reciprocity with, 
the rest of the world ; and while the result of the.- 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. SOI 

interpenetration remains as dry seed, the plant 
itself dies as such separate plant. 

(Objections from actual life do not invalidate this 
conception. Even those seeming exceptions will 
be found to express the same conception, only in a 
somewhat weaker degree.) 

XL 

The seed is again awakened into life through 
the universal movements of development in nature,, 
warmth and wet ; and the same circle begins anew. 
The chemical components lie in the seed ; and that 
influence of nature, which may be akin to fermen- 
tation, places them again in conflict with surround- 
ing nature. The way of nature is an everlasting 
circular movement of analysis and synthesis. Fer- 
mentation is analysis ; development of the indivi- 
dual, and self-assertion thereof, is synthesis. Hence 
the fruitfulness of plants ; many of them working 
together with united power against the influence of 
surrounding nature. Here also can be established 
the distinction between dead (artificial) and living 
chemistry. The former has only results, and not 
any separate forces ; it analyzes, but does not syn- 
thesize ; and hence it can not produce the condi- 
tions of nature. 

xn. 

The plant is, therefore, a central point of a chemi- 
cal-organic circle of attraction and repulsion, which 
we may conceive as internal motion. This motion 



502 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



must be realized as posited in the impulse ; in other 
words, this motion must appear in nature as an in- 
dependent principle. 

XIII. 

An in-itself-returning, and hence itself-determi- 
ning itnpulse of motion — which arises through a 
synthesis of parts working together into a totality, 
and which is a system of a more complex organ- 
ism, to be conceived as aj'timlatioii — we call an ani- 
mal. 

XIV. 

What, then, is the animal .•' First of all, a system 
of plant-souls. The unity of those plant-souls, 
which unity nature itself produces, is the soul of 
the animal. Its world is therefore partly that of the 
plants — its nourishment, for instance, it receives 
partly through synthesis from vegetable, and 
through analysis from animal nature — and partly 
that of the animals, whereof we shall speak directly. 

XV. 

To describe the relation of the animal to the 
world, we must first recapitulate previous points : 

The sphere of causality of a growing plant is an 
everlasting vortex* of a chemical attraction and re- 

* Compare Swedenborg's Principia and the theories of Des 
Cartes and Leibnitz. — Translator's Remark. 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 503 

pulsion, the central point whereof (or, ideally ex- 
pressed, the soul whereof) is the one force of the 
plant itself This everlasting appropriation of foreign 
elements, and expurgation of what does not harmo- 
nize with the organism, we can not think otherwise 
than as an invisible movement in space. Hence, the 
soul of the plant is not only the principle of a de- 
termined organization, (is not only the interpene- 
tration and union of diffei-ent chemical forces,) but 
is, moreover, the first principle of a motiori in nature ; 
it is the moving principle. 

XVI. 

But, in the case of the plant, motion is altogether 
a passivity, a being driven or dragged onward, and 
hence it is not the predicate of an absolutely inde- 
pendent organization. This motion in nature must 
also be organized, and must occur in a complete 
system of nature as impulse and as a peculiar force. 
How is this achieved ? 

XVII. 

Each product of nature is an organically in-itself 
completed totality in space, like the plant. Hence, 
the unknown x which we are looking for must also 
be such a whole or totality, and in so far it must 
also have a principle of organization, a sphere and 
central point of this organization ; in short, the same 
which we have called the soul of the plant, which 
thus remains common to both. 



504 THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 

But it is, moreover, realization of a movement in 
(nature ; first of all within itself This can signify 
only that the principle of the original motion, al- 
ready discovered in the plant, is posited in every 
part of its organic body, and that, hence, so far as 
determinability is concerned, this motion is thus in 
every part of its body ; and that this mobility is 
thus in every part of its body by virtue of its own 
nature, as involving an impulse ; and hence, that 
part of its body can draw along another part, or 
the whole of the body. 

This is clearly the conception of articulation, as 
explained in the Science of Rights in relation to 
man. But in the present case the principle of an 
.actual movement is to be — not, as in man, the free- 
will, for in that case the body under consideration 
would not be merely nature ; it is to be nature it- 
self determining itself with necessity ; and thus the 
tody is not man, but an animal. 



XVIII. 

Abstracting from the fact that the animal is a 
plant — which word may here receive another signi- 
fication — let us now compare this conception with 
the above-established conception of a plant. In the 
plant and its sphere of causality, all motion pro- 
ceeded from one central point and returned into it. 
But in the animal every possible point, involving, as 



THE SCIENCE OF RIGHTS. 



it does, a peculiar principle of motion, is the central 
point of a plant-atmosphere as its lov/er world. 

Hence, the animal is a system of plant-souls, and 
the plant is a separated, isolated part of an animal. 
Both reciprocally affect each other. 



FRINTED BY BALLANTYNE, HANSON AND COU 
LONDON AND EDINBURGH 



